All subscriptions
TribalNeed
@tribalneed•147K subscribers
FULL Discography 50%off 👇 DOWNLOAD Here https://tribalneed.bandcamp.com/ . Mystic Live Looping - Melodic Techno . With his experimental combination of Didjeridoo, Percussions, Hang Drum, Kid Toys, old Analog Synth, Beatboxing and a Loop Station, Riccardo Moretti’s solo project ‘TribalNeed’ is at the forefront of progressive musicianship. Sharp melodies, melancholic sounds and ancient rhythms tell the story of this "Electro Nomad’ and his journey between the European Electronic scene and Afro-Australian tribal grooves. Having appeared at the most important Street Festivals in Europe and abroad, the likes of Pflasterspektakel (Linz, AT), CapeTown Jazz Festival, Aufgettisch St.Gallen (CH), Ferrara Buskers Festival (IT), Landshut Spectacle (DE), Pennabilli (IT), this Mystic LiveLooping performance is a No-compromise, No-DJ, No-computer, spontaneous creation that manifests an original approach to organic/electronic composition: an emotional MUST-SEE live show.
The Based Conservative
@Thebasedconservative•333K subscribers
Common sense politics.
Miss Monique

@djmissmonique•1.14M subscribers
A Ukrainian DJ, producer and label owner who’s a YouTube, clubland and streaming phenomenon, with over 200 million cumulative views and almost 1.000.000 monthly Spotify listeners. A trailblazing artist in the progress/melodic space with a huge online following hooked on her exquisitely crafted and produced livestreams – the most recent instalment of her filmed MiMo Podcast, number 042, a 70-minute Melodic Techno & House DJ Mix, had one million views within a month. A talent incubator and champion in her own right: this year Siona Records, Miss Monique’s home for other young progressive artists, celebrates its fifth anniversary. Her Siona Records 3rd Anniversary @ Ibiza mix, launched on YT in June 2022, has been viewed 20 million times.
Matthew Berman
@matthew_berman•433K subscribers
Artificial Intelligence (AI), Open Source, Generative Art, AI Art, Futurism, ChatGPT, Large Language Models (LLM), Machine Learning, Technology, Coding, Tutorials, AI News, and more
Jesse Lee Peterson
@jlptalk•523K subscribers
Uniting the Races with Truth Instead of Dividing Them with Lies! We're also Rebuilding the Family by Rebuilding the Man! LIVE from Los Angeles M-F 6-9a PT (8-11CT/9-noonET) Call-in 📞 to The Jesse Lee Peterson Show with your question or comment! ​ 888-77-JESSE (1-888-775-3773) Live on multiple platforms + podcast links/info on JLPtalk.com
Your Wingmam

@YourWingmam•375K subscribers
Welcome to Just The Tip! I decode the mysterious world of female psychology, to help you find, attract and keep your dream girl. Understand women better and become irresistible! Women can also learn because it’s not all about what women want. ;) Let’s bridge the divide between the sexes! Big hugs, xo Your Wingmam, Anna Jorgensen 🥰 Transform your dating life from "meh" to “mmhmm ;)” Get one-on-one coaching here: https://members.wingmam.com/meetmorewomen/ Or my self-study WakeUP2Luv program—called "life-changing" by guys like you: https://members.wingmam.com/get-women/ Some links I share earn me an affiliate fee at no extra cost to you. Thank you for helping me keep the lights on and the free videos flowing! Heads-up: while I love connecting with my audience, I won’t ask you to DM me. Those are fake Wingmam accounts and scammers. Ain't nobody got time for that! Disclaimer: I'm not a therapist, lawyer, or doctor. Ultimately, you're in charge of your love journey. You got this!
Global Cycling Network

@gcn•3.37M subscribers
The Global Cycling Network puts you in the centre of the action: from the iconic climbs of Alpe D’Huez and Mont Ventoux to the cobbles of Flanders, everywhere there is road or pavé, world-class racing and pro riders, we will be there bringing you action, analysis and unparalleled access every week, every month, and every year. We show you how to be a better cyclist with our bike maintenance videos, tips for improving your cycling, cycling top tens, and not forgetting the weekly GCN Show. Join us on YouTube’s biggest and best cycling channel to get closer to the action and improve your riding! Welcome to the Global Cycling Network!
The Civil Rights Lawyer

@thecivilrightslawyer•893K subscribers
Civil Rights Lawyer John H. Bryan's YouTube Channel Current issues of constitutional law, including police misconduct, government corruption and criminal defense, including documentation of John's civil rights cases in West Virginia. Business Inquiries: civilrightslawyer@ellify.com Submit a Video: https://forms.gle/HmwnDQKvwvYPxe967 DISCLAIMER Note: The information you obtain at this site is not, nor is it intended to be, legal advice. You should consult an attorney for advice regarding your individual situation. We invite you to contact us and welcome your letters and electronic mail. Contacting us does not create an attorney-client relationship. Please do not send any confidential information to us unless and until such time as an attorney-client relationship is established in writing by an attorney - client agreement.
Cosmic Gate

@CosmicGatemusic•370K subscribers
GRAMMY ® nominated trance legends Cosmic Gate aka Nic Chagall and Bossi have proved to be a matchless musical union. The last 20 Years set them on the course to becoming Germany’s most enduringly successful electronic music duo. Smashing the biggest festivals and road-blocking clubs worldwide.
Forbes Breaking News

@ForbesBreakingNews•4.73M subscribers
Plasma Channel

@PlasmaChannel•1.01M subscribers
Hi, I'm Jay. Plasma physics is more than a science to me - it's a tool for the future, and a source of inspiration for us all to reach further. This channel represents my passion for High Voltage physics, and contains a growing catalogue of any high voltage process, application, or discovery that you can think of. I'm currently based in Seattle, WA, but broadcast globally. For all business inquiries: use below email. If you so choose to mail me an item to display on an episode, I will provide mailing addy via email. "Your ancestors called it magic. You call it science. I come from a place where they are one in the same"
Matt Brown

@mattbrwn•155K subscribers
My name is Matt Brown and I'm an Hardware Security Researcher and Bug Bounty Hunter. This channel is a place where I share my knowledge and experience finding vulnerabilities in IoT systems. - Soli Deo Gloria
Project Farm

@ProjectFarm•3.46M subscribers
I test all sorts of things, from tools to automotive products, to help viewers make informed purchasing decisions and to avoid getting ripped off. Also, I have awesome Patreon supporters, which allows me to decline all sponsorships and promotional items from manufacturers and to offer the most unbiased reviews you'll find anywhere. Please watch a couple of videos and consider subscribing. Thank you and best regards, Todd Project Farm, LLC
TheQuartering

@TheQuartering•1.85M subscribers
Another social commentary channel but this one the guy has a beard! Let's Talk Games! I talk about issues many of us care about in the gaming industry, comics, and the world at large. Come to hopefully both be entertained & informed! Thanks for subscribing https://www.minds.com/TheQuartering
Louis Rossmann

@rossmanngroup•2.19M subscribers
Contact: youtube@rossmanngroup.com email me here & I'll read it!! email me elsewhere & I report it as spam. I started as a studio repair technician at Avatar & started a Macbook component level logic board repair business. This channel shows repair & data recovery work & shows how to perform these repairs step by step. There are many outside forces that make it hard to fix things now; willful actions from manufacturers to limit access to parts & schematics. I talked about this to try and spark mainstream recognition of the "Right to Repair" movement. I realized that restrictions placed on repair were just a canary-in the-coal-mine for many of the anti-ownership, anti-consumer practices that would become common in every industry, which I discuss & try to push back against every day. If you need data recovery: rossmanngroup.com For macbook board repair advice: boards.rossmanngroup.com Rossmann Repair Group 2 Inc 2410 San Antonio St Austin, TX, 78705 (347) 552-2258 (customer service)
Robinson Foundry

@robinson-foundry•493K subscribers
I'm Seth Robinson! I like making things and this channel is where I share my projects! Email for business inquiries Robinsonfoundry@gmail.com
Jack Pembrook

@jackpembrook•932K subscribers
Self-proclaimed Youtuber Business Inquiries: jackpembrook@oddprojects.com
WhistlinDiesel

@whistlindiesel•9.25M subscribers
Are you tired of clicking on a deceivingly clickbaited video only for it to be someone doing the same boring crap you saw last week? Yeah me too. Thats why i never waste time uploading a stupid boring video. OK maybe they are stupid lol. Enjoy There's a lot more on Instagram www.instagram.com/whistlindiesel SERIOUS BUSINESS INQUIRIES ONLY: dieselmediacorp@gmail.com
Jim Browning

@JimBrowning•4.4M subscribers
Tracking and identifying scammers who knock my front door, call me or shove popups onto my computer screen. ** Please do not email me asking for help with hacking issues. I cannot help. I require scammers to connect to MY PC before I have any chance of identifying them **
Daily Dose Of Internet

@DailyDoseOfInternet•20M subscribers
Welcome to your Daily Dose of Internet where I search for the best trending videos, or videos people have forgotten about, and put them all in one video. I always ask for permission to share videos that I find! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- If YOU film a video and think it is good enough to be featured on Daily Dose Of Internet, you can submit videos to me using the link below. Only send in videos that you personally filmed. If you are not 18, you can have a parent or guardian sign for you. https://thisisyourdailydose.com/ ------------------------------------ Business Inquires: Hit me up on my social media. I can't give out email due to spam. ------------------------------------
Data Slayer

@DataSlayerMedia•252K subscribers
DIY Guides for All My Videos 👉 https://www.patreon.com/dataslayer374/shop Unlock vast opportunities with the power of knowledge and the potential of small computers. From turning the Raspberry Pi into a supercomputer to exploring the convergence of AI and IoT, this channel showcases how to achieve big things on small tech.
Scambaiter

@Scambaiter•2.65M subscribers
Scambaiter, scambaiting videos where we destroy scammers their operation after hacking / ratting the scammer their computer. Memz, nanocore, anything will be used to destroy them. Inspired by people like Jim Browning, Scammer Payback and ScammerRevolts. Together as the scambaiting community we can make a difference. If you love the content and want to support the channel: https://patreon.com/scambaiter or on Paypal: https://paypal.me/scambaiteryt Business inquiries only: scambaiterbusiness@gmail.com **I AM NOT A PRIVATE INVESTIGATOR THAT WILL HELP YOU IF YOU HAVE GOTTEN SCAMMED IN THE PAST.** Please don't send me emails asking questions or asking for my personal help, that's what my discord is for: https://discord.gg/QSWc5hX4rV or my twitter: https://twitter.com/scambaiteryt
Applied Science

@AppliedScience•857K subscribers
Subscribe to see interesting applications of science and technology. You'll see how an electron microscope was built in a home shop, how an X-ray backscatter system works, how to make aerogel, and many other hi-tech projects. Topics usually include electromechanical systems, chemistry, and electronics. Hosted by Ben Krasnow.
Kitboga

@KitbogaShow•3.68M subscribers
Everyday there are scammers taking advantage of people. I call them to waste their time, walk people through their "script" and lies, report info when I can, and otherwise make light of a dark situation.
EbikeSchool.com

@EbikeSchool•395K subscribers
Come learn about electric bicycles, lithium batteries and all sorts of other related projects! I post a lot of different types of videos including how to's and informational videos, as well as more information in article form on my website www.EbikeSchool.com. You can also check out my ebook at www.UltimateEbikeEbook.com or my best-selling ebike and lithium battery building books on Amazon at https://goo.gl/bmQ9MQ
Rich Rebuilds

@RichRebuilds•1.53M subscribers
Rich Rebuilds shows you how to have a good time by occasionally rebuilding cool cars and other general shenanigans. Co-Founded by Rich Benoit & Carl Hewitt
PeterSripol

@PeterSripol•2.34M subscribers
I make airplanes 👀 Follow me on Instagram: User: PeterSripol Also i have a patreon that’s on life support. Email for sponsorship/branding PeterSripol@underscoretalent.com
Moon Dev
@moondevonyt•95.1K subscribers
i believe code is the great equalizer Twitter - @MoonDevOnYT not financial advice
Tommy G

@TommyGMcGee•2.38M subscribers
My mission is to give you inside access to hard to reach people, places, and situations - ranging from gang leaders to billionaires to fentanyl dealers to SWAT teams. Life is an adventure and each week, I bring you on a new journey.
Chris Rosser
@ChrisRosser•43.3K subscribers
Join my Discord for chat, product recommendations, support, events and more: https://discord.gg/z5nVeNE4KR I am an aerothermal engineer with a specialism in computational modelling. I'm also an FPV pilot. This channel is about sharing my skills and knowledge with other pilots. If you would like to support me or you have a frame design you would like me to look at please check out my Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/chris_rosser
Peter Santenello

@PeterSantenello•3.65M subscribers
I make videos showing you a world that the media fails to capture. No BS polarization or political angle—just pure authentic interactions with the locals. I present the story. You present your own opinion. We'll learn about the people of Appalachia, the Chicanos, and the Native Americans. I dive into the full range of America, from the Amish to the Bloods and Crips. The goal is to get into someone else’s world to understand them and ourselves better. The ingredients are: a GoPro, simple editing, curiosity, a search for truth, and most importantly, authentic human interactions. I’ve lived abroad in four countries and traveled to 85. I've taken this perspective back to the USA to show Americans and the world what this great nation is like away from the mainstream media.
FliteTest

@FliteTest•2.15M subscribers
Flite Test is here to educate, entertain and elevate those who have an interest in flight. We live in a world where people are inside too much, disconnected too often and passionate about too little. We are leading the charge for the worldwide community of people passionate about flight, creating the means both virtually and physically for them to connect relationally, grow intellectually and share widely their passion with others.
CrazyRussianHacker

@CrazyRussianHacker•12M subscribers
Fan Mail or if you want me review your product on my channels: Crazy Russian Hacker P.O. Box 49 Waynesville, NC 28786
jehugarcia

@jehugarcia•434K subscribers
Hi I'm Jehu, I create Videos, I make electric cars, and now Im making DIYPowerwall projects. Advertise on my channel http://www.archimedes.agency/#influencers
Durham Hearing Specialists
@DurhamHearingSpecialists•308K subscribers
Welcome to Durham Hearing Specialists, where we share our most interesting ear cases in weekly videos. Our Audiologist Mr. Conor Boland uses a range of techniques to examine and treat ear conditions using high definition endoscopy in 4k at 60 frames per second. Our videos are here to inform, educate and promote best practices in the field of ear care and Audiology. For more information or to book an ear wax removal appointment in our UK clinic, visit: https://www.durhamhearingspecialists.com/ https://www.facebook.com/durhamhearingspecialists https://www.instagram.com/durhamhearingspecialists/ Products we use and recommend: EAROL Olive Oil Spray UK LINK: https://amzn.to/2JQXw8e EAROL Olive Oil Spray US LINK: https://amzn.to/3nmE6FX
LastWeekTonight

@LastWeekTonight•9.75M subscribers
Breaking news on a weekly basis. Sundays at 11PM - only on HBO. Subscribe to the Last Week Tonight channel for the latest videos from John Oliver and the LWT team.
Tyler Ramsbey || Hack Smarter
@TylerRamsbey•34.4K subscribers
Hello everyone! I post videos on cybersecurity, education, leadership, and all things pertaining to the world of IT! Let's connect: Twitch: https://twitch.tv/hack_smarter LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/tyler-ramsbey-86221643/ Hack Smarter: https://hacksmarter.org
Talking Sasquach
@TalkingSasquach•96.9K subscribers
It's THE Talking Sasquach and welcome to my channel! We do cybersec tutorials using things like the Flipper Zero, HackRF and more! Throw in some random maker videos playing with 3d printer and lasers and this is one!
Rocha KRG

@RochaKRG•951K subscribers
Eres curioso? te gusta innovar? quieres darle otro uso a objetos de la vida cotidiana? Entonces este es tu canal. Quedate para ver videos de entretenimiento, replicas, inventos, creaciones caseras y para que juntos hagamos de esto algo enorme. Con tu suscripcion ayudas a que este canal no pare de crecer. GRACIAS POR FORMAR PARTE DE ESTO.
SuperHumans Life

@SuperHumansLife•405K subscribers
Hi! Welcome to SuperHumans Life! My name is Laura, and this channel is all about leveraging AI, monetizing your talents, and staying ahead of the curve. Here, we like to geek out on topics like: ✅ AI-powered side hustles & business automation 💰 ✅ How to use AI to create income & work smarter ⚡ ✅ Freelancing, digital entrepreneurship & financial freedom ✅ Personal growth & building a life on your terms 💡 AI is creating more opportunities than ever before—but most people will miss them. The key isn’t just AI—it’s knowing how to use it to amplify your talents, automate work, and create real income. Most people wait for permission. We take action. If you’re ready to ditch the excuses, get ahead of the curve, and build something real—this is your place. 🚀 And if you are ready to take action, join our FREE community of AI entrepreneurs & action-takers! 👉 https://www.skool.com/ai-trailblazers-hive-7394/about?ref=ff40ab4ff9184e7ca2d1971501f578df Let’s build something amazing together.
Truthstream Media

@TruthstreamMedia•607K subscribers
Truthstream Media is not your mainstream news! Welcome to teleprompter-free, unscripted analysis of The Matrix we live in. Aaron Dykes and Melissa Dykes (formerly Melton) created TruthstreamMedia.com as an outlet to try and figure out what in the hell is really going on while we watch history repeat itself over and over and over...
Kirsten Dirksen

@kirstendirksen•2M subscribers
Videos about simple living, self-sufficiency, unconventional (and unique) homes, backyard gardens (and livestock), alternative transport, DIY, craftsmanship, and philosophies of life. Also produced/filmed by Nicolás Boullosa https://faircompanies.com/nicolas-boullosa/
Grind Hard Plumbing Co

@GrindHardPlumbingCo•2.83M subscribers
We build crazy cars and contraptions out of a small garage in the woods of North Idaho. Home of the world's fastest mini jet boat, the off-road Tesla, the 60 MPH Barbie car and plenty other absurd vehicles. It only gets wilder from here so make sure to subscribe! Our podcast: Sent and Bent wherever you listen to podcasts
Kevin Talbot

@KevinTalbotTV•3.18M subscribers
Welcome to my channel! Here you will find Cars, RC Cars, Monster Trucks, and other fun videos.
Physionic
@Physionic•268K subscribers
Detailed multi-study analyses, clear explanations of mechanisms underlying the results, and a sprinkling of cheeky humor. Learn your body, from the macro to the micro - welcome to Physionic. Credentials: - Ph.D. in Molecular Medicine (Cell Physiology) - Masters in Exercise Physiology - 10 Years Experience in Laboratory Work - Previous American College of Sports Medicine Certification - Non-Degree in Nutrition Science (1.5 years undergraduate education) - Classroom Professor (T.A. in 2015) in Health, Nutrition, and Physiology since 2016 Disclaimer: None of the information provided by this brand is a replacement for your physician's advice. This brand is information for the sake of knowledge and the options of choice it provides, not in any way a personalized prescription. Please consult your physician before making any health related changes.
Sam Pilgrim

@SamPilgrim•2.22M subscribers
Welcome to my channel, I'm a professional Freeride Mountain biker and former FMB world champion(2013). This channel is all about Mountain biking, I make a huge variety of videos for everyone who loves dirt: From downhill biking to slower paced trials riding and everything in between like dirt jumping, slopestyle and enduro! As well as making entertain videos(I hope) I also like to help YOU out too, with videos such as: - How to ride better - Trick tips and How to's - Travel VLOGS - GoPro camera tips - In-depth entertaining features - POV craziness - Funny videos I also try to reply to everyone so leave some comments too!
Kitplanes Magazine
@KitplanesMagazine•19.9K subscribers
The Independent Voice for Homebuilt Aviation
Fireship

@Fireship•3.77M subscribers
High-intensity ⚡ code tutorials and tech news to help you ship your app faster. New videos every week covering the topics every programmer should know. The original home of #100SecondsOfCode #TheCodeReport and #CodeThisNotThat. Created by Jeff Delaney. Building an app? Get project support, advanced full courses, and more at https://fireship.io
OpenAI
@OpenAI•1.45M subscribers
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that artificial general intelligence benefits all of humanity.
The Thought Emporium

@thethoughtemporium•2.05M subscribers
Science is a bottomless well of some of the most amazing things this universe has to offer. There is so much amazing science and engineering that gets done, but most often the only ones who get to experience it first hand are those in expensive labs in universities. This channel aims to explore as much of fields of science and engineering as possible by showing real experiments and research being done in a fun and accessible way. While the goal is to show that even very hard science can be done in a DIY way, some projects will use some of the fancier toys that while less accessible, opens a broader range of projects that can be done. We cover everything from genetic engineering and tissue culture, to nuclear physics, to machine engineering, to chemical synthesis and more.
Gamers Nexus

@GamersNexus•2.42M subscribers
PC hardware reviews, game benchmarks, component analysis. Please subscribe for updates!
Melanie King
@realmelanieking•780K subscribers
Welcome to Melanie King's channel! Here, I delve into current events, societal issues, and cultural phenomena, offering in-depth analysis and commentary. Join me as we explore topics ranging from media controversies to social dynamics, aiming to foster informed discussions and critical thinking. Subscribe to stay updated with thought-provoking content that challenges perspectives and encourages meaningful dialogue.
Click Capital
@Click-Capital•17.1K subscribers
Stay informed about the financial markets EVERY DAY! Subscribe for our Daily Market Reviews breaking down the most important news, events, and charts you need to know across stocks, bonds, commodities, cryptos along with economic data. Published between 8-10PM EST every trading day. Hosted by an experienced investor, Jared, his daily stock market analysis video reports are designed for active swing traders and investors worldwide. Subscribe now and don't miss out! #DailyMarketReview #stockmarketanalysis #stockmarketreport #stocktrading #stockcharts #stockmarket #stockmarketnews *Financial Disclaimer: This channel does NOT give financial advice. All content should be considered educational in nature. Please do your own research and trade at your own risk.
AwakenWithJP

@AwakenWithJP•3.05M subscribers
I'm a comedian and freedom fighter. Free Speech and Fun are what I stand for.
VoskCoin

@VoskCoin•658K subscribers
VoskCoin is the best source of cryptocurrency news, reviews, and tutorials. VoskCoin reviews popular cryptocurrencies such as Bitcoin and Ethereum as well as up and coming cryptocurrencies. VoskCoin covers everything from GPU mining rig builds to the latest cryptocurrency news and everything in between such as tutorials on how to mine new coins or using new crypto sites!
JRE Clips

@JREClips•8.08M subscribers
Liberal Hivemind

@LiberalHivemind•1.57M subscribers
Former Liberal, looking to shine light on the hypocrisy that pushed me away from the left.
Stock Moe

@StockMoe•697K subscribers
The Stock Moe YouTube channel brings the best financial education to YT. I share financial & economic research, cryptocurrency & stock news, XRP updates, info about DOGE stimulus checks (DOGE refund checks) & more. I'm a former educator of high school & college level classes. I have won 2 national championships & 15 state championships as a Stock Market Game coach. I was a licensed stockbroker & financial advisor with my series 7, 63, & 65 before that. The channel which reviews these topics: Stocks, Stock Price Predictions, Cryptocurrency, Crypto, XRP, Ethereum, Inflation, Fed, Economics, Stimulus Checks, DOGE refund checks, Financial news, & More! Be sure to subscribe & throw a thumbs up my way. I also go over the Stock Moe Patreon including a Stock Moe Patreon Review about the Stock Moe Discord. The Stock Moe Discord has thousands of members who are all working toward financial freedom. Get the Stock Moe Discord by signing up for the Stock Moe Patreon or become a Channel Member.
Nagios
@nagiosvideo•14.1K subscribers
Nagios videos, tutorials, and demonstrations. For more information, visit http://www.nagios.com Nagios is a powerful IT management system that enables organizations to identify and resolve IT infrastructure problems before they affect critical business processes. With Nagios you'll never be left having to explain why an unseen infrastructure outage hurt your organization's bottom line. The Nagios® product line delivers outstanding IT server, network, device, and website monitoring, alerting, graphing, and reporting value to thousands of organizations worldwide.
More Perfect Union

@moreperfectunion•1.47M subscribers
More Perfect Union’s mission is to build power for working people. Here’s what that means: We report on the real struggles and challenges of the working class from a working-class perspective, and we attempt to connect those problems to potential solutions. We report on the abuses and wrongdoing of corporate power, and we seek to hold accountable the ultra-rich who have too much power over America’s political and economic systems. We're an independent, nonprofit newsroom. To support our work, please follow us or contribute at the links below.
Hydraulic Press Channel

@HydraulicPressChannel•10.4M subscribers
The first and original Hydraulic Press Channel! Wanna see stuff getting crushed by hydraulic press? This is the right channel for you. New video and new stuff to crush every week. Check out our new merch! Free crushed coin with certificate for all orders! CHECK OUT OUR METAL CNC DICE KICKSTARTER https://museumdice.com/
WeAreChange

@wearechange•863K subscribers
"News is what somebody somewhere wants to suppress; all the rest is advertising." - Lord Northcliffe
Solving The Money Problem

@SolvingTheMoneyProblem•288K subscribers
I make the occasional video and own a bit of $TSLA. ► Want MORE content? Join Patreon (330+ videos): https://www.patreon.com/solvingthemoneyproblem ► Want EARLY ACCESS to all of my daily videos? Subscribe on X/Twitter: https://twitter.com/stevenmarkryan ► Want EVEN MORE content? Subscribe on X/Twitter (40+ videos and counting fast): https://twitter.com/stevenmarkryan ► Want my 10 Year Tesla Fair Valuation aka "Price Targets"? Join Patreon (all supporters can access): https://www.patreon.com/posts/tesla-stock-fair-96573364 ► Want to see my complete Health Protocol? Join Patreon (Health, Energy, Sleep, Exercise, Supplements & Productivity Protocol—available to all supporters): https://www.patreon.com/solvingthemoneyproblem ► Want to see my booty pics? Too bad. BUT you can DM me on Insta: https://www.instagram.com/stevenmarkryan/ I love you all, Steven
BUILT FAST
@hotlapkyle•25.3K subscribers
I’m obsessed with 3d printing rc jets and sharing them
Paul Joseph Watson

@PrisonPlanetLive•2.03M subscribers
Culture, controversy, contrarianism. Modernity.news: https://modernity.news/ EXCLUSIVE AD-FREE CONTENT: https://pauljosephwatson.locals.com/
Jim Rohn Channel

@jimrohnchannel•120K subscribers
📣 Speaker: Jim Rohn Emanuel James Rohn (September 17, 1930 – December 5, 2009), professionally known as Jim Rohn, was an American entrepreneur, author and motivational speaker. ⬤ Jim Rohn's best sayings over the years: - We must all suffer one of two things: the pain of discipline or the pain of regret or disappointment. - Discipline is the bridge between goals and accomplishment. - Success is something you attract by the person you become. - Success is nothing more than a few simple disciplines, practiced every day; while failure is simply a few errors in judgment, repeated every day. - Learn to be happy with what you have while you pursue all that you dream. - Walk away from the 97 percent crowd. Don’t use their excuses. Take charge of your own life. ...... ◆ Our mission: The goal of the "Jim Rohn Motivation" is to teach, motivate and inspire you to become a better and more successful person in the financial areas, self-development, better self-discipline and focus.
Ricky Gutierrez

@RickyGutierrezz•1.22M subscribers
My name is Ricky, I make videos for complete beginners who want to start their trading journey in the stock market. I do not trade options, crypto, or lower cap stocks. My bread & butter is trading nasdaq etfs & blue chip stocks with good volume such as Nvidia & Tesla stock. My favorite trade setup consist of overbought / oversold reversals that are coming off of news/ short lived catalyst. I'm known for my daily live trading sessions that I host every morning right at market open. Showing all of my green & red trades, giving a beginner a real experience of what it's like to trade in the stock market. To tune in just message me! TechBud Solutions is a free investing group of +300,000 that is designed to help connect motivated entrepreneurs & investors. I'm a 30 year old day trader, real estate investor & father. I share my experience in the markets I invest in through the content I create. I hope my videos inspire you to start your own journey!
Nick Freitas

@Nickjfreitas•1.19M subscribers
Ross Cameron - Warrior Trading
@DaytradeWarrior•1.65M subscribers
Ross Cameron is best known for turning $583.15 into over $10 million day trading. His results are NOT typical. Most day traders lose money. But Ross isn't an average day trader. Here on YouTube you can learn from Ross. We hope you enjoy it! You should not watch our videos if you don't agree to our full disclaimer found here: https://www.warriortrading.com/disclaimer/. No Recommendations or Advice Provided – Contact Your Own Investment, Tax or Legal Adviser Day Trading is a high risk activity and can result in the loss of your investment. Any trade or investment is at your own risk. Warrior Trading may express or utilize testimonials or descriptions of past performance, but such items are not indicative of future results or performance, or any representation, warranty or guaranty that any result will be obtained by you. Your results may differ materially from those expressed or utilized by Warrior Trading due to a number of factors. This does not represent our full Disclaimer.
Russell Brand

@RussellBrand•6.83M subscribers
Hello You Awakening Wonder. Thanks for reading this when you could be obediently consuming propaganda. We are living through a time of incredible change and opportunity. Many of the old systems are corrupted and broken and yet a New Spirit is being born among us. For the first time new alliances are forming in the online world that could challenge these old and broken systems. Something ancient and original is Awakening within us. Here we can learn from elders and grow together in Good Faith, flawed but rising together. I'd love you to subscribe to my channel, oh and make sure to hit that notification bell otherwise you won't get told about new videos! Love, Russell X
Alex Hormozi

@AlexHormozi•3.22M subscribers
Day Job: I invest and scale companies at Acquisition.com | Co-Owner, Skool. Side Hustle: I make free content showing how we do it
LiveOverflow

@LiveOverflow•908K subscribers
just a wannabe hacker... making videos about various IT security topics and participating in hacking competitions. -=[ ❤️ Support me ]=- Patreon per Video: https://www.patreon.com/join/liveoverflow YouTube Membership per Month: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UClcE-kVhqyiHCcjYwcpfj9w/join -=[ 📄 Imprint ]=- Security Flag GmbH Mühlenstraße 8a 14167 Berlin Germany
Karlton Dennis

@karltondennis•965K subscribers
Hi everyone, and welcome to my channel! My name is Karlton Dennis, I am a licensed Enrolled Agent, based in the great state of California and I help anyone from small business owners to millionaires reduce their tax bills, legally, each year. By utilizing the tax codes that the government provides each year, I am able to reduce all of my clients tax bills, and even give some the freedom of living TAX FREE. I create informational videos for my viewers to learn about tax strategy. These videos are strictly for entertainment purposes only, and should not be construed as legal advice. Tax savings are available to anyone, with any career, but you have to educate yourself a little about the tax code so that you understand what is available to you, and if you're not reaching out to me, you need to know what you need to look for in a tax professional. Sponsorship email : KarltonDennisTeam@gmail.com Let's Save & Build Wealth Together!
NTD
@ntdtv•1.38M subscribers
----- ⭕️Sign up for our newsletter to stay informed with accurate news without spin. 👉https://www.ntd.com/newsletter.htm?utm_source=YouTube. NTD is a New York-based, global television network founded in 2001 by Chinese-Americans who fled communism. They understood that independent media are crucial to a free society. So they created NTD to bring the world uncensored and truthful information—no matter the cost. We remain free from all external influence—whether from political, financial, or special interests, and cover stories that others don’t. Our arts and lifestyle programs embody universal values, and celebrate the best of humanity’s culture and traditions. Website: NTD.com Get NTD on TV 👉 https://www.ntd.com/tv-providers.htm Support us: donorbox.org/ntdtv FB: facebook.com/NTDTelevision Twitter: twitter.com/NTDNews Truth Social: truthsocial.com/@NTD Telegram: t.me/s/NTDNews
SciShow

@SciShow•8.14M subscribers
SciShow explores the unexpected. We delve into the scientific subjects that defy our expectations and make us even more curious! For more from SciShow, check out SciShow Kids and SciShow Tangents, along with SciShow Space and Psych.
The Onion

@TheOnion•2.91M subscribers
The Onion is America's Finest News Source.
UFC

@ufc•20.2M subscribers
Ultimate Fighting Championship® is the world's leading mixed martial arts organization. Over the past decade, with the help of state athletic commissions throughout the United States, UFC® has morphed itself from a spectacle into a highly respected sports organization. Major fights between world-renowned mixed martial arts superstars have become some of the most popular sporting events of the year, surpassing pay-per-view records previously held by boxing and professional wrestling. Sports fans have made their voices heard - they want reality when they watch sports, and UFC is clearly "AS REAL AS IT GETS!" www.UFC.com
The Friday Checkout
@TheFridayCheckout•197K subscribers
Thoughtful tech news & analysis. Host: Marton Barcza Writing & research: Tristan Rayner Music & editing: Edemski Operated by Tarsier Media GmbH. Impressum: https://tarsiermedia.com
One America News Network

@oann•1.36M subscribers
One America News is a national TV news network. OAN is a credible source for national and international headlines. An independent, cutting edge platform for political discussions. Watch all of our content on our streaming platform OAN Live, on Vidgo, on GCI and on KlowdTV.
Animalogic

@animalogic•2.05M subscribers
Examining the nature of the beast. Subscribe for new episodes every Friday. Showrunner: Andres Salazar Hosts: Danielle Dufault, Tasha the Amazon, Aranya Iyer, Jess Keating, and Talia Lowi-Merri A show by Underknown. www.underknown.com
HDD Recovery Services
@hddrecoveryservices•142K subscribers
On this channel, we will be posting data recovery tricks and tips, that had been used by top data recovery companies for years. Some of them are very complex, and some are true DIY material. If you lost your data call us today at 1.613.366.4232 HDD Recovery Services 391 Bank St, Suite 201 Ottawa, ON K2P 1Y3 Canada
PsycHacks

@psychacks•809K subscribers
Presented by Orion Taraban, Psy.D. PsycHacks provides viewers with a brief, thought-provoking video several days a week on a variety of psychological topics, inspired by his clinical practice. The intention is for the core idea contained within each video to inspire viewers to see something about themselves or their world in a slightly different light. The ultimate mission of the channel is to reduce the amount of unnecessary suffering in the world.
Matthew Lesko
@MatthewLesko•307K subscribers
There's an average of $18,767 available for EVERY American in 2025. I want to help you get yours! Join Lesko Help and you'll get: 1) Personal Help To Apply to Every Gov't Grant 2) Weekly Live Video Grant Training 3) Monthly $75,000+ Exclusive Grants Given To Members 4) Live Members Help Members Workshops I've been studying grants for 48 years, sold over 4 million books and helped people of all incomes take advantage of gov't money opportunities. Now's your chance to finally get what's rightfully yours! Please take a second to subscribe to the channel so that you will never miss a live here on YouTube or when I put out a video, it will also help my videos to reach even more people that may need help!
VASAviation -

@VASAviation•635K subscribers
Hey, My name is Victor. I'm a Corporate Pilot and Certified Flight Instructor based in Spain. This channel is dedicated to upload ATC frequency conversations. Emergency situations, normal operations and funny exchanges, but also reporting news that occur in the aviation field and sharing my experiences as a pilot! Do you like aviation? This is your channel! :) Follow @VASAviation on Twitter to get all the news! Search for VASAviation on Facebook! Support VASAviation on Patreon! Email -- VASAviation1@gmail.com
Dr. Eric Berg DC

@Drberg•13.2M subscribers
Dr. Eric Berg DC, age 59, discusses the truth about getting healthy and losing weight. Dr. Berg specializes in Healthy Ketosis and Intermittent Fasting. He is the director of Dr. Berg's Nutritionals, and a best-selling amazon.com author. His book, The Healthy Keto Plan describes specific strategies on doing the healthy version of the ketogenic diet as well as intermittent fasting. He has conducted over 4800 seminars on health-related topics and trained over 2500 doctors world-wide in his methods. Dr. Berg breaks down confusing complex health topics into easy to understand, usable knowledge. For more information, go to our website at www.drberg.com or call customer service at 703-354-7336. Much of the details of Dr. Berg's program is in his exclusive membership site at: https://www.drberg.com/exclusive-membership By: Dr. Eric Berg 4501 Ford Avenue Alexandria, VA, 22302 703-354-7336
Business Insider

@BusinessInsider•9.92M subscribers
What you want to know about business. Visit our homepage for the top stories of the day: https://www.businessinsider.com Business Insider on Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/businessinsider Business Insider on Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/businessinsider Business Insider on Twitter: https://www.twitter.com/businessinsider Business Insider on Snapchat: https://www.snapchat.com/discover/Business_Insider/5319643143 Business Insider on TikTok: https://www.tiktok.com/@businessinsider If you have a permissions or licensing request, please connect with our partners at PARS International who will be able to provide you with an accurate quote for the overall usage rights that you’re interested in. A representative from PARS will contact you shortly after filling out this request form: https://www.parsintl.com/publications/insider/
Hak5

@hak5•962K subscribers
TRUST YOUR TECHNOLUST It's a simple mantra proclaimed throughout hundreds of episodes. We live it. We breathe it. We invite you to share this simple love for technology. As the longest running show on YouTube, these award winning shows serve as a platform to share our passions. Welcome! Founded in 2005, Hak5's mission is to advance the InfoSec industry. We do this through our award winning podcasts, leading pentest gear, and inclusive community – where all hackers belong. Subscribe and join us on our educational life-long journey through cyber security.
The Cyber Mentor
@TCMSecurityAcademy•859K subscribers
Bridging the cybersecurity education gap since 2018. For our full catalog of the most affordable and practical cybersecurity courses on the market, go to https://academy.tcm-sec.com/ Learn more about our hands-on certifications: https://certifications.tcm-sec.com To sponsor the channel, please visit: https://www.tcm.rocks/Sponsors
Valuetainment Short Clips
@ValuetainmentShortClips•708K subscribers
The best short clips for entrepreneurs, all gathered here in one spot from the number one channel for entrepreneurs called Valuetainment. About the Valuetainment channel: The best "How To" videos, Case Studies, Interviews, and Education for Entrepreneurs. Created by Entrepreneur Patrick Bet-David to provide value and entertainment. Valuetainment is now referred to as the best channel for entrepreneurs on YouTube. About Patrick Bet-David: During the Iranian Revolution of 1978, Patrick's family had to escape to survive and ended up living at a refugee camp in Erlangen, Germany. At 12 years old Patrick found himself collecting cans & beer bottles to raise money that could help his family and get him a Nintendo. These childhood experiences had a major impact on his perspective of freedom, hard work and entrepreneurship. Today, he is an active YouTube creator, author, and CEO of PHP Agency, Inc. a financial services company with over 5,000 agents in 49 states.
HISTORY

@HISTORY•14.4M subscribers
The HISTORY® Channel, a division of A+E Networks, is the premier destination for historical storytelling. From best-in-class documentary events, to a signature slate of industry leading nonfiction series and premium fact-based scripted programming, The HISTORY® Channel serves as the most trustworthy source of informational entertainment in media. The HISTORY® channel has been named the #1 U.S. TV network in buzz for seven consecutive years by YouGov BrandIndex, and a top favorite TV network by Beta Research Corporation. For a deeper dive, visit history.com or follow @history on Instagram, Twitter, Facebook, and TikTok. For additional press materials visit the A+E Networks Press Center at http://press.aenetworks.com.
Valuetainment

@VALUETAINMENT•6.73M subscribers
Valuetainment is a leading source of information for all. Our Mission TO ENLIGHTEN, ENTERTAIN AND EMPOWER CURRENT AND FUTURE LEADERS AROUND THE WORLD. WHO WE ARE: Valuetainment is the leading source for information, education and entertainment centered on the fundamentals of entrepreneurship and capitalism. • WHY WE EXIST: There is a need for a voice that carries the torch for entrepreneurship and capitalism, projecting a compelling, positive message. We are that voice. • WHO WE SERVE: Established and aspirational entrepreneurs, startup founders, students, intrapreneurs, and leaders within all types of organizations (public/private/non-profit). • WHAT WE PROVIDE: A slate of live and online events and a growing content library that includes: video series, digital courses, podcasts and scripted programming. This vast content offering is delivered through our website, distribution partners including YouTube and Spotify and our own OTT channel.
Global Mountain Bike Network

@gmbn•2.01M subscribers
The Global Mountain Bike Network is the best MTB YouTube channel, with videos for everyone who loves dirt: from the full-faced helmet downhill mountain biker to the lycra-clad cross country rider along with everyone and anyone in between. With the help of our pro and ex pro riding team we’re here to inform, entertain and inspire you to become a better mountain biker, including videos on: - How to ride faster with expert knowledge - Fix everything with pro know-how - Ride anything with world-cup winning skills - Dial in your bike with bike set-up advice - In-depth entertaining features - Chat, opinion and interact with us on the Dirt Shed Show
B The Trader
@BTheStory•171K subscribers
Value of subscribing: -Trading Videos Every Week! -You will get tons of trading info on setups, psychology, wins, losses, live trading, and much more. -Free Trading Knowledge, Free Interviews with Successful Traders, Free to hit that Subscribe and Like button
BBC Earth Explore

@BBCEarthExplore•1.06M subscribers
Welcome to the new BBC Earth Explore! Previously known as BBC Earth Unplugged, this channel is now your hub for thrilling travel, exploration, and extraordinary adventures. Subscribe and join us to journey through stunning landscapes, uncover hidden stories, and explore the wonders of our world. This is a commercial channel from BBC Studios.
Robert Murray-Smith

@ThinkingandTinkering•555K subscribers
Oddly enough the channel is about empowerment. It is my belief that with creativity, experimentation and a get up and go attitude anything can be achieved. Link that with the use of local resources and a reduced need for expensive tools and equipment then you have empowerment and the ability to do anything for yourself if you need to. Don't get me wrong you don't have to do everything by yourself but I think you should be able to if you want to or need to.
Britec09

@Britec09•860K subscribers
Britec Tech Tips, Tech reviews, tutorials, PC hardware and do-it-yourself computer building are my favourite things, so that's what I make videos about. - Malware Removal - PC Computer Repair, How to videos and Troubleshooting and Repair videos to help those to help them self's on how to fix computers. Hardware Review, Software Review, Computer Builds, Malware Removal, Computer Repair. "Tech Review" "Product Review" Tutorials How-to "Custom Computer Builds" "Computer Builds" "Hardware Reviews" "Malware Removal" "Ransomware Removal" "Software Review" "PC Repair" "Hardware Repair" Trouble Please Give a THUMBS UP if you like our content! It really does matter, and we really do appreciate it!
Tomley RC

@TomleyRC•246K subscribers
For all things Radio Control, from RC Cars to RC Boats to RC Custom Builds. The Radio Control Hobby should be Fun & Affordable for everyone, and on this Channel I try to showcase Radio Control products to suit all, from Cheap RC Cars to Expensive RC Cars. Official Store: https://tomleyrc.com/ For Business Enquiries: tomley@hotmail.co.uk Thanks for your support.
nwitimestv

@nwitimestv•12.2K subscribers
Latest videos from The Times Media Company.
Armchair Ambience
@ArmchairAmbience•35.4K subscribers
Armchair Ambience creates original music and original animations with an emphasis on ambient experience. https://www.patreon.com/ArmchairAmbience
BlabberBuzz
@blabberbuzz3973•26.4K subscribers
BlabberBuzz is a team of experienced writers and editors who work hard to bring you up-to-date, accurate coverage of news stories you care about that are not generally covered in the mainstream media. We offer a look at the day's issues, from politics and culture to science and technology. BlabberBuzz stands unapologetically in the public square as a beacon of freedom and refuses to go quietly into the night. Hear Ye!
TronicsFix

@Tronicsfix•1.64M subscribers
Welcome to the TronicsFix Youtube channel! We believe that repair matters. In an age where it seems like everything is becoming less repairable we're here to show you how to fix it anyway! We think that there's no reason to throw something away if it can be fixed. On our channel, we'll show you what's inside some of the latest tech (and sometimes the old stuff too!), teach you how to fix your own stuff, and also give you an idea of what it takes to make some money on the side if that's what you're into. We think that broken sucks and we're here to show that repair matters. So if you'd like to learn, fix, and/or earn we'd love to have you as a subscriber. - Check out our other channel: https://www.youtube.com/@RestorishOfficial - Learn to Solder: www.gameconsolerepairschool.com - Ask Your Repair Questions: www.tronicsfixforum.com Please Note: Our TronicsFix YouTube videos and posts contain Amazon and eBay affiliate links for which we may be compensated.
Crypto Jebb

@CryptoJebb•242K subscribers
Hey, I'm a Christian who loves Bitcoin and promotes financial sovereignty-- the idea of having absolute control over your finances.
Adam Bobrow

@AdamBobrow•1.39M subscribers
As The Voice of Table Tennis, I travel the globe watching and commentating the world's best players. While I also play tournaments around the world, my goal is to bring joy, laughter and inspiration to all and to share my passion for table tennis and life in general. I hope to be of great service and create something that will long out-live me to make a positive impact on the world. Follow me on IG, FB and Twitter: https://www.instagram.com/AdamBobrow https://www.facebook.com/AdamBobrowOfficial https://twitter.com/AdamBobrow Merchandise - https://www.AdamBobrow.com​ I'm excited to be teamed up with PINGPOD to grow and promote table tennis. #optimism #love #tabletennis #pingpong #travel
ForexLive
@Forexlive•50.7K subscribers
ForexLive.com is devoted to keeping traders informed about the world of forex trading. The ForexLive family of authors and contributors work hard daily to bring you the best news that can impact FX markets. We scour the globe daily to bring you forex technical analysis trading ideas, update analysis on central banks, reaction to economic calendar events from around the world and insightful commentary from unique thinkers. Our forex trading reporters are experts in analyzing foreign exchange markets and cut through the clutter to bring you the most important facts and information that can help you navigate the forex markets that never sleep. Read our blog updates, opinion and commentary daily for fresh new ideas on currency pair trading.
The Attractive Man

@Theattractiveman•942K subscribers
Learn how to attract women you like, how to get a date, how to get a girlfriend, how to talk to girls without being creepy, plus more deeper and natural attraction advice. This is Honest Dating Advice that's non-manipulative. We offer coaching for men and in-person as well as online mentroship too, with online dating tips and methods to increase your self confidence and self esteem to bring out the best, most attractive version of yourself. The Official YouTube Channel of The Attractive Man Team.
People Are Awesome
@peopleareawesome•5.91M subscribers
PEOPLE ARE AWESOME celebrates and ignites human creativity, talent and achievement. Because we believe, with the right inspiration, everyone is capable of remarkable things. We feature all sorts of extreme sports, activities and amazing feats including parkour, skateboarding, tricking, cliff diving, wingsuit flying, skiing, snowboarding, surfing, BMX, acrobatics, calisthenics, cheerleading, freestyle football, soccer, basketball dunks, extreme pogo, free running, cycling, kayaking, frisbee trick shots, golf, martial arts, BASE jumping and many, many more action sports! Whether you’re searching in 2024 or any other year, check out our amazing and original action sports videos to see the incredible potential displayed when ordinary people do extraordinary things! Licensing & business inquiries: contact@peopleareawesome.com Submit Your Video: http://bit.ly/21-submit-here People are Awesome is owned and operated by Jukin Media Inc.
EIGA
@EIGAtech•15K subscribers
Builds × Keybs × Things Sometimes available on Discord: .eiga
Tucker Gott

@TuckerGott•1.61M subscribers
I have fun and make paramotor videos.
Mental Outlaw

@MentalOutlaw•716K subscribers
Only cool people visit https://based.win/
Jeffry Turnmire
@JeffryTurnmireTrading•6.5K subscribers
I am just a regular dude: a husband - father - civil engineer - urban farmer - maker - trader. I've been at this trading thing with real money for 20+ years. (started paper trading over 35 years ago) I have a knack for making some epic predictions that just may very well come true. Why share it? Because I like helping other people -- it's the Eagle Scout in me.
Art of Minimal Techno Trip

@artofminimaltechno•838K subscribers
Art of Minimal Techno Trip [by TRIPPY CODE] Art of Techno, Melodic Techno & Progressive House, Minimal Techno, High Tech Minimal As a live performer and Youtube, RTTWLR & Patrick Slayer DJ sets are as dynamic and diverse. Their music mixes on YouTube gather millions of views.They do weekly music mixes and supporting their label artists on their channels. We also work with artists from around the world in electronic music, representing genres from House to Techno via Minimal Techno, Melodic Techno, High Tech Minimal, Progressive House and more.
Sky News Australia

@SkyNewsAustralia•5.4M subscribers
Real news, honest views. The best award-winning journalists with unique and exclusive insights. Fearless opinions from the big names who are passionate about the country we live in.
Humbled Trader

@HumbledTraderOfficial•1.32M subscribers
Hi! My name is Humbled Trader. Are you tired of all the Lambos, the luxury travel and partying you see in day trading ads? I am too! And I promise you won't see any of that here. This is a channel made by a day trader for day traders who are REAL. Stock market trading and investing is hard. Seeing all the fluff out there on social media creates unrealistic expectations for beginners new to day trading. Here's what you will get here: -Realistic day trading strategies -Penny stock trading strategies -How to day trade sympathies and hypes for both large caps and small cap penny stocks! -Day trading breakout and breakdown on large caps -BAD JOKES If you want to see some real, and condensed content for both beginners and experienced, SUBSCRIBE for more! :)
TITANS of CNC MACHINING

@TITANSofCNC•990K subscribers
Welcome to Titans of CNC Machining, where Titan Gilroy, a global industry leader and innovator, drives the future of manufacturing. As the world's largest CNC educational platform, we are the ultimate destination for CNC machining expertise and innovation. Our channel is dedicated to showcasing the incredible power and precision of CNC machines, pushing them to their absolute limits with stunning content that captivates and inspires. We teach CNC, CAD/CAM, milling, lathing, multi-axis machining, grinding, Swiss machining, 3D printing, engineering, and more, providing comprehensive education to enthusiasts, professionals, and learners worldwide. In over 190 countries, we bring awareness and free education, democratizing CNC training and empowering individuals to revolutionize the industry. Subscribe Now and join us on this exciting journey as we explore the cutting-edge of CNC technology, share groundbreaking projects, and inspire the next generation of machinists and engineers.
Salvaging scrap metal

@RescatandoChatarra•392K subscribers
Hello, my name is Jose Enrique and in this channel I teach how to build tools that really work almost from scratch promoting recycling and conservation of the planet. If you like my projects, subscribe and activate the bell so you don't miss any of them.
Coin Bureau

@CoinBureau•2.66M subscribers
The Coin Bureau is your go-to informational portal to the Cryptocurrency galaxy. Our mission is to facilitate the mass adoption of cryptocurrency through education, one person at a time. For business inquiries, please reach out to us on partners(at)coinbureau(dot)com. NB: We will NEVER reach out to you in unsolicited emails or texts / messages.
FPV GEEK
@fpv-geek•5.74K subscribers
I like to build FPV drones and destroy them again while freestyling
Darold Trinh
@DaroldTrinh•942 subscribers
I'm a 27-year-old investor. I've made over 7-figures investing in the stock market. Above all that, my passion is to teach and help others. I go as @trinhinvests on Instagram. The content on this channel is focused on all things investing, trading, mindset, and philosophy. Why did I choose trading and investing content? Because it was the thing that changed my life. I hope the content makes an impact on yours! Consider checking out my other free content below. Mentorship & Training: https://www.longwealthcapital.com/system My Journey: https://www.instagram.com/trinhinvests
Dividendology

@Dividendology•193K subscribers
I believe value dividend investing has proven to be one of the most effect forms of investing as it allows you to buy quality companies at great prices while receiving cash flow, without selling your position in a stock. On this channel, we focus on finding great value dividend paying companies by finding their intrinsic value, creating stock portfolio trackers, tracking my real dividend portfolio each month, and most importantly, finding ways to live off dividend income! Be sure to subscribe! Gain access to my portfolio tracking and stock valuation spreadsheets at Tickerdata.com! I am not a Financial advisor or licensed professional. Nothing I say or produce on YouTube, or anywhere else, should be considered as advice. All content is for educational purposes only. I am not responsible for any financial losses or gains. Invest and trade at your own risk.
Jeff Geerling

@JeffGeerling•895K subscribers
Father, author, developer, maker. Sometimes called "an inflammatory enigma".
Construction General

@Tran-Chien•1.23M subscribers
Mini Construction
Crypto Face

@CryptoFace•242K subscribers
SUCCESS CHASERS

@SUCCESSCHASERS•822K subscribers
My name is Amir, Im a 27 year old video editor and animator. I'm a student of philosophy & psychology and I create these videos with the hope of helping other people overcome their biggest hardships and obstacles in life through philosophy. Visit our website for more info: https://successchaserschannel.com Business Inquiries: inspiregreatness17@gmail.com Visit our Patreon to support the channel & unlock exclusive content: https://www.patreon.com/SUCCESSCHASERS © All the videos are produced and licensed by me "SUCCESS CHASERS" (I write the script, record the voiceover, and create the animations). I own the licenses to use all of the material in this video, including its thumbnail.
Hyperspace Pirate
@HyperspacePirate•278K subscribers
A variety of electronic / chemical / mechanical tinkering projects, ranging from small circuit boards to whole vehicles.
Bitcoin University

@Bitcoin_University•265K subscribers
Matthew Kratter's Bitcoin University is an educational channel devoted to Bitcoin, financial freedom, and self-sovereignty. I also cover relevant macro and financial news. Learn more at: https://www.bitcoinuniversity.com/ Follow me on Twitter: @mattkratter
Kyle Royer

@KyleRoyerKnives•534K subscribers
Being from a family of creatives whose motto was to produce not to consume was etched into Kyle from a very early age and being educated at home gave him many opportunities to work hard at his own creative pursuits. In the early years, information was hard to find, there was no online content and only a few books and videos, so it was a lot of trial and error in the knife shop. Kyle is passionate to teach makers his more than fourteen years of experience. “The mediocre teacher tells. The good teacher explains. The superior teacher demonstrates. The great teacher inspires.” We hope we can inspire you on your maker’s journey.
Trent & Allie

@TrentandAllie•482K subscribers
We're Trent and Allie (and Frank the dog), a couple of DIY'ers who spent 3 years traveling around in a van before we decided to buy some land and start building our own little home in the mountains! Come along for the ride to see how much of a struggle it can be to build your own house in some crazy conditions.
Actual Justice Warrior

@ActualJusticeWarrior•419K subscribers
I'm just a random guy talking about news, youtube stuff, SJW's and trying to have a little fun while doing it. Expect some reactions, sketches and other nonsense in the future. Follow me https://twitter.com/IamSean90
Walk off the Earth

@walkofftheearth•6.96M subscribers
Managers: Evan Winiker - ewiniker@rangemp.com Kennon Sheehy - ksheehy@rangemp.com wotemgmt@gmail.com Press Inquiries: Michael Tomczak - mtomczak@theorchard.com WOTE Official Channel!! WOTE is a band. A band that is obsessed with making killer music in all its forms. Join them on their journey! #walkofftheearth
Penguin DIY

@PenguinDIY•322K subscribers
Hello to all my friends, in this channel I show you how to build skills and use them throughout your life. Do not forget to always be creative, energetic and curious in life and think about the heights in life. Good luck
Csongor Varga
@csongorvarga•37.5K subscribers
Home automation, Node-Red, Influxdb, Grafana, Model railways, electronics, DIY and work related stuff
Nick Shawn

@NickShawnFX•186K subscribers
My Free Telegram Channel Link Is Below.
Vincent Chan

@VincentChan•822K subscribers
Hey, I'm Vincent and my goal is to help you make smarter money moves. ... But to be honest, I wasn’t always good with money. My parents immigrated to the US with just a few dollars, and watching them struggle every day to provide for me and my siblings was one of the toughest things I ever had to witness. But one day, I had a realization. … That breaking the cycle of generational poverty only takes one person. So I asked myself, "Why can't that person be me?" This realization sparked a desire within me to learn everything about money. And let me tell you: it was HARD — I had to figure everything out on my own. There were countless times I wanted to give up but I kept pushing through. Eventually, I got an Economics degree and then worked on Wall Street. But I always hated what I did at work: helping the rich get richer. So I left Wall Street and wanted to share everything I’ve learned — all the secrets of the wealthy — to help people just like you.
Throttle House

@ThrottleHouse•3.22M subscribers
Welcome to THROTTLE HOUSE. Here, you will find everything from car reviews to track tests, to epic adventures. SUBSCRIBE for weekly content!
Grand Illusions
@grandillusions•2.09M subscribers
We collect unusual novelties, collectors' items, optical illusions and science toys, and with a collection of over 25,000 (and rising!) that have been bought over the last 30 years, there is a wide variety of amazing things to share with you! We don't do dolls! Our items might have a fun or unusual mechanism, can be used to amaze or puzzle people, are a bit magical or maybe a bit scientific. Whatever the angle, they have to have something a bit 'special' about them. Nearly all the toys you see here are from Tim's Collection, and are no longer available in the shops. Many were bought 20 or even 30 years ago! However we do have a small range of items that can be bought on-line. You can visit the Grand Illusions Shop, www.grand-illusions.com Hendrik Ball www.grand-illusions.com
ElectricBikeReview.com

@ElectricBikeReview•216K subscribers
Discover new electric bikes, see hands on demos and reviews, get feedback on which ebike is best for you! With new ebikes hitting the street every day, this is the best way to get a taste for what's out there and ask questions. I review comments regularly, other subscribers also jump in and the bicycle manufacturers and business reps have been known to swing by as well ;) Whether you're new to the ebike scene, a veteran hunting for the latest and greatest or a confused lookie loo, there's always something new to see at Electric Bike Review.
The History Guy: History Deserves to Be Remembered

@TheHistoryGuyChannel•1.52M subscribers
History that deserves to be remembered. If you love history, this is the channel for you! Stories of forgotten history, all between five and fifteen minutes long. Episodes are posted Monday, Wednesday and Friday mornings. I have always loved history and believe that history does not have to be boring. At its heart, history is story telling, and I believe that it should be told with passion and genuine love for the material. History might be tragic, it might be comic, but it is the story of who we are, and we should not be afraid to enjoy that story, and be moved by it. I live in the American Midwest, talk too fast but am working on that, and tie my own bow ties. Yes, the hats in the background are mine. Topic suggestions are always welcome. Send them to Suggestions@thehistoryguy.net Fan mail is welcome at: PO Box 1473, O'Fallon, IL 62269 Join our community at https://thehistoryguyguild.locals.com/
Minority Mindset

@MinorityMindset•2.16M subscribers
What's up everybody? I am Jaspreet Singh. I'm the founder/Chief Executive Money Nerd at Briefs Media - https://www.briefs.co On YouTube, I'm the host of The Minority Mindset Show. I'm on a mission to help spread financial education. Say goodbye to boring personal finance! Check out our website: https://www.theminoritymindset.com NEW VIDEOS EVERY WEEK! Subscribe so you don't miss our newest videos.
Aircraft Adventures
@aircraftadventures-vids•40.1K subscribers
This Youtube channel is for those who tirelessly dig for the obscure, quaint or downright bizarre in the aviation world. I'm one of those guys, and this is my way to share my passion. Visit my Instagram account with over 500 aircraft posted. https://www.instagram.com/aircraftadventures
S U J A N S H E T T Y
@SUJANSHETTY•199K subscribers
▽ Connect with SUJAN SHETTY :- Instagram :- https://www.instagram.com/sujan_shetty007 Facebook :- https://www.facebook.com/sujanshetty007 Twitter :- https://twitter.com/sujanshetty007 Thank You.
Pearl

@JustPearlyThings•1.98M subscribers
Pearl is one of the fastest-growing YouTubers and cultural commentators in the world. Pearl hosts ‘The Pregame,’ a dating and relationships debate show, ‘Pearl Daily,’ a daily news and commentary show, and ‘The Sit-Down Show,’ a long-form interview podcast. Pearl has amassed more than 1,500,000 subscribers and 750,000,000 video views in under 2 years with her hard-hitting, irreverent social commentary. Pearl has collaborated with Andrew Tate, Piers Morgan, Brittany Renner, and many other of the world's most influential celebrities and commentators. To stay up to date with all of Pearl’s content, be sure to subscribe to this YouTube channel and follow Pearl on Twitter and Instagram. Everything on this channel is comedy or satire.
Doc Squiffy

@DocSquiffy•653K subscribers
BRINGING YOU GREAT SIMPLE INSTALL GUIDES, TUTORIALS AND MORE FOR FIRESTICKS, ANDROID TV AND OTHER DEVICES ! all my links - https://linktr.ee/docsquiffy Contact - info@docsquiffy.com Please contact me via email provided rather then direct messaging me through YouTube. Thank you! Were happy to talk.
Sadhguru

@sadhguru•12.4M subscribers
Official YouTube Channel of Sadhguru Considered among India’s 50 most influential people, Sadhguru is a yogi, mystic, bestselling author, and poet. Absolute clarity of perception places him in a unique space, not only in matters spiritual but in business, environmental and international affairs, and opens a new door on all that he touches. Inner Engineering  Inner Engineering is a comprehensive course for personal growth that brings about a shift in the way you perceive and experience your life, your work, and the world that you live in. https://www.innerengineering.com Save Soil Movement Launched by Sadhguru, Save Soil is the world's largest people's movement, reaching 3.91 billion people to address impending soil extinction by supporting governments to create policies for soil revitalization. https://savesoil.org/ Sadhguru app  Accelerate your spiritual journey with transformative guided meditations, daily wisdom, and Yogic tools. http://onelink.to/sadhguru__app
Electronics Repair School

@electronicsrepairschool•422K subscribers
All about electronics repair, best place to learn electronics
Numberphile

@numberphile•4.62M subscribers
Videos about numbers and mathematics. Videos by Brady Haran since 2011. Our thanks to Jane Street and our Patreon supporters.
HACKADAY
@hackaday•202K subscribers
Worldwide engineering knowledge exchange Articles and Tech News: www.hackaday.com Community: www.hackaday.io Learn: www. hackaday.io/u
Scientific American

@scientificamerican•343K subscribers
Awesome discoveries. Expert insights. Science that shapes the world. This is the official YouTube Channel of Scientific American.
8Bit Animation

@8BitAnimation•172K subscribers
Hello friends! Welcome to our 8Bit Animatoion channel! Here, we'll explore, play and share the most memorable moments from the world of Super Mario. We aim to create a fun community where everyone can share our passion for the game. Please subscribe to the channel and follow along so you don't miss any interesting videos! Thank you for your support! 🎮🕹️
Paul Robinson
@Geo-Dome•46.3K subscribers
Information about building geodesic domes
Red Bull

@redbull•22.1M subscribers
Experience the world of Red Bull like you have never seen it before, with the best action sport videos on YouTube. You can watch plenty more on http://redbull.com
Paul van Dyk

@PaulvanDyk•1.67M subscribers
A Grammy-nominated recording artist and global DJ, Paul van Dyk has dominated the electronic music charts and DJ polls for more than 30 years. He has been ranked #1 twice in DJ Magazine's Top 100 DJ poll. Paul has performed before audiences of more than one million people, including shows at the Love Parade festival in Berlin and New Year's Eve in Rio de Janeiro and is booked for festivals like Tomorrowland, Electric Daisy Carnival, Ultra Music Festival and many more. Paul has collaborated with a broad spectrum of talent from David Byrne to St. Etienne. As a re-mixer, he has worked with such artists as Madonna, Justin Timberlake, Depeche Mode, U2, and Linkin Park. In addition, Paul composed the score for EA Games' GRAND SLAM TENNIS, won the Mexican Oscar for Best Original Score for ZURDO. IMPRINT Paul van Dyk GmbH Mecklenburgische Straße 18 10713 Berlin, Germany Email: imprint@paulvandyk.com MANAGING DIRECTOR: Paul van Dyk
Explaining Android
@ExplainingAndroid•98.9K subscribers
This is where I upload all of my Android tips and tutorial videos. My entire goal here is to create a repository for as many Android tips and device tutorials as possible.
SickBiker
@cannondany•366K subscribers
Welcome to my cycling life! Mountain biking, road cycling, fitness and training - that's my passion. - Polish channel https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCj_XEf7oed3iSWHbUCWsgGw, - English channel https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC89rL0IFIXDbswkAw9ke8tA, - Our cycling forum https://forum.sickbiker.com/, - Polish website https://szajbajk.pl/, - English website http://sickbiker.com/, - Instagram https://www.instagram.com/szajbajk/ Business inquiries : szajbajk (at) gmail.com
ManlyBadassHero

@ManlyBadassHero•2.28M subscribers
A channel of my Manly playthroughs , stream clips or random things. Read description below for personal & business information. Full channel title is ManlyBadassHeroofJusticeWeeaboo "Do you like my sunglasses?" For business inquires contact my Twitter, if I'm interested and after vetting I will follow up from there by email if needed. For inquiries about my videos, I do not allow any use of my videos that remove the commentary, sound or for profit reasons. Small best of manly highlights, clips, soundbites are okay, please link & credit. Watching parts of my videos on a stream okay. For anything else contact me first. There is a Manly Discord available to Patreon Backers & Twitch Subs.
What's Up NxT
@NxTLvLTech•37.4K subscribers
Welcome to What's Up NxT, your new go-to destination for lifestyle content! Formerly known as NxTLvLtech, we're leveling up and expanding our horizons beyond tech news and reviews. Join us as we explore the great outdoors, share our passions, and showcase the latest gear and trends. On this channel, you can expect: Vlogs: Join us on our adventures, from camping trips to van life escapades BBQing & Outdoor Cooking: Savor the flavor with our portable power cooking tutorials Camping & Van Life: Explore the best spots, gear, and tips for living life on the move Reviews: Honest feedback on the latest lifestyle products, from outdoor gear to tech essentials Subscribe to What's Up NxT for a fresh take on lifestyle content, and let's explore the next level together!"
Last Best Tool
@lastbesttool•78K subscribers
Last Best Tool is a DIY-take on the high quality tool use. Prefering quality hand tools for all jobs, big, small, amateur, professional. Good tools make work more fun, safer, and with better return on investment. Contact me at: lastbesttool@gmail.com
John Anderson Media

@JohnAndersonMedia•714K subscribers
John Anderson served as Deputy Prime Minister of Australia for 6 years between 1999 and 2005 under John Howard. We hope you enjoy this Conversations series where John is joined by some of the world's foremost thought leaders to examine in detail the social, cultural and political landscape we live in today. Proper robust dialogue is necessary if we are to continue to be a successful society. As John says: "You cannot get good public policy out of a bad public debate." Stay right up to date with all the conversations by subscribing to the newsletter here: https://johnanderson.net.au/contact/ Follow John on Twitter: https://twitter.com/JohnAndersonAC Follow John on Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/johnandersonac/ Support the channel: https://johnanderson.net.au/support/ Website: https://johnanderson.net.au/ Podcast: https://johnanderson.net.au/podcasts/
UAVfutures
@UAVfutures•209K subscribers
UAVfutures aims to bring people into the wonderful world of fpv and multicopters. Ranging from build and race videos, reviews and updates and some general goofin around. If you love things FPV related you are going to love this channel. Happy Flying Stew
The Veritas Project
@TheVeritasProject•99.6K subscribers
Veritas strives to provide an intellectual platform for the exchange of ideas, theories, and concepts in the fields of alternative science, conspiracies, government cover-ups, ancient civilizations and mysteries, to UFOs and extraterrestrial life, to alternative health and personal development, to spiritual and metaphysical, and paranormal phenomena. Our goal is to inspire critical thinking and provide evidence-based insight into the mysteries of our world. We seek to spread knowledge, understanding, and enlightenment in order to make our world a better place. We are dedicated to the exploration of truth and reality.
Voice of America

@VOANews•3.67M subscribers
Voice of America (VOA) is the largest U.S. international broadcaster, providing news and information in more than 40 languages to an estimated weekly audience of 236.8 million people. VOA produces content for digital, television, and radio platforms. It is easily accessed via your mobile phone and on social media. It is also distributed by satellite, cable, FM and MW, and is carried on a network of approximately 3,000 affiliate stations. Since its creation in 1942, Voice of America has been committed to providing comprehensive coverage of the news and telling audiences the truth. Through World War II, the Cold War, the fight against global terrorism, and the struggle for freedom around the globe today, VOA exemplifies the principles of a free press.
WorldofAI
@intheworldofai•117K subscribers
World of Ai is here to push the creative use of Artificial Intelligence (AI) applications for simple day-to-day tasks! Here at WOA, you will find tips, tricks, and guides using AI applications to help you out in your day-to-day life. Going to strive to make your life easier! I will show you how and what you need to do to help your life out! I will strive to show you the wonders of AI and if that interests you, then make sure you subscribe to the channel now!
Dave's Garage

@DavesGarage•961K subscribers
Windows History, Windows vs Linux Comparisons, Arduino Project Tutorials, Shop Projects, ESP32 Information and more in Dave's Garage. With DIY info and practical step by step tutorials. Uses visuals such as the ChipCam to make complex topics easy to understand. From hobbyist to engineer, everyone is welcome!
Candace Owens

@RealCandaceO•4.05M subscribers
The Candace podcast is back!
MrMobile [Michael Fisher]

@TheMrMobile•1.26M subscribers
Mobile technology videos for the discerning gadget enthusiast, brought to you by Michael Fisher. My name is Michael Fisher. I’m a writer, sailor, podcaster and recovering actor whose childhood obsession with science fiction never quite faded. A quarter-century later, the technology that I coveted as a kid – from folding-screen phones to wearable tech – is woven into the fabric of everyday life. I’ve spent the past decade reviewing this technology, and now I’ve teamed up with Future PLC to take those reviews to the next level. Welcome to MrMobile!
Cracked

@cracked•2.68M subscribers
Youtube's only comedy channel, since 1958. SHOWS: Honest Ads: What if all those slick commercials were, you know, actually honest? CineMistakes: Stephen Spielburn puts your favorite movies on the Skewer Stick and totally roasts them Canonball: A deep dive on the stories and characters you thought you knew MOVIES FOR $20: What if massive Hollywood tentpole films and prestige television shows only had a budget of $20? They’d probably look something like this.
Honest Ads

@Honest_Ads•251K subscribers
Hi, I'm Roger. Keeping you honest since 2012.
Mark J Kohler

@MarkJKohler•545K subscribers
Mark J. Kohler, M.Pr.A., C.P.A., J.D., is a best-selling author; national speaker; radio show host; writer and video personality for Entrepreneur.com; real estate investor; senior partner in the law firm, Kyler, Kohler, Ostermiller & Sorensen, and the accounting firm of Kohler & Eyre, CPAs. Mark is a personal and small business tax and legal expert, who helps clients build and protect wealth through wealth management strategies, and business and tax remedies often overlooked in this challenging, ever-changing economic climate. His seminars have helped tens of thousands of individuals and small business owners navigate the maze of legal, regulatory and financial laws to greater success and wealth. Find me at my page: https://markjkohler.com/ Follow me on my social media with DAILY and WEEKLY Tips and Blog Articles at: https://www.markjkohler.com/blog Check out my Law Firm KKOS: https://www.kkoslawyers.com
Edison Motors
@EdisonMotors•490K subscribers
Edison Motors, Canada's leading Heavy-Duty Electric Truck Manufacturer! - Watch us revolutionize the world of trucking. - Behind-the-scenes look at our journey to becoming the Worlds Best, Worst EV Company. - Combating Planned Obsolescence while Supporting Right to Repair Stealing Tesla's Ideas........ By Truckers, For Truckers
Talking With Maritza
@TalkingWithMaritza•20.5K subscribers
Aero-News Network
@aerotvnetwork•59K subscribers
Your Daily Aviation, Aerospace, and Drone News Resource!
CryptoCake
@CryptoCake•1.71M subscribers
CryptoCake™ is developing the first American full streaming 24-hour news and opinion channel devoted to cryptocurrency, blockchain and FinTech. CryptoCake is the largest YouTube channel committed to this emerging sector of business and commerce.
EEVblog

@EEVblog•963K subscribers
NO SCRIPT, NO FEAR, ALL OPINION An off-the-cuff Video Blog about Electronics Engineering, for engineers, hobbyists, enthusiasts, hackers and Makers Hosted by Dave Jones from Sydney Australia DONATIONS: Bitcoin: 3KqyH1U3qrMPnkLufM2oHDU7YB4zVZeFyZ Ethereum: 0x99ccc4d2654ba40744a1f678d9868ecb15e91206 PayPal: david@alternatezone.com Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/eevblog EEVblog2: http://www.youtube.com/EEVblog2 EEVdiscover: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCkGvUEt8iQLmq3aJIMjT2qQ EMAIL: Advertising/Commercial: eevblog+business@gmail.com Fan mail: eevblog+fan@gmail.com Hate Mail: eevblog+hate@gmail.com I DON'T DO PAID VIDEO SPONSORSHIPS, DON'T ASK! PLEASE: Do NOT ask for personal advice on something, post it in the EEVblog forum. I read ALL email, but please don't be offended if I don't have time to reply, I get a LOT of email. Mailbag PO Box 7949 Baulkham Hills NSW 2153 AUSTRALIA
60 Minutes Australia

@60MinutesAU•6.08M subscribers
60 Minutes Australia was first broadcast in February 1979. Founding reporters Ray Martin, George Negus and Ian Leslie quickly established the show as the destination for the finest television journalism. Today, 45 years later, 60 Minutes remains Australia's leading current affairs program. Award winning correspondents Tara Brown, Amelia Adams, Adam Hegarty, Dimity Clancey and Nick McKenzie investigate, analyse and uncover the issues affecting all Australians.
Go Wild

@GoWild_EN•671K subscribers
Feed your curiosity and Go Wild with the best collection of wildlife and nature films. Watch on Plex: https://watch.plex.tv/live-tv/channel/go-wild All titles on this channel are fully under license. We do not authorise any use of footage or the program in its entirety without the explicit permission from the individual copyright owner(s).
X, The Moonshot Factory
@XTheMoonshotFactory•41.9K subscribers
Born at Google, we got our start creating the self-driving car. Since then, we’ve continued to bring sci-fi ideas into reality to help solve some of the world’s hardest problems. Subscribe to our channel to learn about our people and projects.
Motivation2Study

@Motivation2Study•4.56M subscribers
Our mission is to inspire, educate and help students of all ages with both lack of motivation and mental health awareness. We work with motivational speakers to create life changing motivational videos to help us achieve this goal. Subscribe for a new Motivational Video on Success, Study Tips, and/or Mental Health every Sunday!
WhatGear

@WhatGear•360K subscribers
WhatGear is a UK Tech Review Channel, hosted by Troy. This channel is dedicated to delivering tech reviews & tips & tricks & helping you make the right purchase decisions. Here you will find tech reviews on the latest Smartphones, Headphones, TV's and tons of other Tech. Subscribe for new content weekly! If you'd like to send products/items/fan mail please use the following address. ►SPONSORSHIP DEALS: Bookings@WhatGearReviews.com ►SEND STUFF TO: 4 Turnpike Court, High Street, Waltham Cross, Hertfordshire, England, EN8 7AA ►For business inquiries ONLY please use the email : Bookings@WhatGearReviews.com ►Official WhatGear Website : https://whatgear.net If you're in China, here is my BiliBili channel with Chinese subs : https://space.bilibili.com/1290423605
Tiny House Giant Journey

@TinyHouseGiantJourney•1.8M subscribers
Hi, I'm Jenna. I built and lived in a Tiny House to free up my finances so that I can travel the world! On this YouTube channel, I share tours of alternative, unique, and tiny homes! My story has been featured on HGTV, Travel Channel, the Huffington Post, USA Today, and many more! New video every Friday & sometimes on Tuesdays! For more information, or to request be featured, go to my website: www.tinyhousegiantjourney.com
Ladi & Margaret

@ladiandmargaret•307K subscribers
We're Ladi & Margaret, and we love eBikes, cats, and vanlife ❤️ 2020 - 2023 Projects: ✅ - eBike Business ✅ - Workshop & Garage Renovation ✅ - Ultimate Campervan Build ✅ - Barn Renovation ✅ - Cabin in the Woods ⚠️ - Container Home (almost done!) For eBike inquiries: Ladi@MySuperEbike.com
David Casler Ask Dave
@davecasler•133K subscribers
This channel is about ham radio!
Viktoriya Media
@ViktoriyaMedia•101K subscribers
The purpose of this channel is to introduce you to investments that you may or may not have heard of, whether that's ETFs, bonds, etc. I walk through the fund strategies, pros and cons, and show & compare fund performance. I also share market updates, tax strategies, investing & trading strategies and much more- subscribe and learn! ( Note: I do NOT invest in every fund that I talk about- my investment goals will be different from yours. ) Disclaimer: The information provided on this channel is for educational and informational purposes only and should not be construed as financial or investment advice. I am not a licensed financial advisor and the information presented in these videos should not be relied upon as investment advice. You should always do your own research. Investing involves risk, including the risk of losing money. Past performance is not indicative of future results. PR & Partnership Inquiries: azmkproductions@gmail.com
NathanBuildsDIY
@nathanbuildsdiy•8.06K subscribers
Unique Useful DIY builds, lots of automation
Flow Hive

@FlowHive•332K subscribers
Passionate about beekeeping, bees and native pollinators, design and innovation. Bees are such fascinating little creatures and they play such a key role in our lives. Website https://go.honeyflow.com​ Join email https://honeyflow.com/join​ Facebook https://facebook.com/flowhive​ Instagram https://www.instagram.com/flowhive
ShortCircuit

@ShortCircuit•2.4M subscribers
What's in the box? Let's find out! Official channel under Linus Media Group. Sponsorship Inquiries: sales@linusmediagroup.com
PBS Space Time

@pbsspacetime•3.27M subscribers
Space Time explores the outer reaches of space, the craziness of astrophysics, the possibilities of sci-fi, and anything else you can think of beyond Planet Earth with our astrophysicist host: Matthew O’Dowd. For all business inquiries and sponsorship opportunities please reach out to: pbsspacetime@lighthouseagents.com Matt O'Dowd spends his time studying the universe, especially really far-away things like quasars, super-massive black holes, and evolving galaxies. He uses telescopes in space to do it. Matt completed his Ph.D. at NASA's Space Telescope Science Institute, followed by work at the University of Melbourne and Columbia University. He's now a professor at the City University of New York's Lehman College and an Associate at the American Museum of Natural History's Hayden Planetarium. Previous host Gabe Perez-Giz is an astrophysicist who studies black hole physics. He received his Ph.D. from Columbia University and also hosted PBS Infinite Series.
Garage 54
@Garage54ENG•931K subscribers
For business inquiries: promotion@garage54.ru
TechDoctorUK

@TechDoctorUK•462K subscribers
Hi all, a warm welcome to my channel. Here you will find MEDIA STREAMING, TECH TUTORIALS, PRODUCT, DEVICE & APP REVIEWS. Join my cord-cutting chat group to get the best apps, tips & tricks and support for your streaming / tech questions - click here https://www.techdoctoruk.com/tdukmem ✅Business enquires - tdoctoruk@gmail.com
Christoph Bartneck
@christophbartneck•7.73K subscribers
This channel collects the videos of Christoph Bartneck. Check http://www.bartneck.de for more information.
The Modern Rogue

@ModernRogue•1.72M subscribers
Brian Brushwood and friends field test the things that will make you the most interesting person in the room.
Breaking Points

@breakingpoints•1.41M subscribers
Breaking Points with Krystal and Saagar is a fearless anti-establishment Youtube show and podcast.
Know Your Meme

@KnowYourMeme•460K subscribers
Know Your Meme is an online encyclopedia and knowledge community dedicated to researching, documenting and explaining the origins, history and evolution of memes and online culture at large.
Cornell Lab Bird Cams

@CornellBirdCams•313K subscribers
Electric Bike Report
@ElectricBikeReport•90.1K subscribers
Welcome to Electric Bike Report's channel for electric bike reviews, comparisons, and best lists! Looking for the best affordable e-bike? Do you need something compact? Folding? Multi-rider? We review all of those and more to help you find the right e-bike for you! We go beyond just reviews though, we also provide tips to help you maintain your bike, handle minor fixes and repairs, and offer riding tips for newbies or experienced cyclists alike. We also work to bring you the latest stories in the e-bike world. From industry insights, to interviews with e-bike leaders and more, Electric Bike Report is your go to source for info on all things e-bike.
Freethink

@freethink•1.29M subscribers
Exploring the collision of technology, business and society. Curious / Thoughtful / Open / Constructive. Changing media with @bigthink.
growingannanas

@growingannanas•7.26M subscribers
Get strong, fit & confident with my at home workouts. Welcome to my channel! I used to be a certified CrossFit coach and now I inspire and motivate people all over the world on my Social Media Channels. What you'll find here : Full Length Workout Videos, HIIT and Strength Workouts, oh and lots of good, positive vibes ;) Make sure you subscribe + turn notifications on so you never miss a strong workout with me and my Team Grow. See you on the mat! Anna xx
The Royal Institution

@TheRoyalInstitution•1.63M subscribers
Explosive short films, full length talks from the world’s leading scientists and writers, and videos to challenge the way you look at the world. The Royal Institution is a 200 year old independent charity creating opportunities for the public and scientists to explore science together, through events, education, and the CHRISTMAS LECTURES. Consider becoming a YouTube Member: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCYeF244yNGuFefuFKqxIAXw/join Or support us by donating: https://www.rigb.org/join-and-support/donate-ri We're part of the Amazon Associates programme, if you click on geni.us links in our video descriptions we may earn a commission on purchases. This doesn't cost you anything and the proceeds go towards our charitable work. The Royal Institution of Great Britain is a registered charity, number: 227938.
Gad Saad

@GadSaad•337K subscribers
The truth can hurt. The truth can set you free. But you can't hide from THE SAAD TRUTH. Why are men the majority of Ferrari owners? Why do women prefer tall men? What is evolutionary psychology? How does one apply biology in understanding consumer behaviour? What is the current state of intellectual diversity on university campuses? Are all religions equally violent/peaceful? What is at the root of political correctness and the thought police? These issues and countless others are addressed in my YouTube channel. My goal is to engage folks in a fun and informative manner. Please subscribe and spread the word. Cheers. Dr. Gad Saad is a professor, evolutionary behavioral scientist, author, and public intellectual.
MinuteEarth

@MinuteEarth•3.1M subscribers
Science and stories about our awesome planet! Our staff: Lizah van der Aart, Sarah Berman, Cameron Duke, Arcadi Garcia, David Goldenberg, Melissa Hayes, Alex Reich, Henry Reich, Peter Reich, Ever Salazar, Leonardo Souza, Kate Yoshida and Jasper Palfree. MinuteEarth is produced by Neptune Studios LLC
Linus Tech Tips

@LinusTechTips•16.2M subscribers
Linus Tech Tips is a passionate team of "professionally curious" experts in consumer technology and video production who aim to educate and entertain. Sponsorship Inquiries: sales@linusmediagroup.com
Jarrod Tocci

@JarrodTocci•297K subscribers
Hi, I'm Jarrod. I'm passionate about Alternative Living, Building, and Travel - Year from Now You'll Wish You Started Toady - How I try and live life and why I try new things all the time. How I got here: Architectural Engineering degree then went into the corporate world. Few years of that I wanted to get into acting so moved to Los Angeles. Acting got me into improv and stand up comedy, which I absolutely loved. In 2016 I decided to build a van into a tiny home on wheels thinking I could live in LA while pursuing acting and stand up comedy. Lived in first van for 2 years and vlogged my journey, but also shared other peoples lives in the vanlife/travel community. Decided to step away from acting and comedy in 2019 to build a 2nd van and focus more on my YouTube channel to inspire others to do whatever they are passionate about. Since then I've built 2 other vans, a tiny home, and with hopes to keep building and designing many more small spaces...comedy might come back too!
God's Nation
@GodsNation•95.6K subscribers
Welcome to God's Nation, A Christian music promotion channel that is passionate about supporting Christian musicians on various platforms. Our goal is to bring the love of Jesus to the world! We want to show you that Christian music is awesome! I look forward to meeting you in the comments! ~ Matthew
David Charrier - Master The Handpan
@MasterTheHandpan•77.4K subscribers
Music and videos of hang and handpan playing + tutorials and lessons for beginners, intermediate and advanced players. Joueur de hang et handpan français + tutoriels et leçons pour débutant, intermédiaire et avancé. ► I Teach : https://www.masterthehandpan.com ► I Blog : https://wwwmasterthehandpan.com/blog ► I Play : https://handpandavid.com
Victor Poulin
@VictorPoulin•114K subscribers
Everything and anything knowledgeable. Channel is mostly built around my boomerang videos plus how to build and throw boomerangs correctly for best results. Anything from throwing, catching, trick shots, awesome designs and artwork. All our boomerangs are hand made from the finest 10 ply birch wood that last for a very long time. Subscribe to win a FREE boomerang once every month. Be sure to click through the link below to check out my website:
Python Simplified
@PythonSimplified•253K subscribers
Hi everyone! My name is Mariya and I'm a software developer from Vancouver, British Columbia. I film simple programming tutorials about Computer Science Concepts, GUI Applications, Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence, Automation and Web Scraping, Data Science and even Math! 🤓 I'm here to help you with your programming journey (in particular - your Python programming journey 😉) and show you how many beautiful and powerful things we can do with code! 💪💪💪
Amplex
@amplex1566•322K subscribers
Amplex is your Source for Reporting all Unsolved Mysteries, Universe Secrets, Hidden History, and the Truth we all seek! ➨If you have any idea's for video's or footage you would like to share, Feel Free to E-mail at Amplexlive@gmail.com FAIR USE STATEMENT - Some videos may contain copyrighted material, the use of which has not been specifically authorized by the copyright owners. Some of the material is being made available within transformative or derivative work for the purpose of education, commentary and criticism. If you feel have any concerns regarding the material used, please feel free to contact me at Amplexlive@gmail.com
Geography By Geoff

@GeographyByGeoff•690K subscribers
A geography channel with a specific focus on population geography. New mainline YouTube episodes premiere every Tuesday at 2:00pm PT. New 60 Second Cities episodes premiere every Thursday at 11:00am PT. Find me: https://linktr.ee/geoffgibson
Lise Leblanc

@LiseLeblanc•214K subscribers
I'm Lise Leblanc, therapist, author, and life coach. My aim is to help men identify and avoid narcissistic women and recover from narcissistic relationships. On this channel, I will give you honest, relatable insights, tips, strategies, and real-life examples to help you understand what you've been going through and to help you recover your self-confidence, self-worth, and sense of self after a toxic relationship. I post videos on Mondays so make sure to subscribe and turn your on notifications :) DISCLAIMER: THIS IS FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED AS PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR AS A SUBSTITUTE FOR MENTAL HEALTH CARE. For information about working with me privately, please visit my website: www.liseleblanc.ca
Shakira

@Shakira•47.8M subscribers
#LMYNLWorldTour
Brien Foerster
@brienfoerster•408K subscribers
Ancient Lost Worlds and Hidden History. On location videos made by author and adventurer Brien Foerster exploring Peru, Bolivia, Egypt, Hawaii, Easter Island and other exotic places. With special emphasis on evidence that advanced technology and human history are at least 10,000 years old. Business: Kieron@talentsycreators.com"
Highland Griffith Chamber of Commerce
@highlandgriffithchamber1300•25 subscribers
The Highland Griffith Chamber of Commerce is a business membership organization that wants to promote local business owners by serving, representing, and enhancing local businesses in our community. Joining the Chamber offers many advantages such as networking at Membership meetings and Chamber-sponsored events. Our members also have Professional Development opportunities through our Education Series, Women In Business, and NextGen Leaders programs. The Highland Griffith Chamber is an advocate for small businesses, offering resources for helping your business grow, whether an existing or start-up business. Members also have access to monthly town and school reports and your events will be promoted through weekly email blasts and coverage on the Chamber's numerous social media platforms. We will refer your business to people in the community, other businesses, and anyone who calls the Chamber. To find out more, or to join our Chamber, go to our website at www.hgchamber.org.
Kurzgesagt – In a Nutshell

@kurzgesagt•23.7M subscribers
Animation videos explaining things with optimistic nihilism since 12,013. We’re a team of illustrators, animators, number crunchers and one dog who aim to spark curiosity about science and the world we live in. To us nothing is boring if you tell a good story. For updates on our videos and other news from the kurzgesagt universe follow us on Twitter, Facebook, Instagram and LinkedIn.
TED-Ed

@TEDEd•21.2M subscribers
TED-Ed’s mission is to create lessons worth sharing. Feed and expand your curiosity with our award-winning animated shorts - published on YouTube and available with supplemental learning materials on ed.ted.com. Want to suggest an idea for a TED-Ed animation, nominate an educator or animator? Visit our website at: http://ed.ted.com/get_involved. Consider backing us on Patreon. By doing so, you directly support our nonprofit mission to create free, high-quality educational content: https://www.patreon.com/teded For more information on using TED-Ed content for commercial purposes (e.g. employee learning, in a film, or in an online course), please submit a Media Request using this link: https://media-requests.ted.com/
Entrepreneurs in Cars

@EntrepreneursInCars•737K subscribers
Richard Cooper, is a social commentator, best selling author, podcaster, car guy, investor, HNW coach & entrepreneur. Rich is an accomplished self-improvement advocate, that has inspired millions to reach their full potential through his groundbreaking strategies, and experiences. He's the 'do the work' guy that unplugs you from comforting lies, with clear, concise, cold, hard and uncomfortable truths that solve problems. Make sure to subscribe for helpful videos to help you get better results out of life, with money, relationships and a bit of comedy. EMAIL BUSINESS INQUIRES BELOW FOR - Interview/podcast/speaking requests only If you have a question/problem/opinion, call in on a live " The Unplugged Alpha" podcast episode (https://www.youtube.com/@TheUnpluggedAlpha) on Wednesday starting at noon EST, it's free, and open to everyone. If you need my help/advice in a private & confidential manner, book a paid coaching call, links are below.
Well Done Tips
@welldonetips•827K subscribers
Subscribe, like & share clicks - are the best reward and fuel for new content! Subscribe! Subscribe here: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCJF8RIGIyirxgDnHgQfKcLg?sub_confirmation=1 Well Done Tips - It's all about how things should be done! If you're doing it - do it right! I might not be an expert in what I do, but I always give my best to achieve top-notch results. I love creating and spending time on projects. Through my videos, I want to inspire you to pick up some tools and start making things yourself. Connect with me on soc media too: You can find me on Instagram & Facebook.
Sean Dekmar
@dekmartrades•73.5K subscribers
10+ years as a full time day trader and entrepreneur! All of my content is to designed to help you reach your financial goals and to have a better future through investing.
freeCodeCamp.org

@freecodecamp•10.6M subscribers
Learn to code for free.
Ham Radio Crash Course

@HamRadioCrashCourse•382K subscribers
My name is Josh, I'm a dad living in Southern California with my wife and two sons. I'm an engineer and radio amateur. I've created the Ham Radio Crash Course to get people involved in radio and keep learning! P.O Box 5101 Cerritos, Ca. 90703-5101
Hacksmith Industries

@hacksmith•15.3M subscribers
We take fictional ideas from movies, video games & comics, and make real working prototypes! I quit my full-time job as an engineer and product developer to make only the coolest inventions -- just for you guys -- right here on YouTube. We show the engineering process of making our projects to inspire others into STEAM fields, and to show that anything is possible with science! Please send media/sponsor inquiries through: https://www.hacksmith.com/partner For our FAQ please visit: https://www.hacksmith.com/about #AvantLink
Cycling Weekly

@cyclingweekly•290K subscribers
Cycling Weekly is the UK's best selling cycling magazine and delivers daily cycling news and cycle equipment reviews.
Magnetic Games

@MagneticGamesIT•6.47M subscribers
All ways to have fun with magnets. The magnetism has always intrigued me. The strength of the magnets is scientifically explainable but there's something "magical" about its interaction with the world. My Channel offers you curious experiments and fun games to do with magnets. Il magnetismo mi ha sempre affascinato. La forza dei magneti è spiegabile scientificamente ma ha qualcosa di "magico" nella sua interazione con il mondo. Il mio canale vi propone curiosi esperimenti e giochi divertenti da fare con i magneti.
John Hammond

@_JohnHammond•1.97M subscribers
Free Cybersecurity Education and Ethical Hacking.
Photonics Media
@PhotonicsMedia•2.67K subscribers
Photonics Media publishes business-to-business magazines, buyers’ guides, and websites for individuals working with light-based technologies in the photonics industry. A pioneering publisher in the relatively new discipline of photonics, Photonics Media has built a large global audience comprising academics and researchers, manufacturers, and end-users. The Photonics Media YouTube channel features video coverage of news, products, and events in the photonics industry.
Soheil PKO
@SoheilPKO•157K subscribers
Welcome To My YouTube Channel This channel is dedicated to providing useful information and education about trading and investing, and comprehensive tutorials and guides to tools and platforms. ————————————— DISCLAIMER Please be advised that I am not a licensed or registered financial advisor, and the information and contents provided on this channel have been prepared for entertainment and informational purposes only, and they are not intended to be relied upon as investment, financial, accounting, tax, legal, regulatory or similar advice, and they are not an endorsement of any provider, product or service. Trading and investing in financial markets poses considerable risk of loss, so please make sure to do your own research or consult a certified financial or investment advisor. ——————————————
KPeyanski
@KPeyanski•30.6K subscribers
I make videos that help people do awesome things with Home Assistant. Are you ready to build a Smart Home you love with ease while having fun? Each week I reveal my best tips, tools, devices, and strategies that helped me build mine. Teaching you how to make home automations using Home Assistant this channel breaks it all down with a new episode each and every week and daily Shorts! Just getting started? Watch my free webinar and learn what are the official ways to start Home Assistant and their Pros & Cons as well a super fast way to get started on a PC in under 5 minutes ►► https://automatelike.pro/webinar
The Diary Of A CEO

@TheDiaryOfACEO•9.75M subscribers
Subscribe to be invited to our next subscriber party!
inakakoubouKANAI
@inakakoubouKANAI•4.54K subscribers
垂直尾翼の無い鳥型グライダーの設計・製作・飛行に取り組んでいます。鳥が進化して垂直尾翼が無いのは、垂直尾翼が無いことのメリットがあるのだろうと考えています。普通の飛行機の垂直尾翼を無くすと、ちょっと飛んでも安定した旋回ができずに墜落してしまいます。垂直尾翼を使わず安定した効率良い旋回をすることが課題です。 I am developing the airplane which does not have a vertical tail like a bird as a hobby. HP https://microworlds.jp/logo1/bird/index.html mail inakani@jcom.home.ne.jp
NorthridgeFix

@NorthridgeFix•448K subscribers
Need help with your device repair? We service customers and repair shops nationwide. Use the mail-in form on our website to mail in your device. http://northridgefix.com/mail-in/ Microsoldering and repair tools - All items in stock and ship out same day. https://northridgefix.com/shop/ Advertising and Product Reviews https://northridgefix.com/advertise/ NorthridgeFix 19365 Business Center Drive, Unit 7 Northridge, CA 91324 Phone: 818-668-7058 http://NorthridgeFix.com
3D Printer Academy

@3DPrinterAcademy•492K subscribers
Your place for all things 3D printing. Website: https://3dprinteracademy.com 3D Printer Academy Mission: "A 3d printer in every home, school, and business" 3D Printing for Everyone: #1 New Release on Amazon.com: https://amzn.to/3GxChTg Unique High Quality STLs: https://3dprinteracademy.com/collections/premium-downloads Learn: https://3dprinteracademy.com/blogs/3d-printing-basics Online Courses: https://3dprinteracademy.com/collections/comprehensive Patreon: www.patreon.com/3dprinteracademy -Steven @3DPrinterAcademy
Forte Capital Management
@LilForteRush•8.22K subscribers
7+ years of experience trading stocks fulltime stock speculator @OhioState Alumni - Studied Japanese Yōkai/History Goal: $200 Million dollars https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCs7WuDyIL-I4kcZX6yQMn0g?sub_confirmation=1
Better Bachelor
@BetterBachelor•474K subscribers
Better Bachelor is a channel for open minded men (and women if so inclined) to talk about current events, news, opinions, humor and ways to better yourself and find happiness and understanding in today's society. This is an open forum where comments, talking points, concerns and discussion about topics are encouraged. Most content is focused towards single men's issues but may be applicable to others. I focus on viewing many issues from multiple or under represented angles.
Dennis Brooks
@redblackvette•3.8K subscribers
Just love flying with Gods blessings!!!!
AvE
@arduinoversusevil2025•1.44M subscribers
Err and err and err again but less and less and less. -Piet Hein
THELIFEOFPRICE

@THELIFEOFPRICE•522K subscribers
My name is Johnathan Price or better known as "JP". I am the owner of "JPS TAHOE" WHICH has had several different versions over the years with the latest one being HOE 4.NEOV2" I Am also the owner of Down4sound aka down4soundshop.com and also Certified basshead brand aka certifiedbasshead.com On this channel you can find a ton of car audio / car show videos that I attend all throughout the year ever year! You will also see various other videos from skydiving to rock bouncing to traveling the world. Thank you for watching and please remember to like, share and subscribe =D
Charlie Chang

@CharlieChang•1.29M subscribers
My name is Charlie -- I am a 31-year-old entrepreneur based in Southern California. I run multiple businesses ranging from media channels, to affiliate marketing, to a recruiting agency. In the past, I've done modeling, photography, tutoring, and pretty much every side hustle under the sun. I make videos about personal finance, earning money online, investing, productivity, real estate, and entrepreneurship. I am a huge proponent of self-employment and building up multiple streams of income. If this interests you, please subscribe to my channel to learn more! 1455364
HVACmillionaire
@hvacmillionaire•13.9K subscribers
Are you feeling like you are: Spinning your wheels? Not getting any traction? Stuck in the truck? Hiring the wrong people? Wearing too many hats in your HVAC business? I am here to tell you that you are not alone! I was there too and I know exactly how you are feeling. Come join me as I share how I went from where you are at to where I am now. I will show you how you can do it too! I will show you how to work smarter not harder. Struggles & Victories 27+ years in HVAC Industry Own my own Business 14 years + From $0 starting to 7 figure Successful exit. You don't need to struggle, allow me to help you not only to survive but to run a highly successful business. Check below for more helpful information
Collective Evolution

@Collective-evolution•100K subscribers
Collective Evolution creates content and projects to explore how we can re-imagine our existing way of life and begin transitioning to a thriving societal design. We believe the questions of who we are, what shapes culture and society, as well as what we’re capable of, are on the table for us to re-approach. At CE we feel that it isn’t through our existing political or market economic structures that we will create meaningful change. There is enough evidence to support this idea. We feel we must challenge ourselves out of dualistic and dominant thinking and into a wholistic understanding of the challenges we face. Improved conversation, sensemaking, embodiment and a re-ignition of curiosity will be driving factors that more us forward. It’s in these areas we also focus our work. www.collective-evolution.com
Jupiter Broadcasting

@JupiterBroadcasting•53.6K subscribers
http://www.jupiterbroadcasting.com/ The Jupiter Broadcasting YouTube channel is where you'll find content from the different sources at Jupiter Broadcasting that we have uploaded to YouTube! If it's nerdy. And it's awesome. Then it's here. Find us on Twitter! http://twitter.com/ChrisLAS RSS Feed: http://www.youtube.com/rss/user/JupiterBroadcasting/videos.rss
Tesla

@tesla•2.82M subscribers
Electric vehicles, giant batteries & solar, AI & robotics. Tesla’s mission is to accelerate the world’s transition to sustainable energy.
Babish Culinary Universe

@babishculinaryuniverse•10.3M subscribers
Binging with Babish is the realization of a young(ish) man's dream to combine his love of film and cooking, and to have some fun in the process. Join us each week as we recreate the foods you've always wanted to try in movies and television - and if you're not careful, you just might learn a thing or two. http://www.twitter.com/bingingwbabish http://www.facebook.com/bingingwithbabish http://www.youtube.com/bgfilms http://www.instagram.com/bingingwithbabish
Paradox The Wrapper
@ParadoxTheWrapper•281K subscribers
Paradox changing the world one car at at time. Your favorite YouTube certified DIY wrapper bringing you the sickest wrap colors in the game! If I can do it in my garage with just my bare hands, anyone can! Go to https://www.paradoxstyling.com order a roll and try it on your car. For business inquiries: paradoxthewrapper@gmail.com Or DM me on instagram: @paradoxstyling | https://www.instagram.com/paradoxstyling @paradoxwraps | https://www.instagram.com/paradoxwraps
Hannah Fry
@fryrsquared•182K subscribers
1st Track Dents

@1st_track_dents•124K subscribers
Be AMAZED by watching how the 'Paintless Dent Removal' process works from start to finish. Learn what tools and techniques are used to produce INCREDIBLE results!
Jim Breuer's Breuniverse

@JimBreuer•354K subscribers
The Official YouTube channel for Jim Breuer More from Jim at https://linktr.ee/jimbreuerlinks Thanks for hangin' hammers!
AFO

@AnonymousFO•284K subscribers
UFOs, UFOs, and more UFOs Second Channel - https://www.youtube.com/@AFOFiles Find me here too AFO twitter - https://twitter.com/AnonymousFO AFO Facebook - https://www.facebook.com/AnonymousFO/ AFO Rumble - https://rumble.com/user/AnonymousFO AFO TikTok - https://www.tiktok.com/@anonymousfoz
Michael Crump
@mbcrump•20.5K subscribers
Console Hacking and in particular PlayStation homebrew.
Sean Feucht
@seanfeucht•223K subscribers
Welcome to my Youtube channel! Thank you so much for swinging by. Make sure before you leave that you click on the Subscribe button so that you’ll be updated on what we are doing all around the world. We hope to provide content that really blesses you. We feel like it is a significant season of revival in America and the nations of the world. We will continue to upload new music, preaching and moments of impartation in real time. Tune in and receive from what God is doing on our journey. For more information or to see where we will be going next, visit seanfeucht.com! God Bless.
Fabio Wibmer

@wibmerfabio•7.93M subscribers
I'm Fabio Wibmer and a MTB Rider from Austria.
Hagerty

@Hagerty•3.44M subscribers
At Hagerty Media, we illuminate the joy of driving, the wonder of mechanical components, and the bond drivers share with their machines. Subscribe to our YouTube channel for new videos every day! http://bit.ly/HagertyYouTube Visit us at https://www.hagerty.com Contact us: Suggestions and feedback - videoquestions@hagerty.com Press inquiries - press@hagerty.com Partnership requests - partnerships@hagerty.com
Awesome Open Source
@AwesomeOpenSource•153K subscribers
Open Source software is absolutely Awesome! I use it for as much as I can. This channel is here to introduce some of the amazing open source and free software out there, and available, for you to use today. Reviews and information will range from desktop apps to server based, self-hosted apps, and include those open source companies that will help you host their software as well!
Unnecessary Inventions

@UnnecessaryInventions•5.25M subscribers
Unnecessary Inventions is the brainchild of the self taught inventor and evil genius Matty Benedetto. Over the past three years, he has designed and fully prototyped over 350 new inventions that solve problems that don't exist. Each week from the Unnecessary Design Studio in Burlington Vermont, Matty develops 1-3 brand new fake consumer products using diverse production methods from 3D printing, sewing, mold making, wood working, laser cutting, and whatever else he can get his hands on. His inventions ideas come from all corners of the internet from online memes, pop culture moments, lifestyle trends. His inventions live across the Unnecessary Inventions's social profiles with some posts mimicking real marketing campaigns through his signature product commercial style alongside behind the scenes videos on how the inventions get built and how he might actually use them in his daily life. Follow along to see what he will invent next!
Stringer media

@StringerMedia•539K subscribers
Showing the interesting things in life Contact: Hewittaon4545@gmail.com 639516
Tomorrowland

@tomorrowland•11.2M subscribers
Relive all the magical moments of Tomorrowland all year long.
The School of Life

@theschooloflifetv•9.34M subscribers
Self-understanding, calm and emotional maturity. All our content is available on our app and website: www.theschooloflife.com We offer online psychotherapy: www.theschooloflife.com/therapy We publish one film a week, on Wednesdays at 14.00hrs GMT.
Jimmy on Relationships

@JimmyonRelationships•1.17M subscribers
I confessed to my wife that I had an affair, and she kicked me out (rightfully so) and as I was sitting in my car alone wondering if I should text my mom or sleep in my car I asked myself "was this pain I'm experiencing preventable? Can my marriage be saved even after an affair? What does a healthy relationship even look like?" I couldn't stop obsessing over these types of questions, and after reading dozens of books on relationships and eventually rebuilding trust in my marriage, I decided this is too important not to talk about and share what I've learned with others. So I hope I can help your relationship in any way that I can. *I am NOT a coach or counselor and my videos are NEVER intended to replace counseling or therapy =)
Silver Cymbal

@SilverCymbal•932K subscribers
Do more yourself - Do it Yourself Home Improvement - Plumbing / Heating / Generators / Landscaping & Gardening - Lawn Care Everything you see is how I take care of my home and I hope that you can use some of my videos to help you do more yourself at your home.
Hoarder Sam
@hoardersam10•16.9K subscribers
Davidoff London
@davidofflondon3525•38K subscribers
Nicholas Rehm

@NicholasRehm•135K subscribers
I am a full-time aerospace engineer who goes home after work and keeps aerospace engineer-ing. I got a few degrees in airplanes and helicopters and now I want to share, teach, and inspire in the realm of aerial robotics to show you that advanced concepts don't need to be so scary.
Mark Rober

@MarkRober•65.2M subscribers
Former NASA engineer. Current CrunchLabs founder and friend of science. Answers to some common questions: 1) I make a monthly toy we build together on a video, that gets delivered to your house that teaches you to think like an engineer. Check it out at- https://crunchlabs.com 2) I studied Mechanical Engineering in School. I did my undergrad at BYU and Masters at USC. 3) I worked for NASA JPL for 9 years, 7 of which were working on the Curiosity Rover (I made a video about it you should def totes watch cause it's probably my favorite of all my videos). Then I made some Halloween costumes. Then I worked for Apple in their Special Projects Group doing Product Design as a Mechanical Engineer for 5 years. Then in 2022 I created CrunchLabs to deliver monthly toys that teach you to think like an engineer.
atomic14
@atomic14•49.4K subscribers
A collection of slightly mad projects, instructive/educational videos, and generally interesting stuff. DONATIONS: Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/atomic14 EMAIL: Advertising/Commercial: chris+youtube@cmgresearch.com Fan mail: chris+youtube-fan@cmgresearch.com Hate Mail: chris+youtube-hate@cmgresearch.com PLEASE: Do NOT ask for personal advice on something, post it on the discord channel I read ALL emails, but please don't be offended if I don't have time to reply, I get a LOT of emails. Discord: https://discord.gg/JEKhw4TaW8 MAILBAG: Want to send me something to look at? Drop me an email and I'll send you my address.
the. Amazing
@theAmazing•30.4K subscribers
Edgewater Airpark Flite Crew
@FliteCrew•1.66K subscribers
We're just a group of folks lucky enough to live near Edgewater Airpark, home of Flite Test. We're trying to spread the word about this great place and the amazing Flite Test community.
Harrison Low
@harrisonlow•16.5K subscribers
I've enjoyed making things for as long as I can remember, and juggling for almost as long. On this channel I combine these two passions by building the world's first juggling robot! Some other projects that I'm hoping to tackle at some point are: - Add-on for my microscope so that I can control it with a console controller - Automated mushroom fruiting chamber that automates the entire process of mushroom growing - AI controlled laser pointer to entertain my cats so that they leave me alone when I'm trying to work If you'd like to support this Channel and help to bring Jugglebot (and my other projects) to life, you can find my Patreon page below. If you'd like to be a little more direct (and discreet), you can send me BTC here: BTC: bc1qwwzz4thfv732trjvpge0xh599l3m3f7w775mkz Thankyou to Zulip for the free org account!!!
Joe Jenkins

@JoeJenkins•4.31M subscribers
professional guitarist
Zac Builds

@ZacBuilds•515K subscribers
For business and partnership inquiries email: zacbuilds@influint.co
Electo

@Electo•1.32M subscribers
You might want to turn notifications on, I upload once a year Jesus saves ✝️
ProjectAir

@Project-Air•649K subscribers
I'm James! I make RC engineering videos 🚀 Answers to some common questions: 1. I learned almost everything by building models as a kid. 2. I don’t have an engineering degree, as in school I found maths quite difficult. Everything is self-taught! 3. My first RC plane was a Super Cub, which I still have to this day. 4. I drive a Mini. 5. The other people who help make these videos are Emma (who assists with building all sorts of things), Hannah (who films the big tests), and other friends who enjoy helping out from time-to-time. 6. My #1 top tip for getting into this stuff is to build model kits! Subscribe!
Concept Crafted Creations
@ConceptCraftedCreations•75K subscribers
Turning Concept Ideas into Reality! Your hub for innovative electrical & mechanical engineering projects. I'm Erik, a certified engineer passionate about unique technical solutions. Dive with me into engineering's depths, exploring out-of-the-box solutions and pushing tech boundaries. Subscribe to join me on an thrilling tech journey! Why you should join? 1. We work together to turn YOUR idea into reality! 2. Dive into detailed technical adventures. 3. Experience innovative, unconventional solutions. 4. Fresh content every 4 weeks! Do you have ideas, feedback or questions? Let me know in the comments!
Jon's RC
@JonsRC•7.01K subscribers
Welcome to the Jon's RC channel! We are a dad, mom and son RC team! Jon is the primary RC pilot. Jon and I build the planes. His mom does the video recording, Jon does the video editing and I publish the final product. Jon got into RC airplanes with the 3-channel Hobby Zone Champ. He quickly learned to fly the 3-channel Champ and transitioned to 4 plus channel planes. Now, Jon can fly just about any RC model that can fly including Jet, 3-D planes, and Collective Pitch Helis! I created this channel so that we can give an honest review on RC airplanes and helicopters. Our goal is to promote the RC hobby in a fun and safe way. Although Jon makes flying RC airplanes and helicopters look easy, they are NOT necessarily easy to fly! Jon has been flying RC models for a few years now and is no longer a beginner. Thanks for stopping by and please subscribe to our channel!
Sadia Psychology

@sadiapsychology•843K subscribers
3M Waitlist Open – Join Now 👇 https://sadiacoaching.com/ Hi, my name is Sadia Psychology. I'm a relationship coach dedicated to helping individuals and couples navigate through the complexities of modern relationships. With a BSc in Psychology, a masters in education and development psychology, qualified teacher status and diplomas in Psychotherapy, advanced CBT and inner child healing. After over 15 years of consultations and 2000+ coaching calls, I found the solution to all the problems you have in your current situation, so I created a 3M Method—a powerful system designed to help men build fulfilling relationships without chasing, begging, or being manipulated. The 3M Method (Master Yourself, Master Women, Master Relationships) gives men the tools to develop confidence, understand female psychology, and create relationships based on respect and genuine connection.
Get Pretenst
@getpretenst•202 subscribers
Violalovescycling

@Violalovescycling•247K subscribers
I am Viola, a German artistic cyclist and would like to show you what you can do with a bike. I am uploading videos of my bicycle tricks but also little vlogs about the backstage area of the shows I do and other things out of my life as cyclist, performer, science student. Enjoy :-) Impressum: Viola Brand, inhaltlich verantwortlich nach § 18 Abs. 2 MStV C/O Athletia Sports GmbH Susanne Ulhaas Richard-Byrd-Straße 31 50829 Köln Deutschland E-Mail: hello@athletia.net Telefon: +49 221 35 554 -0 USt.-ID: DE328614157 Aufsichtsbehörde nach § 5 Abs. 1 Nr. 8 DDG: Landesanstalt für Medien NRW
Tulsi Gabbard

@TulsiGabbard•1.12M subscribers
Honest. Independent. Unafraid. Always with aloha. https://www.tulsigabbard.com https://twitter.com/tulsigabbard https://www.instagram.com/tulsigabbard/ https://www.facebook.com/TulsiGabbard https://tulsi.locals.com/ https://www.minds.com/tulsigabbard https://wemustprotect.org/maui
Bing Wen Brunton
@bingsbrain•13K subscribers
Hi! I'm a scientist who thinks about brains and behavior. I love to talk about math and data. This channel has videos on a variety of topics related to my research and teaching, including Neuroscience, Data Science, and Biology. My research group at the University of Washington in Seattle develops data-driven techniques inspired by and applied to neuroscience. See my website for more on research and teaching. Prof. Bing Wen Brunton University of Washington, Seattle www.bingbrunton.com/people/ Twitter: https://twitter.com/bingbrunton
Wilson Fabrication
@WilsonFabrication•3.73K subscribers
To document the story of adventure, fabrication, and a lot of frustration.
Painless360

@Painless360•182K subscribers
Dedicated to making Remote Control (RC) models and technology easier to understand, without the click-bait and fake controversy that is so common these days. Just plain old facts and help. New videos added every week and a polite question will always get a reply. A number of the videos are a direct result of questions and comments from subscribers so let me know if you need something explained! Thanks for watching and supporting the channel. Happy flying!
Volos Projects
@VolosProjects•107K subscribers
Hello! On this chanell You can find many Arduino and electronic projects. Under each video You can also find code and schematic. I hope that You will find something interestig for yourself . Fell free to subscribe ! Have a nice day!
Narcissism Survivor Guide With Lise Colucci
@LiseColucci•9.39K subscribers
This channel is your sanctuary for understanding and healing from narcissistic abuse. Here, we delve together into the controlling world of narcissists, unmask their mind games, and reveal the truth behind their sometimes covert and sweet facade. My name is Lise Colucci, and I am here as your life coach to share content designed to empower you, help you regain control of your life, and guide you on your healing journey. From understanding the narcissist's delusions and manipulation to discovering effective coping strategies like the Gray or Yellow Rock Method, we've got you covered. If you're ready to break free and start your healing journey, subscribe and join our supportive community. Remember, you're not alone on this journey; together, we can overcome. 💪🌈 Lise Colucci is a certified life coach, as well as a certified narcissistic abuse recovery coach. For Collaboration and Business inquiries, please use the contact information below: 📩 Email: coachlisec@gmail.com
Doctor Volt
@DoctorVolt•36.4K subscribers
NurdRage

@NurdRage•820K subscribers
A channel run by science nerds for science nerds hailing from the country of Canada. We demonstrate science experiments for all levels, from kitchen chemistry to advanced synthesis. Because what we do is very expensive due to the cost of chemicals and lab equipment, we would appreciate your support at our pateon account: https://www.patreon.com/NurdRage?ty=h Bitcoin donations can be made to: 1NurdRAge7PNR4ULrbrpcYvc9RC4LDp9pS For our viewers in china, you can also find our equivalent channels at https://www.weibo.com/nurdrage https://space.bilibili.com/286479171/#/
Ben Makes Everything
@benmakeseverything•89.8K subscribers
Hobbyist maker of various gadgets and gizmos. Want to contact me? Send an email to: benmakeseverything@intheblackmedia.com
Heap Art
@HeapArt•5.95K subscribers
Welcome to the Heap Art Origami Show, I am Your host Wilson Lee and this is where I will be building a Database of Origami Tutorial. Here at Heap Art, our goal is to help You practice Origami on a regular basis. Every week I will choose at a minimum or 2 Origami Models and show You how to fold them. One of them from Our 100 Exotic Paper Airplane Challenge. The other, an Origami Model never seen before on Our Channel. Our 100 Exotic Paper Airplane Challenge is where I make 100 Paper Airplane Tutorials and have them all in one mega playlist. This project will continue until April 2022. Remember to subscribe to join me on this Journey. Here is my upload schedule: Tuesday : A new Paper Airplane, part of my 100 Exotic Paper Airplane Challenge Friday : A new Origami Model never seen before on my channel Thanks Wilson Lee
Electric Aviation
@ElectricAviation•71.9K subscribers
Electric Aviation is a channel that explores all the electricity powered aircrafts (E-Planes and EVTOL). With the advancement in battery and fuel cell technology, there has been a surge in development of electric aircraft. On this channel we will keep you abreast with all the progress.
3 Minutes of Aviation

@3MinutesofAviation•536K subscribers
Welcome to 3 Minutes of Aviation! Deep down in our hearts, we are all fascinated by aviation, right? On this channel, it's all about planes, helicopters and anything else that flies. I combine interesting aviation moments captured on camera and put them in context by giving you informative background information about each clip – this will help you understand what's happening, even if you're no aviation expert. Enjoy! ✈✈✈
Hevesh5

@Hevesh5•4.25M subscribers
I design, build, and topple dominoes to make beautifully intricate chain reactions. Join the H5 Domino Community, and be sure to subscribe if you like what you see! :) Learn more about my work and buy dominoes at Hevesh5.com. “H5 Domino Creations” is my own brand of precision-engineered dominoes & accessories, which I designed specifically for toppling. Made in collaboration with Spin Master, each domino is manufactured using the highest quality materials for the best toppling performance. Pick up a set at Hevesh5.com/buydominoes Need a Domino Artist? I can do advertisements, logos, intros, events, product placement, and more custom Domino Art: For business inquiries only: info@Hevesh5.com For all other non-business related emails: H5dominocommunity@gmail.com ♢ I started building dominoes when I was 9 years old (September, 2008) ♢ I own over 130,000 dominoes ♢ My personal domino record is 32,000 (800K with a group) ♢ How did I get into dominoes? I searched "dominoes" on YouTube
Monkworkz
@monkworkz5579•102 subscribers
Ultra Lightweight electrical power generation systems for Experimental Aircraft
NIPSCO
@nipsco•427 subscribers
Powering Life in Northern Indiana. This page is monitored during business hours. Please call our Customer Care Center, Monday-Friday, 7:00 a.m. - 7:00 p.m., at 1-800-4NIPSCO (1-800-464-7726) with any questions about your service. Customer Care Center: 1-800-464-7726 Electrical Outages: 1-800-464-7726 Gas Leak Emergencies: 1-800-634-3524 Call Before You Dig: 811 (free call and utility marking service)
rctestflight

@rctestflight•796K subscribers
I'm Daniel Riley and I'm addicted to building things. I started this channel to share my projects and hopefully inspire others to build cool stuff. Instagram: danielriley_
Chemdelic
@chemdelic•96.7K subscribers
Unraveling the mysteries of chemistry. I am a chemistry student currently and want to learn and showcase the beautiful world of reactions. Take a seat and enjoy the ride through this digital journey into our world. For business inquiries: Chemdelic@gmail.com
HobbyKing
@HobbyKingOfficial•155K subscribers
Like, share, subscribe, and hit the notification bell to stay updated on the latest products, reviews, and news from HobbyKing! If you love Radio Control products, then we're just like you! We stock a huge selection of RC products from planes, cars, boats, batteries, parts, and gifts ideas for friends and family!
HomebuiltHELP
@HomebuiltHELP•68K subscribers
We feature step by step DVD video demonstrations to help builders of experimental home built aircraft. Visit our website for full library of videos. Subscribe to our YouTube channel to receive notification of video Tips as they are published!
MojoGrip

@mojogrip•344K subscribers
Hello, and welcome to MojoGrip. My name is Mike. I'm a serial entrepreneur who shares his passion for business and aviation. Here you will find videos dedicated to airplanes, flying and self growth.
Michael Hille
@michaelhille261•2.3K subscribers
Flying Adventures - Landing out Bush , beach landings, Aircraft Building tips Latest Project Experimental Kit Aircraft Amphibian design, proof of concept type of float plane Multiple engine choices could be Rotax 915 , UL power , Honda Viking , Subaru , Lycoming 100HP - 250HP .All aluminium Tig welded Hull Retract Gear 2 or 4 seat , Cruise 100 KT Stall 40 KT STOL capability for Bush flying Takeoff 50 m land 100 m on land. water landings TBA after flight testing 2 min folding wings for trailer. Trailer to a boat ramp go fishing and flying. Quick easy build design Its free to subscribe , Please hit that like , Subscribe and ring that Bell and follow along on the build log . For build tips along the way Thanks for watching
Zoomer Historian

@ZoomerHistorian•173K subscribers
"History is a pack of lies about events that never happened told by people who weren't there." NON-POLITICAL Mostly covering WW2 era history. SUPPORT ME Patreon : https://www.patreon.com/zoomerhistorian SubscribeStar: https://www.subscribestar.com/zoomerhistorian Telegram: https://t.me/zoomerhistorian Buy me a book: https://www.buymeacoffee.com/ZoomerHistorian
Jimmys World

@therealjimmysworld•515K subscribers
Welcome to Jimmy's World! I’m Jimmy, and now you’re in my world! It’s a world of airplanes, dad jokes, and adventures. This channel started on a whim..with an abandoned #Pipercherokee6. Since then, we've found several abandoned airplanes and answered the question "Will it run?" Most did, some… not so much. We’ve flown planes through thunderstorms and the Kentucky tornado of 2021… Where will we end up next?! We've got a #Cessna310, a #Beechcraftbonanza, and now the infamous #Lancair! Whether you’re a Blue Angel or just getting your private pilot’s license, flying a trainer or a jet, if you have a love for aviation and are looking for an exciting channel, there’s no better place than right here. Subscribe to join me on my crazy aerial journey! Videos premiere every Saturday and Wednesday at 9am EST. #savethe310 Instapage: https://www.instagram.com/therealjimmysworld/ Facepage: https://www.facebook.com/Jimmys-World-104845438518777 Business & media: TheRealJimmysWorld@gmail.com
Rich McCoy
@richmccoyofficial•5.55K subscribers
Welcome to the ultimate destination for solar sales professionals and business owners. Dive into expert-led tutorials and in-depth training on solar appointment setting, objection handling, and building successful solar sales strategies. Our content such as 'solar sales training' and 'solar marketing techniques', are tailored to empower solar marketers and sales reps. Subscribe now to stay ahead in the solar industry. Explore our courses at https://richard-mccoy-6ab6.mykajabi.com/store 🚀
King Luxury

@kinglux•776K subscribers
Covering the exceptional comfort that stylish luxury provides.
Unspeakable

@Unspeakable•18.6M subscribers
eat pizza for breakfast
3-Minute Breakdowns
@overlookedalpha•22.6K subscribers
Short breakdowns on the market's leading stocks. We also publish deeper analysis on our sister site Overlooked Alpha.
WTFigo
@WhatTFisgoingon•25.7K subscribers
Welcome to WTF is Going On, your ultimate deep dive into the unexplained, the mysterious, and the downright mind-bending! From alien encounters and UFOs to UAPs and those puzzling New Jersey drone sightings, we uncover what the mainstream won’t. Explore the secrets of Non-Human Intelligence (NHI) and the hidden truths of ancient Earth civilizations that defy history books. Dive into theories about the Egyptian Pyramids, Annunaki, Black Pyramid in Alaska, time travel, and the shadowy world of lizard people, gray aliens, cryptids and more that might be hiding in plain sight. Whether it’s unraveling government cover-ups, decoding ancient mysteries, or chasing the truth behind today’s biggest conspiracies, we’re here to ask the questions no one else will. Join us on this thrilling journey through the unknown—the answers might just change everything you think you know about reality. Subscribe now, and let’s uncover WTF is really going on! aliens, uap, ufos, drones, pyramids, moon landing
Andrew Lam

@Lam•212K subscribers
Business Inquiries: andrew.lam [AT] intheblackmedia dot com Helping you appreciate the world by revealing the amazing and hidden engineering that make our everyday life possible
Myron Golden

@MyronGolden•1.01M subscribers
This channel exists for the purpose of empowering entrepreneurs and encouraging them to the great heights that can not come from anywhere else. Congratulations for being on this channel. I will consistently bring you great content on all things related to being an entrepreneur.
Insane Imports
@insaneimports_official•3.46K subscribers
Insane Imports has created a reputation in the car enthusiast community around the Charlotte, NC and surrounding southeast area. Since being founded in 2016, we have hosted car shows, drag race events, and raised money for local charities; making a mark in the community. We embrace all builds but have a passion for classic JDM. This channel gives you an inside look at what we are up to. Our goal is to offer you entertainment and hopefully provide motivation and insight into how you can pursue your own passion.
Made by Madman
@madebymadman4640•381K subscribers
Hello, my name is Alexander and I am looking for very purposeful people for mutually beneficial cooperation! If you have an idea for developing your own business, be sure to write to me and we will talk. Interests that I would like to develop and put on stream by creating my own production: - any type of electric transport for individual movement; - machines or mechanisms for wood or Metalworking; - acoustic systems for both home use and portable. - - any other sphere of activity, the main thing is that the product is competitive, is in demand on the world market, can replace the import of products from other countries, be very useful within countries. If you have any questions about advertising or cooperation, please contact us by email - lavilassanek@gmail.com
ShawCode
@ShawCode•17.2K subscribers
Hi there, and welcome to the ShawCode YouTube channel! My name is Caleb Shaw, and here you can learn how to code! I make tutorials for beginners, all the way up to advanced level, so no matter what skill level you are at, there are videos for you! If you want to learn to code, or are learning to code, then be sure to subscribe for helpful and easy to follow programming tutorials. If you have any questions about programming, or if you are stuck with any code, then be sure to leave a comment, I will definitely get back to you! Thanks for watching!
AlphaPhoenix

@AlphaPhoenixChannel•527K subscribers
I'm Brian Haidet - PhD in Materials Science, but I'd also describe myself as artist, maker, and Hawaiian shirt enthusiast. On this channel, You'll find my side projects and favorite physics demos - I hope you enjoy!
Red Beard's Garage

@RedBeardsGarage•437K subscribers
Welcome to Red Beard's Garage! We're a group of family and friends who fabricate, customize, and restore go-karts, mini bikes, golf carts, and small engines while having family friendly fun. You're sure to find something that tickles your fancy! Thanks for checking out our channel and don't forget to subscribe! You can also find us on Facebook, Instagram, TikTok, & Twitter RBGkarts.com
Ziroth

@ZirothTech•374K subscribers
This channel focuses on highlighting new science and engineering projects that are helping the world transition to a zero carbon future!
Rodney Dangerfield

@rodneynorespect•519K subscribers
Official YouTube channel of the late great comedy legend Rodney Dangerfield, known for his iconic line “I don’t get no respect!”.
Major Hardware

@MajorHardware•275K subscribers
Well what is up, my name is James and this is my channel Major Hardware. By day I'm a Mechanical Engineer, by night I'm a PC/Tech enthusiast. I love checking out new or interesting products doing my best to make them look as good as possible on camera. I also love thinking outside the box, trying to come up with new or interesting ideas on how to test hardware. Quite literally if you can dream it, you can design and build it and that is what i intend to do. Have a product you think I should look at or want to sponsor a video? Feel free to contact me via email at hardwaremajor@gmail.com
Lets Learn Something

@letslearnsomething30•1.1M subscribers
Lets Learn Something Hello guys I'm Jomari Welcome to my DIY Channel Including: +Homemade engine +Tool Idea +Tool Making +Machine Life Hack +DIY Idea +Homemade Also support my channel on patreon Don't forget to SUBSCRIBE (For New Builds)
Simple-Homelab
@Simple-Homelab•7.89K subscribers
SimpleHomelab (formerly SmartHomeBeginner) is a leading blog for articles and tutorials on smart home, media server, and home server related topics. All made available FREELY to everyone. SmartHomeBeginner has existed in various forms (blog.avserver.info [2010-2012], linuxplained.com [2012-2014], and htpcbeginner.com [2014-2018]) since 2010. Our articles are in-depth and written in such a way that even beginners can follow and implement complex projects. Great examples are our Docker and Traefik guides. Our content has helped millions of readers and our authors spend several hours answering questions and helping the readers.
Carl Bugeja
@CarlBugeja•288K subscribers
Engineer trying to invent new things with electronics
Sparks and Code
@SparksandCode•9.77K subscribers
Let’s make cool stuff and maybe learn a little bit too.
CNC Kitchen

@CNCKitchen•639K subscribers
Hi, I'm Stefan and I create educating and entertaining videos for you which feature 3D printing, CNC, CAD, Lasers, Arduino and much more tec stuff! 🏆 Do you want to help me cover my running costs? Send me a dollar or two over PayPal. https://www.paypal.me/CNCKitchen 🌼 Even watching the ads before my videos helps me a lot! 🚚 Want to send me something? Please contact me via E-Mail first. So sit back and enjoy more interesting stuff!
shurap

@shurap•1.12M subscribers
On the shore of the Pacific Ocean, when I was ten years old, in a flame of a fire blown by the cold northerly wind, on a smooth stone from the surf, I forged my first sword from a piece of the wreck of a ship thrown ashore and almost rotted from the salty storms. I still remember the star sparks of fire, carried away to their heavenly brothers, and the warm light of the heated metal suddenly became pliable in children's hands. It was then, in the twilight of the polar night, the fire gave me spiritual harmony, from the ability to change the world around, he gave me the power to hear steel. My site: https://sites.google.com/site/damaskshevchenko/home Support channel: https://www.patreon.com/shurap Official merch: https://teespring.com/stores/shurap
sreetips
@sreetips•319K subscribers
Demonstrations of precious metals refining techniques that I have developed since starting back in September of 2010. It began as a hobby and still is to this day for the most part. I am just an advanced beginner. I enjoy making these videos. I wish videos like these were available back when I first started. Please enjoy and be safe! I will try to answer any questions that you have about any of these processes. I enjoy helping people! Any references to using or making illegal drugs will be promptly deleted. Please refrain from using offensive language in the comment section. I would request that a suitable environment be maintained for people of all ages to view and learn about precious metals refining.
Alan Reiner
@ObsessiveEngineering•5.09K subscribers
Obsessive adventures in AI, engineering, 3D printing, and more!
Zen Lee
@ZenLee•32.2K subscribers
The Way of the Wheel. Tech Review, Tip & Tricks, and Safe Riding Practices.
Shawn “The Wizard” Kelly
@shawnthewizardkelly7083•495 subscribers
Entrepreneur Mentor Educator LifeStyle Instagram @ Shawn.Kelly.11 Cashapp @ $JellyKelly11 Tiktok @ ShawnTheWizardKelly https://linktr.ee/WizardKelly
Reverse Aging Revolution
@ReverseAgingRevolution•107K subscribers
We cannot change our chronological age, however Our biological age is within our control and can be reversed. Biological age is showing the status of how healthy we are, so how we live matters!!! We can grow older or grow younger. I choose grow younger everyday! The thing is "Why Not?" By Reverse Aging Revolution
Airguns of Alaska
@airgunsofalaska•3.72K subscribers
Hi YouTube, I’ve been shooting airguns since ‘81 and it’s been a hobby I’ve stuck with since I was a kid. A couple years ago during an especially rainy fall I decided to create a sub channel off my power-sports focused YouTube account and start making videos of the airguns in my private collection. That led me to buying new airguns and featuring them on my channel. As time progressed I realized I could create my version of the original concept of Dirt Bike magazine with the late, great Rick (Super Hunky) Seiman. His vision was just one regular guy talking about dirt bikes to other regular guys. I thought that’d be a really neat thing for the airgun world. Feel free to post any questions or comments. I’m generally quick to respond and enjoy reading viewer feedback. Thanks for checking out my channel! I can be contacted at thatalaskaguy907@gmail.com
SunShine

@TurboSunShine•109K subscribers
I'm a mechanical engineer sharing my projects with the world! For consulting, advertising or other business related inquires, please reach out to my business e-mail bellow ( you need to be logged in to see it).
Built For Dirt
@BuiltForDirt•13.3K subscribers
Built For Dirt is all about building, off roading, rock crawling, and overlanding in my 2020 Jeep Gladiator Rubicon and sometimes my 1988 Suzuki Samurai! If it's a 4x4, Jeep Wrangler, JL, JK, YJ, CJ, TJ, Toyota or any other brand I'm all about it! Formally known as TJ Mitchell Films Check out my Amazon store here: https://www.amazon.com/shop/tjmitchellfilms Inspired by Trail Recon , JK Gear and Gadgets , Dirt Lifestyle , Bleepin Jeep , Lite Brite , Wayalife , The Story Till Now , Matt's Off-Road Recevery
Proper Printing

@properprinting•126K subscribers
My name is Jón Schone and I come up with crazy ideas which I try to make real. You won't guess my next project ;) For business inquiries, use the email below. Visit my website for more information and all other communication.
Jolly Peanut
@JollyPeanut•37.1K subscribers
Welcome to the Jolly Peanut Channel. Everybody is welcome here. This is not a one subject channel, I make videos on things that are of interest to me & I hope that you & others will enjoy watching commenting or just hanging out with me & my buddy Peanut. Some main subjects are Guns, knives, camping equipment, homesteading, fishing, lock picking, machinery, wildlife and basically anything that I find of interest. So sit back and enjoy. If you like what you see & you want to see more You can help support Jolly Peanut by contributing $1 or more if you can. All proceeds will help towards funding future videos. Thank You. https://www.paypal.me/jollypeanut
Hannah Barron

@HannahBarronOutdoors•954K subscribers
Manx Ninja Pig

@ManxNinjaPig•3.5M subscribers
Subscribe for hamburger... Epic Mario videos - Hope you enjoy them :)
John Stossel

@StosselTV•1.06M subscribers
After 40+ years of reporting, I now understand the importance of limited government and personal freedom. ------------------------------------------ Libertarian journalist John Stossel created Stossel TV to explain liberty and free markets to young people. Prior to Stossel TV he hosted a show on Fox Business and co-anchored ABC’s primetime newsmagazine show, 20/20. Stossel’s economic programs have been adapted into teaching kits by a non-profit organization, "Stossel in the Classroom." High school teachers in American public schools now use the videos to help educate their students on economics and economic freedom. They are seen by more than 12 million students every year. Stossel has received 19 Emmy Awards and has been honored five times for excellence in consumer reporting by the National Press Club. Other honors include the George Polk Award for Outstanding Local Reporting and the George Foster Peabody Award.
Merv's Service Secrets
@MervsServiceSecrets•36K subscribers
I'm dusty but clever, and I love sharing DIY secrets and nerdy insights. Yep, with help from Helen, Margie and a hipster film student named Demille, I share my experiences with the world. And while doing that, I always throw in a mix of humor and fun. But listen up! When you're doing REAL DIY, things don't always go smooth. So don't take anything I do as a recommendation to try it yourself. For Pete's sake, before attempting similar procedures, conduct extensive research and decide for yourself what the best, safest methods are. This channel is all about collaboration and communication, so be sure to leave comments, criticisms, and your ideas on the best way to do things. Join our community and join the conversation! Visit my website, visit my store, and be sure to join us for some MervServe adventures today.
Misteryscape - Ambient Music & Beauties
@misteryscape•18K subscribers
Welcome to a channel where sci-fi beauty and ambient soundscapes meet. Inspired by Joi from Blade Runner and other iconic video game heroines like Samus Aran from Metroid, I create stunning female characters with a seductive, empowering appeal, set in futuristic, immersive environments. Each video combines visually captivating designs with soothing ambient music crafted to help you focus, study, work, or relax. Whether you're seeking inspiration, relaxation, or a tranquil atmosphere, my videos provide the perfect backdrop for creativity and concentration. If you enjoy elegant, futuristic visuals paired with music that enhances your mood, subscribe and step into a world where sci-fi meets sensuality and calm.
The Babylon Bee Podcast
@TheBabylonBeePodcast•74K subscribers
The official YouTube channel for the only authorized and inerrant podcast of The Babylon Bee.
Goodguys2Greatmen
@Goodguys2Greatmen•46.9K subscribers
Hey, my name is Steve Horsmon, the founder of Goodguy2Greatmen, a business where Dan Dore and I along with our other coaches support men who are struggling in their relationships with women. Good guys call us when they have tried everything to rebuild the love and affection they want when all they have left is a kiss goodnight. We go through an empowering step-by-step process to build your confidence in being the man your wife will appreciate and desire again. And this is where the light will go on for you. You will learn how to create the feelings of trust, presence and connection women crave and why the tactics you’ve been trying are making things worse.
Sajad
@SajadAli•341K subscribers
Ready to ride the wildest waves in crypto? You've found your launchpad! We're your inside track to the hottest memecoins and altcoins before they moon. Here's what you'll get: Cutting-edge analysis on the next big memecoins and altcoins Insider tips to spot 100x gems before they explode Daily updates on the coins that could make you massive multiples No-BS strategies to navigate the volatile world of altcoins Whether you're a seasoned trader or just starting out, we've got the secret sauce to supercharge your gains. Don't let another opportunity slip by – hit that subscribe button now
Jake Ferrin
@JakeFerrin•46.2K subscribers
UX design / Marathon runner / Family man
Android Developer Tips
@AndroidDeveloperTips•4.29K subscribers
Whether you're a seasoned veteran or a newcomer in the world of Android app development, you'll find something useful and interesting on this channel. Here, you won't be bombarded with lengthy and tedious tutorials. Instead, you'll get concise and informative videos that help you solve common problems and learn how to implement exciting features on the Android platform. Moreover, I will provide you with enough references and resources so that you can continue to learn on your own. But wait, that's not all! You'll also hear from other Android developers who are active in the community. I'll interview them and ask about their experiences, challenges, and advice. You'll also have the opportunity to see some of the events and conferences that I attend and report on. The interviews are also available as a podcast so that you can listen to them anytime, anywhere. Simply search for "Android Interviews Podcast" on your favorite podcast app and hit subscribe.
Mr iPoo
@MriPoo•23.4K subscribers
Hello everyone! I am Mr. iPoo, and welcome to my iPoo channel called @mriPoo! Here, I will be sharing videos related to technology and teaching you how to create various projects at home using new technologies. You will find videos on DIY projects, life hacks, home experiments, and much more. Thank you so much for, liking, commenting, and sharing my videos. I highly appreciate your support. If haven't already, please subscribe to my channel to stay updated with new videos. Thank you again! ^_^
VANNtastic!
@VanntasticFinances•340K subscribers
Welcome to my channel! WE ARE SHIFTING TO GREATER HEIGHTS! On this channel, I teach a foreign concept to American finances. I make suggestions of how to use VELOCITY BANKING to possibly make your financial life EXCEL out of “want” and into PROSPERITY…changing your financial life COMPLETELY! To excel to even greater heights…INCREASE YOUR GIVING! You can never out-give GOD. REMEMBER: I am NOT a Financial Advisor. I do not have a degree in Finance....as a matter of fact....I don't have any degrees. So remember, I make suggestions based on how I run my own finances. YOU make decisions.
Perfect Compressor
@PerfectCompressor•262K subscribers
PERFECT COMPRESSOR OFFICIAL CHANNEL Director By Mian Muhammad Aqeel Owner Of Reconditioned Perfect Compressor Company. Presenting By Mian Irfan Latif. There are all types compressors Available. All Latest Technology information Available To Related Refrigerator And Air Conditioner Refrigerator Compressor's : Danfoss , National Panasonic , Espra , france , LG And Embraco Available on ( Perfect compressor's Company ) Air Conditioner Compressor's : Mitsubishi , Toshiba , LG , Sanyo , Hitachi , Carrier , Bristol , Copeland And Scroll on ( Perfect compressor's Company ) We have all compressors Available: Contact & E-Mail For Business Enquiries: Perfect.compressor@yahoo.com WhatsApp no. +92 323 6123617 Remember to open notifications and subscribe to our channel to keep track of the content on our channel. It is only a Compressor's Made creation for a knowledge to Our Subscribers and other peoples.. Subscribe Like Share and Comment.. Thank You😊
BackMacSci
@BackMacSci•37.6K subscribers
Hey, you! Welcome to BackMacSci, the science show created by me, Tate McAluney! I create videos and visually-stunning, science demonstrations to teach STEM and inspire others! Why is the show called BackMacSci? "Back" represents how I used to record my show in the *back*yard of my childhood home, "Mac" represents my last name, and "Sci" is short for science and gives the show unquestionable validity. 😎 Enjoy my videos and don't be afraid to learn! Support me on Patreon using the link at the bottom :) Follow me on Instagram for more short-form science demonstrations! @backmacsci 1 Peter 3:18 “For Christ died for sins once for all, the righteous for the unrighteous, to bring you to God. He was put to death in the body but made alive in the Spirit.”
Matt Gray
@realmattgray•143K subscribers
Proven systems to grow a profitable audience with organic content I’ve built 4 profitable companies in the past 10 years, a community of 14 million people, and teams of 50+ people. I now run a portfolio of profitable online businesses doing $13 million revenue a year. Newsletter: https://www.founderos.com/newsletter Founder OS Course & Community: https://www.founderos.com/training Socials X: https://twitter.com/matt_gray_ LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/mattgray1 TikTok: https://www.tiktok.com/@realmattgray Instagram: https://instagram.com/matthgray My website: https://www.founderos.com
Everything Electric Show
@EverythingElectricShow•121K subscribers
Welcome to the Everything Electric Show - home to The Fully Charged Show Podcast and the latest and greatest stories in the world of clean energy and electrification! Visit our LIVE exhibitions in the UK, USA, Canada, Australia & Europe: https://fullycharged.live/ Check out our sister channel @fullychargedshow ! Become a Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/fullychargedshow Become a YouTube member: use JOIN button above Subscribe to Fully Charged & the Everything Electric Show channels Subscribe for episode alerts and the Fully Charged newsletter: https://fullycharged.show/zap-sign-up/ Visit: https://FullyCharged.Show Find us on Twitter: https://twitter.com/fullychargedshw Follow us on Instagram: https://instagram.com/fullychargedshow
Alan Zhang
@alanzeekk•62.5K subscribers
Journey to build a "flying car." I dedicate to explore the world of eVTOL and future air mobility.
Brian Rivera, CPA
@BrianRiveraCPA•49.6K subscribers
Rob VK8FOES
@RobVK8FOES•46.7K subscribers
Hi, welcome to my channel. Before you comment on my videos or send me an email, please understand the following: I WILL NOT help you track a cellular network subscribers mobile phone. I WILL NOT assist you in targeting and intercepting a particular cellular network subscribers data. I WILL NOT instruct you to eavesdrop on private telecommunications, SMS messages, voice calls and GPRS data. I KNOW NOTHING about SS7 vulnerabilities, nor do I care about them. DO NOT email me or comment about 3G/UMTS, 4G/LTE and 5G hacking. These HAVE NOT been publicly cracked AND THEY NEVER WILL BE. I WILL NOT teach you how to hack social media accounts, apps or games. If you have a genuine interest in RF hacking for the purposes of education and experimentation, you can email me at vk8foes@gmail.com. If I feel that you may use my assistance and knowledge to potentially do something malicious, I will not reply. So please phrase your question or query accordingly, aligned to these values!
Mark Tilbury

@marktilbury•5.06M subscribers
I firmly believe that anyone who learns the skill sets of a millionaire can become a millionaire, ANYONE. My Story: I left school at 16 with no qualifications and no money. No one believed in me especially my teachers. My first job was making wooden trash cans, and it paid less than $2 per hour. My manager bullied me and gave me all the bad jobs. I decided to quit and start my own business, it was a big risk. 30 years later... I run a multi-million dollar business. I have grossed over 50 million. I have the house of my dreams and most importantly I have the freedom to spend time with my family. Now I want to help you become financially free as well. Socials name is @MarkTilbury on Tiktok, YouTube, Twitter & IG📸
Riley Coleman

@RileyColeman•357K subscribers
I Help Traders Build a Foundation Through Chart Analysis And Understanding Their Trading Psychology.
Be Inspired

@BeInspiredChannel•9.11M subscribers
An open-minded channel for those who are seeking knowledge.
EvilmonkeyzDesignz
@EvilmonkeyzDesignz•137K subscribers
I'm a Computer Engineer that loves electronics. Video content that I post may include: * Electronics tear-downs * Component close-ups under the microscope * Circuitboard design * Anything else electronics related that I think other people might enjoy. If you are looking for more, check out my Instagram account (@evilmonkeyzdesignz) or the website that I pay for and forget to update. Never stop learning :)
Data Trader

@DataTraders•620K subscribers
This channel teaches you how to become a profitable trader from start to finish.
Mattias Krantz

@Mattiaskrantz•1.52M subscribers
I got my engineering degree from IKEA pls subscribe
Zack Freedman

@ZackFreedman•612K subscribers
Welcome to my workshop, where wicked widgets, wild wearables, and wholesome wonder are wasted on weak witticisms and worthless wordplay. We once worked for whoever wanted wires to work, but the wacky world of wcontent has wiped our wherewithal. The thing on my face is a wearable computer I use as a teleprompter! Send gizmos, gadgets, and samples to the Voidstar Mailbag! Voidstar Lab c/o Zack Freedman 3051 W 105th Ave #350943 Westminster, CO 80031
The Stoic Community™

@thestoiccommunity•349K subscribers
⚜Join the community of stoic minds! Welcome to The Stoic Community, Your Portal to Stoic Wisdom! Step into the enriching realm of Stoicism with The Stoic Community, a channel dedicated to the profound insights of Stoic philosophy. Our community is a sanctuary for those seeking calm in a chaotic world, offering a deep understanding of the Stoic lifestyle. Whether you're a lifelong philosopher or just beginning your journey, The Stoic Community offers a diverse range of content, from in-depth explorations of the teachings of Seneca, Epictetus, and Marcus Aurelius, to practical applications of Stoic principles in contemporary life. At The Stoic Community, we view Stoicism as more than just a philosophical doctrine. It's a blueprint for life. Join us to start a journey of self-exploration, inner serenity, and personal development. Discover the Stoic ethos to face life's challenges with resilience and strength. Join our newsletter at the link. https://www.jointhestoiccommunity.com/
northwestrepair
@northwestrepair•178K subscribers
Contact me on DISCORD https://discord.gg/krzHbYpUMy Or email me at tony@northwestrepair.com (ignore automatic reply) Tools, schematics, boardview files etc are available here https://drive.google.com/drive/folders/12XQpmc9tLwlRQjlo3Mn_XwKlVcV8XYGI?usp=sharing Buy me a candy at paypal.me/tonynameless
Financial Modeling World Cup
@FMWC•51.1K subscribers
We organize various financial modeling and MS Excel Competitions. On our Youtube channel, we publish educational and entertaining content related to our regular financial modeling stages and Excel Esports Road to Las Vegas LIVE battles. Check out our website to learn more and sign up for our competitions: https://www.fmworldcup.com/
Roaring Kitty

@RoaringKitty•1M subscribers
The Roaring Kitty channel revolves around educational live streams where I share my daily routine of tracking stocks and performing investment research. The Roaring Kitty channel and live streams are for educational purposes only. I share my approach to investing in an effort to set you on the right path to building out your own investment process. I don't provide personal investment advice or stock recommendations during the stream. Please understand that my style of investing is extremely aggressive and I take on a substantial amount of risk. It's likely my approach would not be suitable for you. If you're seeking personalized advice, I encourage you to sit down with a financial professional who can review your personal situation, financial background, risk tolerance, etc. Check out the Roaring Kitty disclaimer video for more information: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YM-UsY8Htmk
Make Me Hack
@MakeMeHack•26.1K subscribers
Everything related to Hardware Hacking and Reverse Engineering including tutorials for beginners and more advanced stuff. The hardware hacking and reverse engineering process described in various videos is based on: 1. Information Gathering of hardware and software, to identify main device components, to locate UART and JTAG interfaces and to get the EEPROM content, the firmware file and the root file system 2. Using Side Channel Attacks with ChipWhisperer and his Fault Injection capabilities when everything else fails 3. Building a debugging friendly Emulation Environment, to run device's binaries, using QEMU and a build system like "BuildRoot" 4. Techniques to analyse, hack, reverse engineer and modify the firmware using file system analysis, analysing the output on the system console, using the Gnu Debugger in the emulation environment and reverse engineering the firmware using open source software as Ghidra
Rockstar Games

@RockstarGames•11.3M subscribers
The official home of Rockstar Games on YouTube
Green Bar Trading - Matt Walters
@GreenBarTrading•4.78K subscribers
Follow a technical day trader that focuses on scalp trading. Getting in and out of positions fast for quick profit on momentum stocks and options. On Green Bar Trading you will see all things stock market. Real recaps of trades I have taken using my scalp trading strategy. I also use technical analysis, as well as other indicators, to provide information on $SPY and $QQQ. SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS: TBD I also create educational videos using Charles Schwab's Think or Swim platform so be sure to like and subscribe to the channel so you don't miss our videos. If you have any questions you can ask me in the comments section of any video and I will personally reply to every comment or question.
TradesbyRob
@tradesbyrob•2.68K subscribers
📈 TBR Academy Algo 🤖 Precision-Driven AI Trading by TradesbyRob 👉 #AlgoTrading
DENKI OTAKU
@DENKI-OTAKU•78.8K subscribers
わたし は でんき の どうが を つくります｡
Munro Live

@MunroLive•452K subscribers
Munro Live is a YouTube channel that features Sandy Munro and other engineers from Munro & Associates. Munro is a world leader in reverse engineering, teardown benchmarking, costing and new product development! Munro - Home of Lean Design: https://leandesign.com/ For more behind the scenes content: Twitter: https://twitter.com/live_munro Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/munrolive LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/company/munro-live Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/MunroLiveTeam/ Tik Tok: https://www.tiktok.com/@munrolive Inquiries: https://leandesign.com/contact/ For Exclusive Content Join our Patreon! Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/MunroLive
AC Designs Garage
@ACDesignsGarage•57.3K subscribers
This channel focuses on the How To side of the Custom Car world. Everything from Metal Fabrication, Tig and Mig Welding Rust repair, Paint and Body Work and a little bit of Detailing, Paint correction. I also enjoy doing Product Reviews on things that I think you guys would be interested in using. I have a passion for teaching people the custom car trade from start to finish. So, if you have a passion for the Custom car and Hot Rod world and would like to learn how to do it yourself, make sure to Subscribe Like and Share!!! Social accounts Instagram @acdesignsgarage Facebook Adrian Collins Email acdesigns1933@gmail.com website www.acdesignsgarage.com
Trevor Bauer

@BauerOutage•950K subscribers
My life is a lot of things. Boring is not one of them. Come along for the ride as I answer your questions, give you tips to improve your game, share inside info on critical in-game moments, and welcome you into my daily life! Shop official Trevor Bauer merchandise here: https://trevorbauer.com/ For Business Inquiries: momentum@night.co
The Average Joe Investor

@AverageJoeInvestor•148K subscribers
My Name is Joe and I am just an Average Joe. I am married with 4 kids. I coach baseball and live in an ordinary home. I believe whole-heartedly that financial freedom is possible for everybody. On this channel we focus on how to invest with a particular emphasis on Creating Income from your portfolio. We also talk about buying and holding index ETF's and Buying LEAPS Options to supplement holding the index.
Arthur Hur
@artxhur•683 subscribers
Magic Indicator Strategies
@magicindicatorstrategies•130K subscribers
Welcome to Magic Indicator Strategies! On this channel we share the most powerful indicator strategies for forex, crypto and stocks with a goal to help you become profitable! Financial Disclaimer: I am not a financial advisor. The ideas presented in these videos are personal opinions and for entertainment purposes only. You (and only you) are responsible for the financial decisions that you make. Ideas presented in these videos are my opinions at the date of filming and may have changed in the future.
CaseyNeistat

@casey•12.6M subscribers
new york city
TradingLab

@TradingLabOfficial•1.54M subscribers
Dedicating my time to giving you the best value possible. My one and only goal is to make you a better trader. Simple as that. Enjoy!
Unreal Keanu Reeves
@unreal_keanu•1.94M subscribers
Welcome to «Unreal Keanu Reeves», the deepfake channel of actor Keanu Reeves, the kindest actor in the world. Get ready for a dose of fun and positivity. Subscribe, like, and share to join the excitement! If you like what we do, we would really appreciate your support🙏🏻 Ways to support us: Payeer (USD, EUR): P1098216157 Bitcoin: bc1qkdagntl0zv2dxcldesl7d66fqtwe2fs994jz7p Ethereum: 0x83fdd336A3025a07AdF18Fa2f2A3F9A216A9Ee0C USDt (TRON network): TGVonCrCFWEFNVHptqTgAXDcwuE2SkZZ5u For business inquiries: dpfakehouse@gmail.com
ideacity
@ideacity•72.9K subscribers
The annual ideacity conference has rightly earned its reputation as Canada’s “Premier meeting of the minds.” Over the course of three days, media icon Moses Znaimer presents a dazzling line-up of some of the brightest minds on the planet. Ground breaking scientists, visionary entrepreneurs, artists, scholars, activists and agitators – if it’s new, if it’s hot, if it will challenge your thinking, it’s at ideacity. Over the years ideacity has welcomed such distinguished presenters as Deepak Chopra, Margaret Atwood, Romeo Dallaire, and Justin Trudeau. But we’ve also hosted lesser known thinkers who became superstars – like 15-year-old Jack Andraka, who discovered a test for pancreatic cancer.
Nischa
@nischa•1.55M subscribers
I’m an Investment Banker (with an accountancy qualification) and on this channel we explore all things personal finance, self development and business Let's connect: 🌍 My website - https://www.nischa.me 📧 My Newsletter - https://nischa.me/newsletter 📸 Instagram - https://instagram.com/nischa.me 🎥 Tiktok: https://www.tiktok.com/@nischa.me
TradeIQ
@TradeIQ•231K subscribers
Welcome to TradeIQ! On this channel I share different trading strategies for cryptocurrencies, stocks and forex. Subscribe to be profitable:) Financial Disclaimer: I am not a financial advisor. The ideas presented in these videos are personal opinions and for entertainment purposes only. You (and only you) are responsible for the financial decisions that you make. Ideas presented in these videos are my opinions at the date of filming and may have changed in the future.
NETWORK WALKS
@networkwalks•24.6K subscribers
We specialize in IT, Networking, Cisco CCNA, CCNP, Cyber Security, Ethical Hacking, Linux & Python Programming.
AC Trades
@ACTrades•4.32K subscribers
I trade stuff, I win only sometimes, and I try to bring as much value as I can :) My Free Newsletter: https://bit.ly/3G9Z3jw My Twitter: https://twitter.com/Austin_Clark_YT
ForexSignals TV

@ForexSignalsTV•431K subscribers
Our mission is to find talented traders and to give them the environment needed to achieve financial independence. Our trading coaches show you how to read charts, find trade opportunities and understand what moves the markets. We stream live every day in our trading room. Covering European, Asian and US trading sessions. Members have access to hundreds of educational videos, we teach proprietary trading strategies to all members, and give them access to exclusive Expert Advisors such us Momentum Meter, Pattern Scanner and Risk Management that we’ve developed to help traders effectively scan the market and execute trading ideas. With traders around the globe our members share and discuss trading ideas 24/7, they learn and trade together and win together. A vibrant and supportive community of traders is waiting for you inside!
NØMAD
@falkornomad•43.3K subscribers
Van Life, Foam Cabinetry, & Long Roads!
Integza

@integza•1.54M subscribers
Tomatoes are disgusting!
Joyplanes
@Joyplanes•208K subscribers
Joyplanes started as an RC community, building and flying RC airplanes, and drones, also explaining how they work, their history and much more. Now this channel has expanded into explainer animated videos not only talking about airplanes but just about any type of flying, orbiting, or levitating machine.
DarkAero, Inc

@DarkAeroInc•123K subscribers
Engineering the fastest, longest-range airplane you can build in your garage!
Retsetman
@retsetman9698•90.3K subscribers
Aeromarine Aircraft
@ChipErwinAeromarine•3.04K subscribers
Merlin E-AB/LSA and Merlin Lite Ultralight plus electric-power for aircraft. Electrolite electric-powered Part 103 ultralight 1450 and 750 floats For details visit www.aeromarine-lsa.com
Mark Pepke
@MarkPepke•4.01K subscribers
Videos of flying our Mooney airplane.
Experimental Airlines
@ExperimentalAirlines•49.9K subscribers
These days...whatever I feel like and have time for. May contain one or more of the following ingredients: RC aviation, drones, pellet gun shooting, science, travel, biology, medical coding, gluten, peanuts, beer.
Dan Johnson
@DanJohnsonAffordableAviation•10K subscribers
ByDanJohnson.com on YouTube covers Light-Sport Aircraft, light kit-built aircraft, and ultralight aircraft… all occupying the "affordable" end of aviation. Videos are generally short (3 minutes). Please visit ByDanJohnson.com for much more plus many resources useful to people interested in recreational or sport aviation.
Warped

@WarpedYT•1.43M subscribers
An Extreme Twist on Science and Engineering - (Previously Warped Perception) @Warped
Hummel Aircraft Company, LLC
@hummelaircraft•1.46K subscribers
Manufacturers of light sport and ultralight aircraft. Part 103 (Ultralights) do not require a license, read more below. www.hummelaircraft.com Kits and Ready to fly aircraft for sale right now! Build and fly your dream airplane today!
Experimental Aircraft Channel
@ExperimentalAircraftChannel•188K subscribers
To all Aviation Enthusiasts ... WELCOME! This channel is dedicated to exploring and showcasing the incredibly amazing hobby and passion of Experimental, Light-Sport and Ultralight Aircraft and more specifically Aircraft Building, Assembly and Construction. So join me as we meet new and unique individuals who share our passion as Builders, Owners and Flyers of Kit Aircraft. We will stop in to see what they are building, how they came to the decision to build that specific model and how they have enjoyed the journey thus far showcased as a "mini-documentary." I am located in Florida and welcome inquiries from anyone who is building, manufacturing/supplying, owning or flying their own aircraft and would like to be featured on this channel. https://www.experimentalaircraftchannel.com/ www.facebook.com/experimentalaircraftchannel www.instagram.com/experimentalaircraftchannel
RECESSIM
@RECESSIM•64.5K subscribers
RECESSIM (pronounced Ruh-Chess-Mmm) is Latin for "moving backwards" which is what we do when we Reverse Engineer. Have an interesting device you think should be featured in a video? Mail it to me! Business Inquiries: hash@recessim.com UPS/FedEx/DHL RECESSIM 7201 Virginia Pkwy Unit 6131 McKinney, TX 75071 US Postal Service RECESSIM PO Box 6131 McKinney, TX 75071
Ben Hansen
@benhansen5804•802 subscribers
AeroStuff FPV
@AeroStuffFPV•47.8K subscribers
This channel is created to share my growth in building & flying my own FPV Aircraft with the Experimental Airlines building techniques. I also upload instructional videos to share my own idea's to build FPV platforms of various configurations for experimental purposes and research (V-Tail Pushers, H-Tail Pushers, STOL, Solar Power, Flying Wings & more) Stay tuned, Subscribe!
Paul Elkins
@paulwelkinsdiy•140K subscribers
A showcase of my minimalist ideas ranging from trikes, bikes, boats, shelters and more.
StanleyProjects
@StanleyProjects•6.23K subscribers
The Engineering Mindset

@EngineeringMindset•3.91M subscribers
Subscribe now to gain core Engineering knowledge and skills through mind-blowing tutorials The Engineering Mindset was started in 2015 by its founder, Paul Evans. The mission was to help students, engineers and like-minded people learn technical engineering topics through short, simplified tutorials. Our goal is to be the number one resource and online learning tool for all aspects of engineering. We minimise technical jargon while using detailed illustrations and animations to help convey the essentials of each subject with on-demand, internet based, education. Our motto is simple: Simplify. Teach. Inspire. Some links displayed within the content are affiliate links and we may receive commission. Content is protected by copyright, it takes a great deal of time, money, effort and knowledge to produce. We issue copyright strikes against all channels using our content without permission.
Zen Electric Bikes
@ZenElectricBikes•813 subscribers
Welcome to Zen Electric Bikes, where we redefine urban mobility with our meticulously designed & developed products in Canada.🍁 The Ultimate E-Bike Experience🚲.Innovatively Crafted by a Guinness World Record Holder |Backed by Scientists 👨‍🔬 Embrace the ultimate in comfort & precision of your ride. Enjoy free shipping across Canada and the US. Your next urban adventure awaits!
EV - Customs
@EVCustoms•60.3K subscribers
Shaun Dobbie
@ShaunDobbie•9.74K subscribers
Different videos about batteries, renewables and other random stuff.
Star Union Europe
@starunioneurope793•318 subscribers
Star Union Europe introduces you to its channel. Starunion E-Bike Components Experts Established in 1985 European office in Germany Based in China
Wintergatan

@Wintergatan•2.7M subscribers
Music & Engineering, and sometimes some stupid ideas, or actually quite often :) Welcome! The Official Second Channel for Wintergatan: ► https://www.youtube.com/c/Wintergatan2021 WINTERGATAN RECORDS ►http://www.wintergatan.net/#/shop SPOTIFY ►http://bit.ly/2oKxXWd ITUNES ►http://apple.co/2ntWNsZ MUSIC DOWNLOADS ►https://wintergatan.bandcamp.com
Kevin Nealon

@KevinNealoncomedy•356K subscribers
I post a new hike EVERY OTHER THURSDAY with some of the most out of shape celebrities (but not all)! Join me every Thursday for my incredible hiking and revealing chats with some of the most breathless and impressive stars in the world!
Chris Titus Tech

@ChrisTitusTech•677K subscribers
Debloat Windows and Learn Linux Videos.
BPS.space

@BPSspace•746K subscribers
Space is the place
Isis Fashion Awards
@IsisFashionAwards•874K subscribers
Isis Fashion Awards https://isisfashionawards.com Designers Sign Up Here: https://isisfashionawards.com/signup Models Sign Up Here: https://isisfashionawards.com/signupmodels The Isis Fashion Awards is an international fashion competition that is organized in the Netherlands. During the competition designers showcase their designs on the catwalk in front of an audience and jury. Prizes are then awarded to the top three fashion designers. The “Underdogs” The Isis Fashion Awards is the first fashion show to exclusively focused on accessories, meaning the models do not wear clothing. Accessory designers are the “underdogs” in the fashion industry. Often all the attention and fame go to the clothing designers. Many accessory designers feel undervalued and “overlooked”, but with our IFA we plan to change this. By providing a unique platform for accessory designers.
Best Damn EDC [Taylor Martin]

@BestDamnEDC•408K subscribers
Best Damn EDC is the home of the EDC Weekly show and the best everyday carry community on the planet. Submit your EDC to get featured! http://edcw.co EDC gear news and deals http://bestdamnedc.com I'm constantly looking for up-and-coming or innovative everyday carry gear. If you've made something interesting or unique, you can ship it to me. However, due to overwhelming demand, sending a product does not guarantee coverage. Taylor Martin P.O. Box 102 Concord, NC 28026
speedkar99
@speedkar99•465K subscribers
Speedkar99 brings you videos on automotive repair and the reverse engineering of car parts. The aim of this channel is to present clear, concise and easy to understand information to arm those who aren't familiar with an automotive subject with enough knowledge to understand how it works or take on a DIY repair task at home. The approach is balanced between some explanation of engineering theory and with hands-on tutorials. This gives the audience a broad overview of how components fit and work together in a subsystem, technical knowledge and provide pointers on repairing your car and saving money. Knowledge is power, and by sharing this knowledge we can all learn, discuss and benefit. Enjoy!
The Serial Port
@theserialport•83.3K subscribers
The Serial Port is a virtual museum that highlights technology and people we find interesting from years gone by. We strive to preserve history of all types, both physical and digital as well as through the innumerable stories of the people that lived it. Got some retro gear to donate? Get in touch with us over email (see below "For business inquiries") or https://www.serialport.org
A Little More Dry Bar

@alittlemoredrybar•135K subscribers
All of the things you love about Dry Bar Comedy, plus a little more. Dry Bar Comedy is an Angel Studios Original Watch full Comedy specials on the Angel Studios App! https://www.angel.com/drybaryt
Riley's Lab
@WrylyRiley•2.54K subscribers
Quietly Confident Technology
@qctltd•406 subscribers
Restoration of antique
@restorationofantique•153K subscribers
Our channel restores old and antique items.
247printing
@247printing•72.5K subscribers
Hey, I am Albert! This channel is about 3D printing, 3D printers and more!
Stuart Tavener
@stav2421•441 subscribers
23degrees
@23degrees•579 subscribers
Weird and whacky, the world is off a bit. What can you do? Why is it this way?
Aptera
@ApteraMotors•69.5K subscribers
We're building a future where every journey is powered by the sun. Aptera is the most efficient Solar EV that requires no charging for most daily use.
Techquickie

@techquickie•4.33M subscribers
Ever wanted to learn more about your favorite gadgets or trending topic in tech? With a mix of humor, cynicism, and insight, Techquickie brings you the answers to all your tech questions every Tuesday and Friday. Sponsorship Inquiries: sales@linusmediagroup.com
Low Level

@LowLevelTV•818K subscribers
Videos about cyber security + software security | New videos every week
NesHacker

@NesHacker•106K subscribers
Videos that teach 8-bit hardware and software hacking by way of the original Nintendo Entertainment System.
Machining and Microwaves
@MachiningandMicrowaves•52.2K subscribers
Machining and Microwave/mmWave Radio experiments. Spy devices. 3D printed antennas. I design and make parts for experimental radio systems, scientific equipment and talk about unusual and cutting-edge topics related to high frequency electronics, antenna systems, waveguides, combiners, cavities, filters, digital comms, CAD, E-M simulation tools and microwave circuit design. I hold a licence which lets me transmit between 136 kHz and 1 THz. I carry out experiments including RF, plasma, high voltage, hard vacuum, precision machining, metrology and electrochemistry. I've worked with commercial sponsors to produce collaborative vids on specific products and services within my subject area and welcome business enquiries. I've also appeared on BBC2 TV with Prof Hannah Fry, demonstrating my replica of the Great Seal Bug spying device. Patreon https://patreon.com/MachiningandMicrowaves Buy me a coffee??? https://ko-fi.com/machiningandmicrowaves Neil Smith, Yorkshire, UK AWIN
Security Now
@securitynow•68.7K subscribers
Cybersecurity guru Steve Gibson joins Leo Laporte every Tuesday. Steve and Leo break down the latest cybercrime and hacking stories, offering a deep understanding of what's happening and how to protect yourself and your business. Security Now is a must listen for security professionals every week. New episodes every Tuesday on YouTube or get episodes ad-free by joining Club TWiT at https://twit.tv/clubtwit
SMG4

@SMG4•8.76M subscribers
Animated adventures of SMG4 and crew that started off as just one big meme but grew into something much bigger New Episodes every Saturday 9am PT BUSINESS: business@smg4.com MERCH: http://glitchproductions.store
Buildapreneur

@Buildapreneur•242K subscribers
This channel teaches you how to build a passive income with affiliate marketing. We go deep. We show screens. If you are someone looking to end your 9-5 job and you are willing to put in the work to make that happen. This is the channel for you. The journey starts with making your first few bucks online. We can help you with that. Next you will to learn to systemize that and make consistent money. We can help you with that. And finally you learn to turn on that money making machine that runs while you sleep. We can help you with that. Interested? Join the online community of passionate entrepreneurs in pursuit of TRUE passive income through affiliate marketing. ↓↓↓↓↓↓↓↓↓
Dividend Bull

@DividendBull•202K subscribers
Dividend Bull is all about pursuing high yielding investments. We're a group of investors that seek to pursue stocks and funds that offer above average dividend yields while attempting to minimize exposure to dividend cuts. We're fans of prioritizing the dividend income we receive from our portfolios and THEN capital appreciation. Typically, we seek a minimum dividend yield of at least 4% on all of our investments. Nothing on this channel is financial advice. The ideas presented on this channel are for entertainment purposes only, and/or are solely my opinions. No buy and sell recommendations are ever given.
Johnny Martinez
@johnnymmartinez•26.4K subscribers
Hey everyone! I'm here to teach people to get out of the 9-5 (if they so choose) and find their own more fulfilling path in life. The path is different for everyone and we're all at different stages in life, but whatever you do keep at it. Feel free to reach out to my email (I can't respond to everyone). For mentoring and consulting inquiries, and fees for such, reach out to me at johnnymartinez.com
The Action Lab

@TheActionLab•4.92M subscribers
The Action Lab is a channel dedicated to performing exciting experiments and answering questions you never thought to ask! Please enjoy as I answer the "what would happen if..." questions you have. Feel free to comment with any questions you have about anything. I have made my career as a PhD in Chemical Engineer and now I want to share how awesome science and experimentation can be!
zSecurity

@zSecurity•541K subscribers
zSecurity is a leading provider of ethical hacking and cyber security training, we teach hacking and security to help people become ethical hackers so they can test and secure systems from black-hat hackers. Our goal is to educate people and increase awareness by exposing methods used by real black-hat hackers and show how to secure systems from these hackers . Becoming an ethical hacker is simple but not easy, there are many resources online but lots of them are wrong and outdated, not only that but it is hard to stay up to date even if you already have a background in cyber security. At zSecurity we aim to put everything you need in one place, whether you need full training (online courses), hacking equipment or if you just want to stay up to date with the latest in ethical hacking world, you have it all in here. Community - zsecurity.org Company - zsecurity.com ZSVPN - zsvpn.com facebook.com/ZSecurity-1453250781458287 twitter.com/_zSecurity_ instagram.com/zsecurity_org
Ozillo News

@OzilloNews•1.61M subscribers
We do our best to deliver accurate information to our viewers as soon as possible. We inform the world about the data we collect from trusted sources and regional experts. Don't forget to follow us for the most accurate and objective news about the Russia-Ukraine war! We are Ozillo News.
NLRmedia
@NLRmedia•3.36K subscribers
This is the official YouTube channel of Royal NLR - Netherlands Aerospace Centre
Hobo Shoestring
@TheHoboShoestring•211K subscribers
I've been riding freight trains since 1989 and have since ridden over 2,700,000 of steel rails in 49 USA states, eight provinces of Canada and 14 states in Mexico. I spent my first 31 years homeless riding trains then last year I had to get a small apartment because of medical issues. It's very hard having walls and a roof because I prefer to be outside. I still stay gone riding more than I stay in the little apartment. Doing my best after getting hit by a car December 13 and ran over by a train October 2017. Hand and arm healed quite well! I now have a merchandise website at the below link: https://officialhoboshoestring.com Thanks for watching!
Clemens Elflein
@ClemensElflein•20.4K subscribers
Sam Beckman

@sambeckman•570K subscribers
My name is Sam Beckman. I’m a technology YouTuber and Video Producer with a passion for filmmaking. Respond to business inquires ONLY from business@samuelbeckman.com
Alt Comms
@altcomms•791 subscribers
Alt Comms is all about ham radio. If it involves RF, I'm in! I'm a licensed ham since I was 17 and I love experimenting and learning new things about this hobby. As the channel name says it, I'm here to show you an alternative method of communication in a fun and simple way. Also my goal is to get as many youngsters involved in this hobby and grow the ham radio community! 73's de George, YO9LIG! See you on the air!
PanoramaNOW
@panoramanoww•354 subscribers
Fun things to to in Northwest Indiana, Featuring Local Concerts, Theatre, Festivals, and Events in Porter County, Lake County and LaPorte County.
Aniela McGuinness
@AnielaMcG•40.4K subscribers
A Pretty Funny Actress ~I'm Fiery Ginger with a love of lascivious LAUGHS, a delight for getting my hands dirty and a rapture for reaping what I sow. Tune in for fun outdoor "How To" video, comic sketches, acting videos, and some honest Vlogs. http://www.imdb.me/Aniela
Allen Pan

@allenpan•2.22M subscribers
Failed Mythbuster RealBustedMerch.com
Jay Leno's Garage

@jaylenosgarage•3.8M subscribers
A new video every Monday! Visit Jay Leno's Garage, the Emmy-winning series where Jay Leno gives car reviews, motorcycle reviews, compares cars, and shares his passion and expertise on anything that rolls, explodes, and makes noise. Classic cars, restomods, super cars like the McLaren P1, sports cars like Porsche 918 Spyder and Camaro Z28, cafe racers, vintage cars, and much, much more. Subscribe for more: http://bit.ly/JLGSubscribe Episodes available for purchase. https://www.apple.com/itunes/
Inventor 101

@Inventor101•5.86M subscribers
Welcome to my DIY channel inventor 101, I will show you inventions and science experiments every week, Subscribe to the channel so you don’t miss out. Re-upload video is strictly forbidden in any form i will report to YouTube with out notice. Warning: have fun but always remember to be safe, anything you try is at your own risk, thank you... Subscriber milestones 100 - 1/4/19 5,000 - 26/4/19 50,000 - 3/7/19 100,000 - 13/11/19 200,000 - 23/1/20 300,000 - 4/2/20
Jessica Ashley Steele
@jessica_compassion_coach•39 subscribers
Hi, I'm Jessica, Founder, Self-Love Mentor & Relationship Coach at Compass[ion] Coaching. It's my mission to help others establish healthy self-love and dating practices.
Think Flight
@thinkflight•105K subscribers
This channel is dedicated to projects both big and small, from free flight to general aviation. YouTube challenged me to describe the purpose of the channel in five words, and I realized I could! This channel aims to Inspire, Educate and Entertain via Flight (oh wait that's six words). All ages welcome :). With every project I hope not only to increase the knowledge, abilities and inspiration of the viewer, but of my own. Think Flight: Lets start with the drones :) Consider becoming a Patron: https://www.patreon.com/user?u=65589116 As of 9/30/21 trying out a Discord server: https://discord.gg/b7BfHq2QJM
Graphene Manufacturing Group
@graphenemanufacturinggroup5402•2.26K subscribers
Graphene Manufacturing Group Ltd (GMG) is a clean-technology company that has developed and proved its own proprietary production process to manufacture Graphene powder from readily available low-cost feedstock. This process produces high quality, low cost, scalable, ‘tuneable’ and contaminant-free graphene. GMG’s focus has been developing applications for ENERGY SAVING AND ENERGY STORAGE SOLUTIONS. GMG’s product portfolio is Graphene value-added products | THERMAL-XR® HVAC-R ENERGY SAVINGS COATING, G™ LUBRICANT, G™ COOLANT, and GMG Graphene Aluminium-Ion Battery (with the collaboration of The University of Queensland). www.graphenemg.com | TSXV: GMG
Rebuild Rescue
@rebuildrescue•760K subscribers
Rescuing Abandoned and Forgotten things is what we do best !
ENDOPRYSM :
@ENDOPRYSMofficial•18.1K subscribers
For Business inquiries my email is endoprysm@gmail.com
Airplane Intel
@AirplaneIntel•21K subscribers
Airplane Intel- World Wide Aircraft Buyers Agent & Pre-Purchase Inspection Services Www.AirplaneIntel.com Support@airplaneintel.com
Side Project
@sideproject4028•1.88K subscribers
RCModelReviews
@RCModelReviews•268K subscribers
This is the YouTube channel of http://www.RCModelReviews.com RC Model Reviews brings you totally objective, unbiased in-depth reviews of RC products that are not compromised by commercial pressures. You'll also find a refreshingly open set of discussion forums, unfettered by the actions of power-mad moderators. http://www.RCModelReviews.com/forum If it sucks, I'll tell you. You'll also find a lot of "how does it work" articles that explain how things such as as Spread Spectrum, servos, batteries, and other pieces of RC equipment work. Subscribe to this channel now and bookmark the RCModelReviews website so you'll always be just a click away from the latest news, reviews and information about all things R/C.
Vintage Audio Addict
@vintageaudioaddict•55.8K subscribers
The Vintage Audio Addict channel on YouTube is a treasure trove for audio enthusiasts and vintage gear aficionados. Run by an vintage audio equipment collector, this channel delves into the repair, restoration, testing, and history of vintage audio equipment. Here’s what you can expect: 1. Content Focus: The channel primarily focuses on vintage audio gear, including amplifiers, receivers, tape decks, and more. Whether you’re a seasoned audiophile or just curious about classic audio technology, Vintage Audio Addict has something for you. 2. Videos: From troubleshooting common issues to showcasing rare finds, each video provides valuable insights. 3. Repair and Restoration: Vintage Audio Addict takes you through the process of repairing and restoring vintage equipment. You’ll see firsthand how these classic devices are brought back to life, often with meticulous attention to detail. Vintage Audio Addict explores it all.
High Voltage DIY Electric Bikes and Vehicles
@HighVoltageKits•11.2K subscribers
Everything E bikes and Light Electric Vehicles! The High Voltage E bikes channel is devoted to the building, maintenance and use of Electric Bikes and other Light Electric Vehicles (LEVs). Learn about all aspects of E bike building from choosing the right frame and motor combination to selecting a battery. This channel is a mix of inspiration and information to help you get you into the world of Ebikes & Light Electric Vehicles. If you enjoy the content of the Youtube channel you are welcome to join the wider community on Discord and the website. As well as getting help with your own project you can make some new friends and help out others with your own knowledge. For more information on High Voltage, who we are and what we do please see this link! https://highvoltagekits.com/who-we-are
Physics Girl

@physicsgirl•3.36M subscribers
Physics Girl is a YouTube channel created by Dianna Cowern that adventures into the physical sciences with experiments, demonstrations, and cool new discoveries. Physics Girl has videos for every atom and eve. Mailing address: Physics Girl PO Box 9281 San Diego CA, 92169
Vidduley
@Vidduley•19.8K subscribers
About me: I'm a high voltage engineering amateur, which means I'm interested in high voltages, high currents, plasma and gas discharges. My interests also include microwaves, electronics, electromagnetic phemomena in general, computer simulations, and all sorts of stuff regarding electricity and physics. On a professional side, I have a master's degree in physical electronics, and I'm currently physics grad student. I have professional experience with pulsed high voltages and currents, and with electromagnetic guided wave propagation and simulation. At this channel I don't rely on a fixed upload schedule, but rather make videos on inspiration, themed about various topics that are of interest to me at any given moment. So if you're new, don't be alarmed by very rare uploads, that's just how it goes here. Check out the community tab, sometimes I make posts there when there's not enough material for a separate video. Enjoy! Contact email: vidduleymail@gmail.com
teslista555
@teslista555•13.3K subscribers
Danger ! High voltage experiments and Tesla coils !
zilipoper
@zilipoper•26.4K subscribers
Vacuum Tube Tesla Coil
TheBackyardScientist

@TheBackyardScientist•6.15M subscribers
Aloha YouTubers, I am The Backyard Scientist! I like to make videos on all the crazy stuff I do. From exploding arrows, to making instruments, molten aluminum to science/chemistry experiments - I do it so you don't have to! I'm always thinking of more stuff to do, if you have an idea, id love to hear it!
Nerdforge

@Nerdforge•3.61M subscribers
We're the Nerdforge couple Martina & Hansi! instagram & twitter: @thenerdforge discord: discord.io/nerdforge
LabCoatz

@LabCoatz_Science•128K subscribers
LabCoatz is a science and engineering-based YouTube channel dedicated to bringing you amazing projects and scientific content that is hard to find on video anywhere else. We've filmed several YouTube-firsts (like its first look at both thioacetone and resiniferatoxin: the stinkiest and spiciest chemicals on Earth, respectively), and we don't intend to stop any time soon! This channel was founded on the idea that people shouldn't have to scour the whole Internet for the information they seek: they should have it all in one, concise video. Information should be easy to get, and fun to watch! And speaking of fun, we don't do your typical vinegar-and-baking-soda science here. Our science is a little more...mad! Boundaries were meant to be pushed, and this is the channel to push them! To advance, one must have full knowledge on how to advance. Knowledge is power. Those who possess knowledge have its power. And those who use that power can change the world.
Colby Johnson
@colbyjohnson2344•4.21K subscribers
Hobbyist with a passion for 3d printing, renewables and magnets.
Freshly Charged

@freshlycharged•466K subscribers
We showcase the coolest tech in the personal electric vehicle space. If it runs on electricity, we want to try it! This channel is a production of Just Create Ltd. in conjunction with Ride PEVs LLC. We participate in affiliate programs such as in Amazon Services LLC and ShareASale affiliate programs. Purchases made through our links help to support our channel and websites at no extra cost to you.
javidx9

@javidx9•323K subscribers
Programming and Technology Tutorials from a different perspective. Everybody has the ability to write good, useful and fun code. No hate, no patronising, just tech and code.
Sports Illustrated Swimsuit

@SISwimsuit•1.58M subscribers
Opening Eyes. Speaking Truths. Changing Minds. Check out the new SI Swimsuit 2023 issue HERE: https://swimsuit.si.com/ Follow us: IG: @SI_SWIMSUIT TikTok: @SportsIllustratedSwim
Null Byte
@NullByteWHT•947K subscribers
The official Null Byte channel for video content! We focus on creating videos for aspiring ethical hackers, computer scientists, and the infosec community.
Ralph S Bacon
@RalphBacon•55.2K subscribers
Arduino compatibles and other electronics for beginners! If you're getting started with the Arduino platform you'll be interested in my experiences as I investigate several 'building blocks' that can be attached to an Arduino module. I normally source these building blocks from the Far East (China, Malaysia) but sometimes from the UK. I'll also look at the very simple C++ code you'll need to get the Arduino's microcontroller (usually, but not always, an ATMEL MEGA328P) to 'do stuff' with the modules - much easier than you might think. Some simple electronics, analogue as well as digital, can go a long way in glueing components together so I'll explore these as they're needed for my projects. Any other interesting gadgets and gizmos that I might find along the way!
Tom Stanton

@TomStantonEngineering•1.43M subscribers
I graduated with a degree in Aerospace engineering and was sidetracked by the endless possibilities of 3D printing.
Matthew Heiskell
@MatthewHeiskell•12.1K subscribers
I like camping and exploring trails in my Subaru Forester. I also like RC airplanes, photography, and videography.
Naomi Wu
@Naomi-Wu•1.6M subscribers
I'm a tech and DIY enthusiast from Shenzhen, China. I like to show what life here is like here, review the latest cutting-edge tech from the "Silicon Valley of Hardware" and build awesome things in my livingroom workshop.
Anyone Can Build Robots!
@AnyoneCanBuildRobots•2.77K subscribers
We started ACBR! with three simple goals. The first was to make building exciting, engaging, and educational robots as simple as possible. The second goal was to make these robots affordable so that anyone regardless of the social, economic, or geographic barriers has the opportunity to learn about robotics. We believe that if you want to learn how to build robots, you should be able to do it! Our third goal is to give as many robotics kits as we can, away for free! That's why a large portion of all sales goes directly to providing STEM curriculum and robotics kits to students, schools, and other non-profit organizations for free!
Espressif Systems
@EspressifSystems•24.3K subscribers
This is the official YouTube Channel of Espressif Systems. Espressif was established in 2008 and has become a public (SSE: 688018.SH), multinational, fabless semiconductor company, headquartered in Shanghai, with R&D branches in mainland China, Singapore, India, Europe, and Brazil. As a complete-solution provider, we specialize in highly-integrated, low-power, Wi-Fi-and-Bluetooth SoCs. Our products include the well-known ESP8266, ESP32, ESP32-S, ESP32-C, and ESP32-H series of chips, modules and development boards, which already power millions of AIoT devices. At Espressif Systems, we have a passionate team of engineers and scientists focused on developing cutting-edge chipsets. We are committed to providing AIoT solutions that make wireless technology more power-efficient, robust and secure.
bitluni

@bitluni•289K subscribers
On bitluni's lab, you can find elaborate and funny tutorial videos about building gadgets. Nerdy entertainment guaranteed! Since this is my passion I started to do YouTube full time since August 2017. This way we can create more projects and you can enjoy a new video every week. Subscribe and get updated about building music instruments, synthesizers, home automation, 3D printers and tinkering stuff...
AVweb
@AVweb•230K subscribers
Aviation news and product reviews for pilots from http://www.avweb.com a fully independent online aviation news service serving more than 130,000 e-newsletter subscribers and attracting millions of hits, each month.
Branch Education

@BranchEducation•2.34M subscribers
How do Microchips work? How does your smartphone camera work? How does Bluetooth work? At Branch Education, we dive deep into the science, engineering, and technology in our modern world using 3D animation and incredibly detailed models. Founder of Branch Education: Theodore J Tablante Want to support in-depth engineering and technology education? Support us on Patreon: http://www.patreon.com/brancheducation Modeling is done in Blender 4.2.3 LTS Eevee and Cycles Render Engine, Adobe Premiere, and Reaper
Light Sport and Ultralight Flyer
@ultralightnews•92.4K subscribers
Light Sport Aircraft, Ultralight aircraft video, news, and information.
Electric Future

@ElectricFuture•304K subscribers
Plug into the future⚡️ Electric Future® is an independent media publisher that presents forward looking coverage of sustainable energy technology. Videos tagged “✓” in description are produced in collaboration with accredited scientists, engineers, and technicians with domain specific expertise and have been reviewed for factual accuracy. The operators of Electric Future may have material connection to organizations mentioned in video content. Sponsored content and financial interests will always be disclosed with an on-screen caption. The outcome of forward looking statements made by Electric Future involve significant risks and uncertainties and should not be used as the basis for any investment decision.
Ali Clarkson
@Ali_Clarkson•139K subscribers
Hi everyone and welcome to my channel! My name is Ali Clarkson and I'm a trials rider. I want to invite you to my office, wherever it may be. I'll be posting regular blogs with what I get up to, be it riding, travelling or chilling out. Please subscribe to show your support and I'll continue to make videos for you. Thanks Ali
James Bruton

@jamesbruton•1.37M subscribers
Former toy designer, current YouTube maker and general robotics, electrical and mechanical engineer, I’m a fan of doing it yourself and innovation by trial and error. My channel is where I share some of my useful and not-so-useful inventions, designs and maker advice. Iron Man is my go-to cosplay, and 3D printing can solve most issues - broken bolts, missing parts, world hunger, you name it. For business enquiries only, email below, otherwise check out my Facebook page, GitHub or Patreon.
𝑺𝒂𝒎𝒎𝒚𝒆𝒙𝒆♡
@sammerzexe•2.02K subscribers
Welcome to my weird ass channel Please don't take inspo of any kind from my original ocs! Pronouns are she/her
Miss Shaye St. John
@MissShayeStJohn•40.7K subscribers
HI EVERYONE! YES, I HAD AN ACCIDENT. AND YES I HAVE A BAND. AND YES MY DVD WILL COME OUT SOON. GAAAWD! HI EVERYONE, AGAIN!
eXploitation Network
@androidmayer•331 subscribers
Van Tech Corner
@VanTechCorner•27.8K subscribers
Welcome to Van Tech Corner - a small channel about Networking, Computer, IoT and Technology. I made tutorials (especially OpenWRT), review products and do some fun experiments on hardware. If there is any question related to the tutorial or the topic, you can leave it in the comment section or post it on the community group (the link can be found on the channel page) For business inquiry/ product review request, you can write to me at luong@dongvan.info ----------------------------------------- Chào mừng đến với Van Tech Corner - một góc nhỏ về Mạng, Máy tính, IoT và Công nghệ. Tôi làm các video hướng dẫn (đặt biệt là OpenWRT), đánh giá sản phẩm và một vài thí nghiệm về phần cứng. Nếu có bất kỳ câu hỏi nào liên quan đến bài hướng dẫn hoặc chủ đề, bạn có thể viết bình luận trên video hoặc tạo câu hỏi trong nhóm cộng đồng (liên kết có thể tìm thấy tại trang chủ) Với những liên hệ kinh doanh hoặc yêu cầu đánh giá sản phẩm, bạn có thể email cho tôi tại luong@dongvan.info
GBPPR2
@GBPPR2•27.9K subscribers
Homebrew amateur radio and electronics projects, plus a little old-school hacking/phreaking. Longer/censored videos are on the various backup channels. Based in Green Bay, Wisconsin. YouTube's comment system sucks, I hardly ever check them. Email if you need help (or whatever) right away. If your comment was "blocked," it's because YouTube thinks it's spam. Email: contact [at] gbppr.org
Pongfinity

@Pongfinity•4.58M subscribers
Pongfinity is a Finnish content creator team specialized in table tennis entertainment. The team consists of Emil, Otto and Miikka. Each team member has a background in the national team of Finland. Pongfinity brings you the most incredible and creative ping pong trick shots, behind the scenes and game-play -videos on Youtube. In the videos you can watch and learn how funny, challenging and versatile table tennis truly is! Make sure to subscribe to Pongfinity's Youtube channel so that you don't miss any of the new uploads!
Progressive Insurance

@progressive•90.8K subscribers
You might know us best for car insurance - and Flo, our friendly Superstore cashier - but Progressive actually offers a wide range of insurance choices, from auto and motorcycle insurance, to homeowners and renters insurance. And with our award-winning Web site and network of authorized independent agents, it's easy to shop for, buy, and manage your policy. Visit our website at https://www.progressive.com for more information on getting an insurance quote today!
Creative Cement
@CreativeCement•1.3M subscribers
New Mind

@NewMind•664K subscribers
For most of us, our average day is an experience unlike any other in human history. The world we interact with and engage with is a culmination of millennia of curiosity, probing and discovery. The story of how we got here, the layers of seeking and exploration; that are too often displaced as a triviality of life, is a massive part of the human story. New Mind is a celebration of that journey; the telling of slivers of that human story. Each composition is a careful telling of a slice of our technological world, exploring not just the “how it works” but the evolution of the why – the series of historical events that made it this way.
AustinMcConnell

@austinmcconnell•1.44M subscribers
Official channel for Gregory Austin McConnell - makin' moves since 1990.
Ratchets And Wrenches
@myRatchets•1.15M subscribers
I started this channel as a way of helping out my fellow DIYers and as time has gone by it seems to be becoming more and more of a passion. I enjoy helping people fix their cars or at the very least become familiar about what the things under their hood are and how they work :0 And as far as I am concerned we are just getting started, so put on your work clothes and subscribe.
NYC CNC

@nyccnc•452K subscribers
The NYC CNC YouTube channel focuses on all things CNC, including Fusion 360 CAD & CAM Tutorials and CNC Machining parts. As a self-taught machinists, we enjoy a positive, can-do attitude about learning how to use CAD and CAM software and how to always improve our CNC Machining skills as well as striving to be better manufacturing entrepreneurs.
Lucas VRTech
@LucasVRTech•199K subscribers
Bringing tomorrow's budget VR tech today.
TechBuilder

@TechBuilder•516K subscribers
Join me as I build fun and random weekend projects! Angelo Casimiro | Tech Savy | Filipino | Enthusiast
JD-DC
@jd-dc•2.82K subscribers
Making all kinds of ride on toys
TLDR Filmmaker
@TLDR_filmmaker•36.3K subscribers
Answers first, reasons later, but always still learning! TLDR Filmmaker strives to create fun and educational videos for aspiring filmmakers through gear reviews, movie reviews and filmmaking philosophies and theories. AMAZON **We are a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for us to earn fees by linking to Amazon.com and affiliated sites. EBAY **When you click on links to various merchants on this site and make a purchase, this can result in this site earning a commission. Affiliate programs and affiliations include, but are not limited to, the eBay Partner Network.
media.ccc.de
@mediacccde•234K subscribers
The real official channel of the chaos computer club, operated by the CCC VOC (https://c3voc.de) If you are missing a talk from a CCC event, you might find it already at media.ccc.de as we currently experiment with delayed publication on YouTube. Comments on videos are typically disabled as we do not have resources for proper moderation. If you actually want to reach the speakers we recommend to reach out via the contact details on their lecture slides.
HackedExistence
@HackedExistence•40.3K subscribers
http://HackedExistence.com This channel is dedicated to providing tutorials on current web programming and security trends, focusing mainly on the django web development framework, a python based hypertext preprocessor.
Modern Vintage Gamer

@ModernVintageGamer•872K subscribers
I love Modern, I love Retro. Tech, Hardware, Gaming
Domain of Science

@domainofscience•1.52M subscribers
Mapping all human knowledge
Joy of Bike
@JoyOfBike•136K subscribers
If bikes bring you joy...SUBSCRIBE! Yo! I'm Mike Murfitt, I make videos about bikes & the overwhelming joy they bring to life. Stoked you're here - let's ride! Contact: Mike@JoyOfBike.com Support the channel: www.TRACTION.coffee Instagram: Mike: https://www.instagram.com/mikemurfitt/ Joy Of Bike: https://www.instagram.com/joyof.bike/
DIY Perks

@DIYPerks•4.75M subscribers
I'm Matt, and here on DIY Perks you'll find plenty of interesting projects on a variety of topics! Want help with a project? The official forum is a perfect place to start! Don't forget to help others out with your knowledge, too! https://forum.diyperks.com We also have a live-chat Discord server so you can talk DIY to like-minded individuals! Check it out! https://discord.gg/diyperks If you need to get in touch with Matt directly for sponsorship enquiries, fan mail, or just to say 'hi' (no project questions please) then send an email to diyperks@gmail.com
Tech for Luddites
@TechforLudditesSira•156K subscribers
Talking about and Reviewing the Technology that makes our world go round. For Business Inquiries: tech4luddites@gmail.com
Cloudbeds

@Cloudbeds-hotel-software•9.99K subscribers
Founded in 2012, Cloudbeds is the hospitality industry’s fastest-growing technology partner, serving a global customer base of thousands of properties across 157 countries. Its award-winning Cloudbeds Hospitality Platform seamlessly combines operations, revenue, distribution, and growth marketing tools with a marketplace of third-party integrations to help hoteliers and hosts grow revenue, streamline operations, and deliver memorable guest experiences. Cloudbeds was named No. 1 PMS and No. 1 Hotel Management System by Hotel Tech Report in 2022, Best PMS and Best Channel Manager by the World Travel Tech Awards in 2021, and has been recognized by Deloitte’s Technology Fast 500 in 2021. For more information, visit www.cloudbeds.com.
Rob Rides EMTB

@RobRidesEMTB•1.05M subscribers
Welcome to my YouTube channel! I'm Rob, and I'm passionate about Electric Mountain Bikes. Here, you'll find a variety of exciting, informative, and entertaining weekly eBike videos that showcase the amazing world of e-mountain biking. On my channel, I'll be sharing in-depth reviews of the latest eMTBs on the market, along with tips and tricks for maintaining and optimizing your electric mountain bike. And if you're new to the world of eMTBs, fear not! I'll be providing helpful tutorials and guides to help you get started on your own electrifying journey. Trust me, once you've experienced the freedom and excitement these bikes offer, there's no turning back! So, buckle up, and join me on this incredible adventure as we uncover the limitless potential of e-mountain biking together. Don't forget to subscribe and hit that notification bell so you never miss out on the fun!
Mitch Murder
@mitch_murder•36.7K subscribers
i make tunes
Dom Whiting

@DomWhiting•312K subscribers
SIGN UP FOR RIDE ANNOUNCEMENTS https://www.domwhiting.co.uk/sign-up
LittleHarry
@LittleHarry15•787K subscribers
SUBSCRIBE, TURN ON THE POST NOTIFICATIONS & JOIN THE LH FAMILY!
3Dbotmaker
@3Dbotmaker•881K subscribers
The 3DBotMaker YouTube channel features 1/64 scale car racing, directed toward die-cast collectors and racing fans. We have 3 racing series: Tournament Series, Diecast Rally Championship, and the King of the Mountain modified car series. Our goal is to bring these little cars to life with high detailed track designs, and a video production level you might expect to see on a televised sports channel. The races are action packed and unpredictable with announcers providing a colorful play by play commentary. That’s why we call the 3DBotMaker channel, “The home of diecast sports action racing."
Simple Tek
@SimpleTek•121K subscribers
I started this channel to talk about Greenhouses and Garden growing technology as well as things related to that. I tend to focus on ways to grow food and simple gadgets related to Greenhouses and Gardens but will touch on alternative energy, esp related to off grid greenhouses and gardens. Everything I do here are projects you can do yourself at home.
Holly Lee
@HollyLeeCoaching•51.8K subscribers
I spent the last 20+ years in the high-tech industry. I have been a Global Recruiting Leader and Trainer for Amazon, Google, Facebook, and Microsoft. I know what recruiters and hiring teams look for and can help get you hired into these companies. Youtube channel has helped 6,000+ land a job at Amazon (90% | other FAANG 10%) since 2020. ☑ Learn how to land job interview invites with top-tier tech companies! ☑ Amazon Interview tactics and tips (STAR Method) for all FAANG Interviews! ☑ How to answer my top behavioral interview questions + EXAMPLES (FREE!) ☑ Check out my weekly LIVE Coaching Tuesday at 11:00 AM PST | 2:00 PM EST Business Page: https://www.hollylee.co/
ColdFusion

@ColdFusion•4.99M subscribers
Hi, my name is Dagogo Altraide and I create and narrate all the videos on here. This channel aims to let you experience the cutting edge of the world around us in a relaxed atmosphere. Learn the captivating stories about how our world came to be and also learn what's happening in the cutting edge today. --- New Thinking Book written by Dagogo Altraide --- Learn the stories of those who invented the things we use everyday. This book is rated the 9th best technology history book of all time by Book Authority! Audio Book: https://goo.gl/p8auh3 Get the book on Amazon US: http://bit.ly/NewThinkingbook Amazon India Link: https://goo.gl/qJCC1T Amazon UK link: https://goo.gl/RBxisf Ebook on Google Play: http://bit.ly/NewThinkingGooglePlay MERCH: INTERNATIONAL: https://store.coldfusioncollective.com/ AUSTRALIA: https://shop.coldfusioncollective.com/ Contact | *Business ONLY* dagogo@coldfusioncollective.com Join the fun on instagram: @ColdFusiontv Facebook | www.facebook.com/coldfusiontv
Helena Nista

@HelenaNista•635K subscribers
Adult stuff that they never taught you in school... I’m passionate about helping my clients become the best lovers they can possibly be, overcome any sexual difficulties and create great sex lives. Visit my website to learn more and to browse my online courses and services: https://helenanista.com/
TROYPOINT
@troypoint•365K subscribers
Big Technology On Small Budget! Implementing cutting edge technology for business and home doesn't need to be expensive!
RigReapers
@TheRigReaper•1.29K subscribers
Just a dude trying to help people catch more fish
STKO
@STKO2011•51.7K subscribers
Welcome to Shoot To Kill Outdoors YouTube channel. STKO mainly consist of family/friends producing action-packed videos of firearms, knives, hunting, fishing and basically anything to do with the outdoors all around the state of Indiana. If you like our content give us a thumbs up and don't forget to subscribe, we'll sub ya back!. Don't forget to check your subscriptions for the most up to date high quality uploads from us. Any questions about/for us please feel free to either comment on our videos or email us. Also check us out on Google+, Facebook, Twitter, and our very own website by clicking the links!!! Thank you for stopping by!
NJGW
@njgw1465•63.3K subscribers
Maker's Muse

@MakersMuse•1.14M subscribers
On Maker's Muse we aim to Empower Creativity through Technology. 3D Design and Printing Tutorials, Reviews and Projects. Join the Maker's Muse Community - https://www.makersmuse.com/maker-s-muse-community 3D Printing Quick Start Guide - https://www.makersmuse.com/fdm-fff-3d-printing-quick-start-guide 3D Printer Buyers Guide - https://www.makersmuse.com/purchasing-your-first-3d-printer-fdm-fff 3D Printing Essentials - https://www.amazon.com/shop/makersmuse 3D Printing Models - https://www.makersmuse.com/store Recommended 3D Printers - https://www.makersmuse.com/3dprinters Review status: CLOSED - NOT ACCEPTING NEW REVIEWS AT THIS TIME Promotion status: Contact us below for content sponsorship opportunities
justajolt
@justajolt•28.4K subscribers
Justajolt here! This is Nerf, seasoned with a healthy sprinkling of self deprecating humour, British sarcasm, down-to-earth humanity and as little money spent as possible. And stuff burning. Expect mods, makes, blaster abuse and destruction from sunny Leeds, UK! I love cramming the best Nerf guns with more IMRs than is healthy. It should be illegal. I'm coming for you, new Nerf blasters of 2021! I also publish handy, informative, serious mod and how to guides. And burn stuff. Uploads also include: Gear, loadouts, Nerf War footage and tactical chat about the regular Nerf events and UK Nerf Wars I attend (the funnest workout ever!) in Leeds and Bradford (West Yorkshire). And I burn stuff. It's all one big Nerf party in Leeds and Bradford! I've been inspired by Drac, Walcom, Coop72 and FDS; I've been well instructed on forums like Britnerf, Nerf Reddit etc... So I'm giving something back. I publish whenever I have something worth sharing. Enjoy! Justajolt ^_^
NileRed

@NileRed•8.58M subscribers
Capturing the natural beauty of chemistry I find that chemistry is often taught poorly or without a purpose. Because of this, people tend to lose interest and sometimes even start to hate it. In each video that I make, I try to balance theory with purpose. My goal is to capture the natural beauty of chemistry in fun and interesting ways. In terms of education, I have a BSc in Biochemistry, with a minor in pharmacology. However, I've always been a lot more drawn to applied chemistry. So after finishing my degree, I worked as a lab tech in an organic lab, and then as a chemistry grad student. However, I ended up leaving my graduate studies early to focus on this channel. Now, making chemistry videos has become my full-time job! Sponsorships and related business inquiries: nilered@endcard.com Other inquiries: admin@nilered.ca
How To Make Everything

@htme•1.81M subscribers
Today, getting what you need is as easy as a trip to the store; from food to clothing, energy, medicine, and so much more. Andy will discover what it takes to make everything from scratch. His mission is to understand complex manufacturing and production processes that are often taken for granted, doing it all himself. Each week he'll travel the world to bypass the modern supply chain in oder to harvest raw materials straight from the source. Along the way, he’s answering the questions you never thought to ask. Andy is learning How To Make Everything! Thank you to our patrons for making this series possible!
ZNA Productions

@ZNA_Productions•1.27M subscribers
"Shaping ourselves today, for a happier apocalypse tomorrow." In Jesus' name, amen 😤🙏 Meme heavy and wholly wholesome DIY and building content, with a little bit o' other stuff mixed in sometimes.
inventor719
@inventor719•312K subscribers
SUBSCRIBE for very frequent videos showing how to build awesome inventions! Lots of great ideas and I'm always looking for suggestions! Also have the odd gun review and explosions. Enjoy and subscribe :) 100,000
The Free Speech Club
@FreeSpeechClub•66.8K subscribers
The Free Speech Club is the largest campus-based Liberty organization in Canada! We are centred at the University of British Columbia, where we are dedicated to providing a platform for the greatest intellectual minds of our time. All of our content is original.
Scihouse
@scihouse4135•6.51K subscribers
dutchsinse

@dutchsinse•670K subscribers
since 2010 Dutchsinse Dutchsinse , also known as Michael Yuri Janitch, is a geophysics researcher from Saint Louis Missouri USA. Dutchsinse is known for discovering the flow of a seismic wave across plates, also known for developing (and publishing to the world) the "dutchsinse method" for forecasting earthquakes for anyone to test or repeat. ** DISCLAIMER ** All earthquake forecasts by Dutchsinse (Michael Yuri Janitch) are intended for informational purposes only, the theories, ideas, and information shown are presented for educational consideration by interested viewers only. All views expressed solely belong to the video maker, and are not intended for the public to act upon. All warnings, watches, and advisories are intended for viewer consideration only. ***
Dorian Wilson

@DorianWilson•265K subscribers
Videos on health and nutrition that take way too long to make.
eVTOL
@eVTOLmag•30.3K subscribers
Your definitive source for news and analysis on the electric VTOL and urban air mobility markets. Cleaner and quieter than helicopters, eVTOL aircraft promise to revolutionize how we live and travel. Subscribe to us here for a glimpse at the electric future of flight, and visit eVTOL.com for the news you need to be a part of this emerging industry.
Jonathan Hinman
@JonathanHinman•1.54K subscribers
Hello and welcome. I hope you enjoy yourself here. For it is a warm and silly place.
Open Lifestyle
@openlifestyle4198•7.12K subscribers
Love, Relationships and Lifestyle Design
DJ Electric Samurai
@DJElectricSamurai•632K subscribers
hi all. here i post all my video mixes !! every week i will post a weekly mix with my favourite tracks ( mix of new tracks with my personal favourite ones) for bookings contact me via mail electricsamurai.booking@gmail.com or via my facebook page https://www.facebook.com/deejee.esamurai
sexplanations
@sexplanations•1.12M subscribers
Sexplanations is sexedutainment for the universe hosted by Dr. Lindsey Doe, doctor of human sexuality and clinical sexologist. It is produced by Maia Ledesma and Alex Salvador. Like much of YouTube EDU, Sexplanations shares bursts of incredible knowledge while inspiring the audience to stay curious. The most viewed episode is Vagina Toys, followed Pelvic Exam, Anal Sex, Masturbation, and Consent. The channel has covered over 444 topics and has reached over 190 nations. It's in its 10th year and second season of continuing shame-free, comprehensive efforts to educate on everything sex. Stay curious!
BrainfooTV

@BrainfooTV•3.3M subscribers
Welcome to BrainfooTV I make things large and small to educate and entertain, hopefully both at the same time. If I can inspire someone to build or think about building something cool my work is done. You can follow me at... Email business enquiries only : hubsmedia@gmail.com WARNING!!! On occasion some of my videos may contain an element of danger that may be direct or indirect to yourself or others. I am at no time asking you to replicate anything you see me do, it is for education and entertainment only. If you copy anything you see in these videos, you do so entirely at your own risk.
Ed Sheeran

@EdSheeran•56M subscribers
Ed Sheeran x +-=÷× (Tour Collection: Live) | Out Now
ChrisFix

@chrisfix•10.6M subscribers
Learn how to fix your own car with my easy to follow, step-by-step how to style videos for both beginners and experts. Save money, know the job is getting done properly, and feel great after you fix your own car! I publish new long-form videos twice a month so stay tuned! I take a lot of pride in my "How to" videos because I like to help others learn how to fix their car. I film, edit and publish each video on my own. They are concise with all of the essential information so anyone can follow along and fix their car from beginners to experts. I have had many viewers comment and let me know how I have taught them how to fix their car themselves and save them $$$ and I love it! Comment, like and subscribe! Let me know what you think! Also, you can follow me on Facebook, Twitter, and Instagram to get updates, quick-tips, and ask questions (links below) ChrisFix LLC 2025
rik diy IOT
@rik.diy.iot94566•69 subscribers
Hey DIYers and tech fans! I'm Rik, and "rik.diy.IOT" is where I'll share my passion for innovation and home projects. From aquaponics to 3D printing to automation with sensors and a lot of things in beween, we'll explore the world of DIY IoT together. I'll be open about successes and challenges, believing we learn from both. Why do I do it? Because I think makers like us can change the world. Join me, whether you're a seasoned pro or just starting out. Let's learn from each other, inspire, and maybe make a difference. Hit subscribe and let's dive in!
BenFootball18
@BenFootball18•388 subscribers
K6UDA
@K6UDA•45.8K subscribers
Welcome to K6UDA Radio, the ham radio show your mother warned you about. This is mostly a fun light hearted look at the world of amateur radio. Reviews, how too & some of my edgy humor thrown in for sh#ts & giggles.
Nathan Holn
@509rifas•1.96K subscribers
This is a channel of stuff I do, mostly.
Tech Ingredients
@TechIngredients•1.05M subscribers
Computerphile

@Computerphile•2.51M subscribers
Videos about computers & computer stuff. Supported by Jane Street - https://jane-st.co/computerphile Sister channel of Numberphile.
Lewi Pilgrim
@LewiPilgrim•45.3K subscribers
Yo man! I'm professional freestyle MTB champion, Sam Pilgrim's little brother! I'm 19 years of age and I film most of my brothers videos! Expect to find some cool filming and photo tutorials and tips along with some cool BMX and MTB videos! Check out Sam's channel to the right of this page, over near related channels. Enjoy the content :) For webgains staff: ""
Martin Bradshaw
@MartinBradshaw1981•333 subscribers
Martyn Ashton
@AshtonBikes•47.3K subscribers
Riding bikes, doing stunts and generally enjoying sport of all kinds, but especially the more adrenaline focused action.
Danny MacAskill

@Danny_MacAskill•526K subscribers
Danny MacAskill's official YouTube Channel http://www.dannymacaskill.co.uk http://dropandrolltour.com For any Press / Business Enquires please contact rasoulution GmbH Tel: +49(0)89/3866709-0 Email: danny@rasoulution.com Website: www.rasoulution.com Address: Karl-Theodor-Str. 55 80803 Munich Germany For any Drop and Roll Tour Booking / Press Enquires please contact : dropandroll@rasoulution.com
physicsfun

@physicsfun•610K subscribers
This channel is all about physics. Physics describes the real magic of the universe. To obtain these physics toys visit www.physicsfunshop.com Like, share and subscribe to stay in touch with me. also follow me on instagram for daily uploads @physicsfun For any issue please contact me at -- physicsfun007@gmail.com ***************** 1st video - 17 Dec 2016 1 subscriber - 17 Dec 2016 50 subscribers - 9 Jan 2017 100 subscribers - 2 April 2017 500 subscribers - 8 March 2018 1k Subscribers - 13 June 2018 5k subscribers - 5 July 2018 10k subscribers - 13 July 2018 25k subscribers - 5 Sept 2018 50k subscribers - 20 Oct 2018 100k subscribers - 4 Jan 2019 250k subscribers - 23 Feb 2020 500k subscribers - 14 Mar 2022 🎉 1 MILLION SUBSCRIBERS - .................. ➡️1st video that cross 1 million views - Amazing science toys/gadgets || 6 (15 july 2018) ➡️1st video that cross 10 million views - Amazing Physics Toys/Gadgets 1 (15 Apr 2022)
The Hook Up

@TheHookUp•525K subscribers
The Hook Up is a channel dedicated to the latest smart home gadgets and technology. The channel contains product reviews and tutorials related to smart home equipment.
Andreas Spiess

@AndreasSpiess•496K subscribers
Small electronic projects, tutorials, and reviews for sensors, ESP8266, Arduino, Raspberry Pi, and ESP32
BuildAModule
@buildamodule•5.93K subscribers
This channel contains an entire archive of the full 2000+ BuildAModule video library. Videos are divided into playlists that align with "collections" from the original BuildAModule site. I am releasing these videos for free in the process of sunsetting the BuildAModule site. I am honored to have had the chance to connect with so many learners throughout the years, and this is my gift to those of you who might still find useful tidbits here and there.
Node-RED
@Node-RED•19K subscribers
Hi there! This is the official channel of the Node-RED project! What's Node-RED? It's an open-source low-code tool for creating event-driven applications. Built on top of node.js, it provides a light-weight, browser-based editor that makes it easy to integrate different streams of both physical and digital events. Its light-weight nature makes it ideal to run at the edge of the network, such as on a Raspberry Pi, but also well suited to running in the cloud. It provides a framework for easily adding new nodes into its palette to extends its capabilities. Originally developed by the IBM Emerging Technologies team, it is now a project of the OpenJS Foundation. This channel is where we'll share tutorials, walk-throughs and general updates about the project. Or at least, that's the theory.
Boris “Sudokin” Dusnoki
@dusnoki•4.26K subscribers
Web developer, electronics hobbyist, guitar enthusiast and traveler.
Jhordan Chávez
@jhordanchavez9557•1.98K subscribers
Eamon & Bec

@eamonandbec•1.27M subscribers
simply living ✨ Instagram: @eamonandbec For Business Inquiries please email business@eamonandbec.com
Project Veritas

@veritasvisuals•1.32M subscribers
Investigative journalists exposing corruption in government, media, big tech, politics, education, and beyond through undercover video. Our investigations create an uncontainable firestorm of press coverage that energizes the public to call for accountability from their leaders. Corruption is exposed, leaders resign, and organizations are shut down by those in power. We are a 501C3 nonprofit funded by patriots worldwide. HELP EXPOSE CORRUPTION AT ANY COST: https://www.projectveritas.com/donate
Opto Video
@Opto22•29.5K subscribers
Opto 22 is a Temecula, California-based manufacturer of hardware and software products that link all kinds of electrical, mechanical, and electronic devices and machines to networks, computers, servers, and cloud services. Our products are primarily used for industrial automation, IIoT, digital transformation, Industry 4.0, remote monitoring, and data acquisition applications.
The Proper People

@TheProperPeople•1.52M subscribers
We are two friends, Bryan and Michael, who travel in search of abandoned buildings to explore and photograph. We film our adventures to share with the world.
The Singletrack Sampler

@The_Sampler•598K subscribers
Hey! My name is Alex, and here on my channel I show you how I strive to live life FREE of constraints and full of BIKES! Come learn how I travel everywhere and ride my bikes anywhere!! My mission: inspire more people to get outside and enjoy an active lifestyle! Business inquiries: singletrack@honestinfluence.io You can support my content & get exclusive videos here: http://patreon.com/singletracksampler Shop Singletrack Sampler merch here: https://cognativemtb.com/collections/the-sampler-collection google74d267c24ae5cd38.html
China Cycling
@ChinaCycling•66.4K subscribers
Business enquiries only: joe@pandapodium.cc A channel dedicated to cycling in China. Featuring reviews of Chinese cycling products. breakdowns of Chinese races, DIY guides, the occasional VLOG and guides on how to cycle in China.
The Nimitz Encounters
@TheNimitzEncounters•46.7K subscribers
The Nimitz Encounters - Documentary Films By Dave Beaty The Channel will host my films, created entirely by myself. The first release is The Nimitz Encounters, and it's a short documentary re-creating the UFO sightings from Nimitz in 2004. I created all the CGI, most of the music and Voice Overs. Featuring advanced CGI and public domain footage, a mysterious and unexplained story sure to leaving you wondering. Copyright © Dave Beaty 2019 www.thenimitzencounters.com Description On the morning of November 14th, 2004, 90 miles of the coast of California near San Diego, the Nimitz Carrier Strike Group was conducting routine training and aerial defense exercises. No one could have known what would soon confront the sailors and naval aviators of the Black Aces Fighter Squadron. Unknown craft would appear that forever changed those that encountered them. The answers to the question of “what are they?” remains unknown. After 13 years of cloaked secrecy this True Story can finally be told.
exurb1a
@Exurb1a•2.92M subscribers
Universe is weird, yo. Second channel for silliness ► https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCcoO-8J0EYQHGPFQqwmAzVQ Books what I wrote ► https://tinyurl.com/ycnl5bo3 T-shirts, mugs, and sadness ► https://teespring.com/stores/exurb1a Discord server ► https://discord.gg/76ybBSR Like shit music? I attempt to make that ► https://soundcloud.com/exurbia-1 Facebook ► https://www.facebook.com/exurb1a/ Patreon ► https://www.patreon.com/exurb1r?ty=h For sending me personalised insults, please direct them at: exurb1achannel@gmail.com
Steve Mould

@SteveMould•3.3M subscribers
I make videos about science. I also write books! You can get them here: https://stevemould.com/books You can support me on Patreon here: https://www.patreon.com/stevemould You can discuss my videos on reddit: https://reddit.com/r/SteveMould For sponsorships and brand deals please email stevemould@zigguratxyz.com To get in touch with me about anything else visit https://stevemould.com/contact
Brew

@Brew•2.05M subscribers
Solving mysteries, one cup at a time ☕️
EXPLORIST life Mobile Marine & Off-Grid Electrical

@EXPLORISTlife•280K subscribers
EXPLORIST.life’s mission is to provide the most complete and easily understandable mobile, marine, and off-grid electrical education for beginners, aspiring professionals, and professionals to gain actionable skills to design and install electrical systems for vans, RVs, skoolies, expeditions trucks, boats, and off-grid cabins.
Lindsey Stirling

@lindseystirling•14.3M subscribers
I love to play the violin, dance, write music, edit videos, play dress up, and perform. So, I combined it all together and this is what happened. :) Subscribe to my channel and be updated when I release new music! For booking or other business inquiries, http://www.lindseystirling.com/contact Play some Lindsey trivia: https://found.ee/LS_Trivia_yta
Dude Perfect

@dudeperfect•60.8M subscribers
5 best buds just kickin' it. If you like Sports + Comedy, come join the Dude Perfect family!
ERB

@ERB•15M subscribers
The Epic Rap Battles of History is a comedy series created by Nice Peter & epicLLOYD. Over 10+ years we have created over 80 rap battles featuring both historical and fictional characters which have amassed over 3.5 billion views on YouTube. http://www.erbofhistory.com http://www.patreon.com/erb http://www.erbmerch.com
GurgleApps
@GurgleApps•9.49K subscribers
🌟 Welcome to GurgleApps 🌟 Meet us, 3 siblings driven by creativity and innovation. 🎥 Captivating Content: Dive into a world of DIY projects, insightful tutorials, & tech innovations crafted to ignite curiosity & inspire your creativity. 💡 Tech Explorers: Join us as we unravel the potential of RaspberryPi, RP2040 boards like RaspberryPi Pico and Tiny2040, ESP32, and ESP8266. Explore our "How-to" videos, complete with MicroPython, CircuitPython, or C++ code for your own experimentation. 🔬 Science & Creativity: Beyond gadgets, we explore the fascinating intersection of science, weaving Physics & Maths projects into our repertoire to spark your imagination. 🕒 Weekly Live Streams: Don't miss our weekly Sunday live streams! Engage with us, get behind-the-scenes insights, & enjoy sneak peeks of upcoming projects. Keep an eye out for our weekly promos – surprises await! 👍 Spread the Joy: Like, comment, & subscribe to our channel to join our community of creators and innovators.
Bitcoin Trading Challenge
@bitcointradingchallenge3861•73.8K subscribers
I'm a Cryptocurrency Day Trader with a passion for educating others about the market. The channel includes various types of cryptocurrency market analyses including technical, fundamental, sentiment analysis as well as market-neutral strategies. Happy Trading. If interested in trading lessons from me, go to bitcointradingpractice.com. If interested in contacting me for speaking engagements or other inquiries, email me at blsbear@gmail.com.
Jeremy Fielding

@Jeremy_Fielding•1.08M subscribers
My goal is simple. Draw people to engineering with interesting projects; Inspire them with ideas; Then teach them how to do it. I am fascinated with all things mechanical, but most of my projects require multiple disciplines. So, you will also see electronics, motors, and fabrication techniques. I am just as likely to talk about some interesting engineering I saw in a factory tour or walking through a store as I am to build something. If you would like to contribute to future projects please check my Patreon page. https://www.patreon.com/jeremyfieldingsr Please use my website, to contact me. www.jeremyfielding.com
💰Scrembo Paul🥂
@ScremboPaul•33.5K subscribers
What's up great folks! Scrembo here from Emotionless Crypto Trading since 2014 fulltime hundreds of millions , happy to flip NFTs on thousands of ethers a week and push my limits to inspire people, students as a mentor of trading,NFTs and life. binance futures,binance futures trading strategies,binance futures trading for beginners,binance us,bybit,bybit trading,ftx us,ftx us trading,ftx us tutorial,binance trading,how to trade,scalping bitcoin,binance futures trading,scalp bitcoin,trade bitcoin for beginners,bitcoin trading
Bulletproof
@Bulletproofexec•195K subscribers
Fuel your journey with Bulletproof. We provide clean coffee, keto-friendly snacks and proven supplements. Our approach to nutrition helps transform the way you feel. Connect with us on social media for quick updates and the newest health and wellness tips: Facebook - facebook.com/bulletproof Twitter - @BPNutrition Instagram - instagram.com/bulletproof
ORACLE FAST MONEY TRADER
@ORACLEFASTMONEYTRADER•45.9K subscribers
ORACLE TWITTER https://twitter.com/OracleFastMoney Oracle Personal Trade Lesson https://www.omaxcrypto.com/special Bitunix Crypto Exchange https://tinyurl.com/5e64eufz Fybit Bitcoin Exchange https://fybit.com/Account/Register/B8QQO BINGX Leverage Stocks/Alt coins here https://bingx.com/partner/Oracle (open to us) Join my email group inside information first https://www.omaxcrypto.com/3 Follow me on uncensored RUMBLE to see videos first! Use google to log in, then "follow" so you are updated to new video releases. https://rumble.com/user/ORACLEFASTMONEYTRADER Oracle telegram = https://t.me/ORACLEFASTMONEYTRADE
kiwami japan

@kiwami-japan•3.47M subscribers
How to Sharpen a Kitchen knife, Whetstone,Experiment,Chemistry,
Bite-sized Philosophy
@BitesizedPhilosophy•534K subscribers
These clips are carefully edited from the full lectures. I watched every single Dr. Peterson lecture at least twice. I hope people can benefit from the unhealthy amount of time and effort I have put into this channel. The clips are easy to share and easier to get into than the full length lectures, but they are not a substitute. Every clip has a time stamped link in the description to the according lecture.
Kung Fu Nerd
@Kungfunerd•15.6K subscribers
Hello and Welcome! This Channel is dedicated to personal development using body arts, movement, calisthenics, yoga, and martial arts. A seed never sees the flower. We always start where we are. Believe in yourself and don't expect anything overnight. Take the time to care and love yourself through the development and maintenance of your greatest tool and gift, your body. Cultivate the mind through daily practice and awareness of the breath. Connect with Us online Online Training : https://kungfunerd.vhx.tv Support My Movement : https://www.patreon.com/kungfunerd Website : http://www.kungfunerd.com Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/kungfunerd Twitter: https://www.twitter.com/thekungfunerd
Raphael Treza

@RaphaelTreza•498K subscribers
I make films about nature and culture, welcome to my channel! Subscribe - Support me on Patreon, original content: https://www.patreon.com/raphaeltreza - Follow me: https://www.instagram.com/raphaeltreza - Soundtracks: https://open.spotify.com/artist/3O3ivDvwNrLUFeNoYjeXP5?si=gUgWrdP4RAm4mQspQVpQIg
Joaquin Roibal
@JoaquinRoibal•6.28K subscribers
Hello and thank you for visiting my channel! The primary topic of my videos is centered around cryptocurrency, specifically development of crypto trading bots. You may like my channel if you are interested in cryptocurrency, bitcoin, or python programming, because we discuss these three topics very consistently. In this channel I will show you how to profitably trade Cryptocurrencies, and the latest strategies employed by professional crypto traders.
Skrillex

@Skrillex•20.3M subscribers
Sonny Moore aka Skrillex is a record producer, DJ, musician, singer & songwriter hailing from Los Angeles who has won 8 Grammy Awards, been named MTV's Electronic Dance Music Artist of the Year, & holds the record for most Grammys won by an electronic artist. His recent collaborations include some of the most forward-thinking and avante garde voices in music such as Fred again.., Four Tet, Bladee, Yung Lean, Missy Elliot, Kid Cudi, Chief Keef, & others. In February of 2023, Skrillex, Fred again.., & Four Tet decided to do a surprise pop up inside NYC's legendary Madison Square Garden with tickets selling out within minutes of announcement. Skrillex shocked fans by dropping an additional surprise album, Don't Get Too Close, in the middle of his performance and bootleg CD copies of the project were given out to attendees at the end of the night. While there is no clear end in sight, one thing that's certain is that Skrillex's new music continues to elevate the landscape of music.
We Plants Are Happy Plants
@wpahp•168K subscribers
Uplifting music and spiritual videos. Documentaries and short videos about Terence McKenna. We Plants Are Happy Plants is the alchemically electronic music project of Peter Bergmann from Budapest, Hungary. If you enjoy the content on this channel please support me on iTunes or Spotify NEW ALBUM "Empowering Hope In Dark Times" out now! https://open.spotify.com/artist/5BqIQsFQz40YNkLMb8578S?si=Ug-I8HonSGC-_8z16I2fwQ "Music is a higher revelation than all wisdom and philosophy." - Beethoven Check out my remixes for Daft Punk, Radiohead, Hans Zimmer and many others and my own music consisting of 5 albums available on iTunes, Spotify and most other services. Please subscribe, thanks for watching! Support: https://patreon.com/wpahp NOTE: If you think I used your art, footage or any kind of content please reach out to me so I can give proper credit, I've created hundreds of videos and it's difficult to credit every artist but I'm trying my best! Peter Bergmann / We Plants Are Happy Plants
Technology Connections

@TechnologyConnections•2.74M subscribers
The Good Stuff

@TheGoodStuff•245K subscribers
The Good Stuff is mini-documentaries and video essays, intertwining education, entertainment, and plain, unadulterated curiosity. We talk to experts in their field and get the lowdown on the latest breakthroughs in science and technology while exploring the vast complexities of modern civilization and human society. We don't pretend to have any answers but we might brush up against a few along the way. Heck, we might just learn something.
ConspiracyBox
@ConspiracyBox•62K subscribers
Look Into It
Charisma on Command

@Charismaoncommand•6.92M subscribers
Want to be more charismatic and confident? We make videos to help you learn how to be more confident, how to make people laugh, how to be more likable - basically everything about exuding charisma. Relationships in life are everything, so we want to teach you to turn on your most confident, charismatic self in the moments that matter most. For Charisma University, go to https://www.charismaoncommand.com/c-university/ For sponsorships, please submit your information here https://www.charismaoncommand.com/sponsorships/ Thanks!
Real Engineering

@RealEngineering•4.73M subscribers
The home of innovation
GreatScott!

@greatscottlab•2.04M subscribers
Awesome Electronics Tutorials, Projects and How To´s WARNING!: DO NOT SEND MAIL TO THE ADDRESS GIVEN BY THE IMPRINT! Imprint/Impressum: GreatScott! c/o Block Services Stuttgarter Str. 106 70736 Fellbach WARNING!: DO NOT SEND MAIL TO THE ADDRESS GIVEN BY THE IMPRINT! Disclaimer: The shown videos are for educational & entertainment purposes only. Use the given information at your own risk. Do not work beyond your capability and always hire a professional if you are not sure what you are doing. Remember: Safety first!
Kamots Talks Tech
@KamotsTalksTech•778 subscribers
Videos about technology. My day job is in IT Security but I enjoy programming and electronics as a hobby. I also like to teach others about technology which is why I started this YouTube channel. If you would like to support my channel please subscribe and check out my Amazon wish list linked below. Thank you!
We Discover
@we-discover•518K subscribers
Interesting unique videos to learn and discover new things
ID-ID Electro Musics
@IDIDElectroMusics60•166K subscribers
TheUrbanPrepper

@TheUrbanPrepper•295K subscribers
My YouTube channel features emergency preparedness topics and related gear reviews. Since I live and work in the greater Seattle area, my focus is on “Urban” preparedness and not on Rural environment related concepts. My goal is to provide video content that is family-friendly, entertaining and accessible to a wide audience. I work in software engineering, so many of the projects and gear testing that I upload to YouTube leverage engineering skills; planning, organization, scientific method testing and documentation. I try to treat all of my large projects or “kits” as open-source projects that viewers can leverage and customize to their own set of needs. TheUrbanPrepper is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com. As an Amazon Associate I earn from qualifying purchases.
SirArd “Realm of Trance” O
@sirardo4921•72K subscribers
Trance is for the dreamers. Check out my 8tracks profile for more! http://8tracks.com/sirard
Ze Frank
@zefrank•4.2M subscribers
Shirts and merch! https://ze-true-store.myshopify.com/ https://www.patreon.com/truefacts
Universe Inside You

@UniverseInsideYou•2.07M subscribers
Welcome to Universe Inside You, the ultimate sanctuary for those who seek to unravel the mysteries of our forgotten past and the cosmic connections that shape our existence. In our quest for enlightenment, we step into a world of exploration where we dive deep into the realms of lost ancient civilizations, forbidden archaeology, extraterrestrial encounters, UFO sightings, and the hidden knowledge that has shaped our existence. We are committed to shedding light on the hidden truths that challenge conventional understanding with captivating documentaries that are the result of rigorous research. Subscribe and hit the notification bell to join our community of truth-seekers, explorers, and those hungry for knowledge. We invite you to expand your horizons, challenge your perceptions, and venture into the uncharted territories of human history, uncovering the secrets of our lost past and our connections to the cosmos.
alyankovic

@alyankovic•2.91M subscribers
Comedy / Parody / Satire
Comprehensive Research, Inc.
@comprehensiveresearchinc.8921•6.93K subscribers
Seeker

@Seeker•5.04M subscribers
Seeker is now part of The Verge. Stay tuned for new topics, faces, and much more. https://www.theverge.com/
SpaceX

@SpaceX•6.78M subscribers
SpaceX designs, manufactures and launches the world’s most advanced rockets and spacecraft.
Make Cool Stuff
@MakeCoolStuff•7.24K subscribers
Make cool stuff! Robot combat, fighting and more!
Practical Engineering

@PracticalEngineeringChannel•4.27M subscribers
Practical Engineering is all about infrastructure and the human-made world around us. It is hosted, written, and produced by civil engineer, Grady Hillhouse. We have new videos posted every first and third Tuesday, so please subscribe for updates. Practical Engineering: Deciphering Our Constructed World CONTACT --------------------------------------------- Questions/Topic Suggestions: https://practical.engineering/about Sponsorship/Business Inquiries: See below
After Skool

@AfterSkool•3.57M subscribers
We cannot change the world. But we can change ourselves...and that will change the world. The goal of this channel is to empower the individual and deliver profound ideas through art. Everyone is welcome to contribute. If you have a good idea for an animation please send them to Mark at AfterSkool100@gmail.com
styropyro

@styropyro•2.68M subscribers
I'm a science maniac that loves building huge lasers and playing with electricity and chemicals. Officially I am a chemist, but I get my hands dirty in all aspects of mad science. When it comes to building stuff, I'm certainly an "old school" kind of maker as I'd rather use a hacksaw and soldering iron than design 3D parts on a computer. I started this channel in 2006 and handle all of the building, filming, and editing by myself. This means you'll never get a set upload schedule. :D What I lack in video editing skills I try to make up with crazy and original content! Need help with a project? Or do you just want to chat about science projects with other tinkerers? If so, join my Discord server! There are TONS of knowledgeable members there, so if I can't help with a question, they can! It really is an amazing community. https://discord.gg/ckGrMDR
CycleTech
@CrankCyclingChannel•4.51K subscribers
Cycling products and reviews. All cyclists should subscribe to the CycleTech TV.
Risch Enterprizes
@Rischenterprizes•762 subscribers
awesome videos of CNC processes, manufacturing, fabrication, and products! more videos and products coming soon!
John Krehbiel
@johnkreh•186 subscribers
StringbikeChannel
@StringbikeChannel•2.44K subscribers
Super Chef
@superchef5722•142K subscribers
AmazingScience
@AmazingSC•646K subscribers
Hello! My name is AmazingScience. I'd like to discover new science world. Thank you for visiting my channel!
AerospaceControlsLab
@AerospaceControlsLab•17.1K subscribers
Stephen Chapman
@StephenChapman•50.6K subscribers
Welcome to my channel! Here, you'll find tutorials related to reverse engineering, programming, general hacking/tooling, and much more.
Laina

@laina•1.23M subscribers
Business: lainambusiness@gmail.com
Be Smart

@besmart•5.35M subscribers
We give you deep answers to simple questions about science and the rest of the universe. And also dad jokes. Be Smart is hosted by Joe Hanson, PhD. He's a molecular biologist and an award-winning science communicator and journalist Have ideas or questions? Visit our website to get in touch: https://www.itsokaytobesmart.com/
FightMediocrity

@FightMediocrity•1.86M subscribers
FightMediocrity creates book summaries and works with the best authors and thinkers of our time. We have created short films featuring some of the best minds including: Dr. Matthew Walker Dr. Jonathan Haidt Dr. Joe Dispenza Sam Harris 6X Mr. Olympia Dorian Yates Dr. Jordan Peterson Johann Hari Sadhguru Dr. Bruce Lipton James Clear Ryan Holiday Robert Greene Robert Kiyosaki Navy SEAL Jocko Willink Navy SEAL David Goggins Jim Kwik Tim Ferriss Neil Strauss Alain De Botton and many more...
CookingWithScience
@CookingWithScience•347 subscribers
Vsauce3

@Vsauce3•4.01M subscribers
Fictional Worlds are Amazing Vsauce3 launched in September 2012 and is run by Jake Roper *************************************************************** Vsauce is... Michael Stevens: Producer/Host of Vsauce1 Kevin Lieber: Producer/Host of Vsauce2 Jake Roper: Producer/Host of Vsauce3 Eric Langlay: VFX for Vsauce1/2/3 You: Thanks for watching!
Vsauce2

@Vsauce2•4.55M subscribers
Welcome to the official Vsauce2 YouTube channel! Hosted by Kevin Lieber, Vsauce2 explores recreational mathematics including, paradoxes, math games, riddles and more to uncover the surprising complexity beneath seemingly simple concepts. Vsauce2 launched in December 2010 and is run by Kevin Lieber. Vsauce is... Michael Stevens: Producer/Host of Vsauce1 Kevin Lieber: Producer/Host of Vsauce2 Jake Roper: Producer/Host of Vsauce3 Matthew Tabor: Writer for Vsauce2
WeJustLoveVocalTrance
@WeJustLoveVocalTrance•2.63K subscribers
VICE

@VICE•18.8M subscribers
All the good stuff. Enlightening commentary, authoritative advice, and unique stories you won't find anywhere else. Our immersive and ground-breaking storytelling has changed the way people think about culture, crime, art, parties, fashion, protest, the internet and other subjects that don't even have names yet. Browse the library and discover corners of the world you never knew existed. All video licensing inquiries should be directed to licensing@vice.com.
manoj varma
@manojvarma789•32 subscribers
steffyweffy777
@steffyweffy777•15.3K subscribers
thewhiskybothy
@thewhiskybothy•186K subscribers
reviews of whisky and other spirits from around the World. Follow me on patreon.com/ralfy for 'extras'
Raveplann
@raveplann•57.7K subscribers
Trance, Psychedelic Trance, Dark Forest Trance, Hitech trance, Drum & Bass, Goa old and new school. No ads, no annotations, only the best in dj sets organized in playlists. Νo mass collection! Support artists and buy their music! If you want to promote your work here (with info links etc. for free) or to remove it please send message. Contact: use the Facebook page: https://www.facebook.com/raveplann Copyright statement: This channel is not being used to make money in any way and is for entertainment and leisure purposes only. This is an act of fair usage as described by the Copyright Offices, therefore, a dispute should not occur over this channel. No copyright intended. This is strictly for non-profit and educational purposes only. All rights belong to the original owners and content creators of this material. For more read: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copyright_Act_of_1976
Rave Nation
@RaveNationMusic•154K subscribers
Welcome to the Rave Nation! ► Contact & Promo: contact.ravenation@gmail.com
WeLikeRaving
@wlr2015•1.23K subscribers
Hello! Welcome Back to Your Favorite Music Channel! We're Ready to Continue What We've Left Behind! New Channel, New Tracks New Ideas but We Keep the Same Hard Work & Daily Upload! EDM, DeepHouse, Trap Music, Dubstep! We Bring it Back to You! Help Us Reaching Again Over 40.000 Subscribers! Subscribe, Like, Share! PEAAAAACE! "WeLikeRaving"
Chris Dahms
@18F4550videos•24.4K subscribers
PPUNG DADDY(뿡대디) - LEGO TECHNIC RC
@logsinx80•123K subscribers
We offer a amazing LEGO Technic MOD, Mindstorms, RC Mods, Reviews, Instructions, etc. You can move all Lego. Enjoy moving Lego in here. PPUNG TV. 레고 테크닉 개조, 마인드스톰, RC 개조, 리뷰, 인스트럭션 제공 모든 레고는 움직일 수 있습니다. 뿡TV에서 움직이는 레고를 즐겨 보세요.
superlegocreators123
@superlegocreators123•8.28K subscribers
My YouTube channel contains a variety of great Lego content and creations. I made this channel not just to show off my creations, but to inspire other builders like myself to design and explore the wonders of Legos. Although Legos seem to be just a toy their actually is some real mechanics, robotics, and engineering behind the working creations that I design and build. On my channel I have a variety of tutorials and creations for my viewers to watch, use, and enjoy. In order to inspire other builders like ourselves we supply viewers with in depth mechanism videos, and easy to follow instructions in order to get them started. As you can probably tell my channel also contains a variety of different content in which is all sorted accordingly on our main page. So if your interested just go and check out my channel for yourselves let me know what you think in the comments. Remember if you want to see more and enjoy my videos, make sure to rate, comment and subscribe.
Drunken Prank Calls
@drunkenprankcalls2068•20 subscribers
For the last 15 years we've been making prank calls off and on. Now that the statute of limitations is up on some of our finer work, it's time to share it with the rest of the internet.
Veritasium

@veritasium•17.5M subscribers
An element of truth - videos about science, education, and anything else I find interesting.
minutephysics

@MinutePhysics•5.84M subscribers
Simply put: cool physics and other sweet science. "If you can't explain it simply, you don't understand it well enough." ~Rutherford via Einstein? (wikiquote) Created by Henry Reich
BrightSight Speakers
@BrightSightSpeakers•2.56K subscribers
Official channel of BrightSight Speakers, an exclusive speakers bureau.
LaserUnicorns
@LaserUnicorns•292K subscribers
Lasers and Unicorns combined to make more powerful Unicorns.
The STATION by MAKER
@STATIONbyMAKER•932K subscribers
Lowkey, we're kinda funny.
Deep Look

@KQEDDeepLook•2.28M subscribers
DEEP LOOK is a science video series that explores big science by going very, very small, from KQED and PBS Digital Studios. We use macro photography and microscopy in glorious 4K resolution, to see science up close ... really, really close. Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/deeplook TikTok: https://www.tiktok.com/@deeplookofficial SUBSCRIBE: https://www.youtube.com/user/kqeddeeplook?sub_confirmation=1 Laura Klivans: Host/Writer @lauraklivans Gabriela Quiros: Supervising Producer Joshua Cassidy: Lead Producer / Cinematographer @Jkcassidy Mimi Schiffman: Producer Rosa Tuirán: Producer Teodros Hailye: Animator Sevda Eris: Engagement Director Jenny Oh: Engagement Producer @plattyjo Seth G. Samuel: Composer @sethgsamuel Kia Simon: Editor and Motion Graphics: @KiaSimon Craig Rosa: former Series Producer KQED, an NPR and PBS affiliate in San Francisco, serves Northern California and beyond with a public-supported alternative to commercial TV, radio and web media.
Hart voor Autos

@hartvoorautosNL•213K subscribers
Welcome to the Hart voor Auto's channel! On our website platform Hartvoorautos.nl you will find daily new items about special cars, scoops, car news and loads of photos and videos. Stay up to date via our Facebook, Proudwheels and Instagram pages. On this YouTube channel we upload new video's as soon as we feel we have a striking opportunity. We drive with the most special cars for you - and secretly also for our own pleasure or show other spectacular car features. Enjoy! Team Heart for Cars info@hartvoorautos.nl
Kong Pham
@KongPham•2.38M subscribers
Magnet Expert
@first4magnets•59K subscribers
Strong neodymium magnets are our business and that's what you will find on our YouTube channel! At first4magnets® we love everything magnets, here you will find fascinating videos showcasing the possibilities, usefulness and intrigue of magnets, plus the odd product feature. :) Visit first4magnets.com and you will find the widest range of magnets stock anywhere in the UK and our passion goes in to each and every one - we know magnets and with our 40 years of experience in the magnet industry, no solution is out of reach.
MITK12Videos
@MITK12Videos•217K subscribers
Homecooked STEM videos for K-12 students made by MIT students. Served up fresh from MIT's Office of Digital Learning. Visit http://k12videos.mit.edu/
Don't Hug Me .I'm Scared

@donthugmeimscared•3.37M subscribers
Don't Hug Me I'm Scared
jovssen
@jovssen•911 subscribers
My YouTube channel for (mostly) anything creative I make. Though at the moment, pretty much only LEGO. Editing programs: Photoshop, Camtasia Studio
Supreme Fortnite Moments
@SupremeTeamOG•12.2K subscribers
● Supremely Entertaining You.
A3Bikini
@A3Bikini•93.5K subscribers
For our latest videos go here @saturdaynightvevo A3Network started life in 2002 as the world-famous ‘A3tv’, the world’s first Nightlife TV Network, broadcasting to 12m homes from Key West to NYC. In 2008 we moved operations to YouTube and developed a group of Lifestyle Video Channels, including A3 Network, A3tv, A3DJ, A3 Fashion, A3 Bikini, A3 Music & A3 Party. Now we are much more than a YouTube Network, we distribute content across multiple online platforms and we also produce & manage several linear 'Live Stream' Channels; Dancestar TV & A3Bikini TV.
MiniSteam
@Ministeam•23.2K subscribers
The largest distributor of Live Steam Engines in the United States. We have one of the largest selection of working model engines available. www.ministeam.com If you love toy steam engines, SUBSCRIBE to our monthly newsletter now! You'll be the first to know about our newest products, latest inventory updates, and insider sales offers. https://www.ministeam.com/newsletter
CoolestToysOnEarth
@CoolestToysOnEarth•311 subscribers
mowerofdoom
@mowerofdoom•960 subscribers
Thanks for visiting Mowerofdoom. I plan to release one video per month on average, so if you see stuff that interests you, please subscribe!
SuNCamPopov
@SuNCamPopov•2.81K subscribers
Zero Labs
@zerolabs•58.1K subscribers
I produce and maintain this channel and my web site to chronicle my own journey into alternate energy technologies, expose the frauds, share my discoveries openly and hopefully motivate others to do the same. Please rate, comment on, share and subscribe to my videos. But most of all, build something! "History is full of people who out of fear, ignorance, or lust of power have destroyed knowledge of immeasurable value which truly belongs to us all. We must not let it happen again." -Carl Sagan A few words of caution: Much of my research centers around methods of generating and using HHO (Hydrogen and oxygen in highly explosive stoichiometric ratio). This is extremely dangerous work and NOT INTENDED FOR CHILDREN. Extreme caution must be exercised at all times to ensure personal safety. CARELESS EXPERIMENTERS HAVE BEEN KILLED playing around with this stuff. PLEASE BE SMART when playing with HHO.
Emotional Trancer
@EmotionalTrancer•13.9K subscribers
Firstly can I say thank you to all who comment on my tunes and listen to them, it means a lot to me, after all I would not keep uploading if I thought no one cared :) I am an Englishman living in the UK and my name is Jason. I only listen to the very best in emotional, melodic, epic and uplifting trance, so hopefully you will find what you like here. I have created this channel simply to share with you my most favourite trance tracks :) I also have another channel devoted to Synthwave music: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC9rzEQzZpWMn0BFB1uqvVXg
Noober Goober Gaming
@NooberGoobers•16.2K subscribers
We make awesome videos about video games. Please consider supporting us on Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/noobergoobers
CGP Grey

@CGPGrey•6.69M subscribers
Harry Mustey
@insanity683•112 subscribers
TechnologicVehicles
@TechnologicVehicles•42.9K subscribers
Home of Green and Innovative Motion Magazine and directory of green vehicles with a twist of fun and design
VideoPhixa
@VideoPhixa•222K subscribers
:)
PARADISE

@iiPARADISEii•296K subscribers
Paradise - Trance & Progressive Music. ● Regarding copyright issues please contact: official.paradise.music@gmail.com ● Promo: official.paradise.music@gmail.com
Photonicinduction

@Photonicinduction•609K subscribers
One man and plug socket = Mayhem. Interesting and mad scientific experiments involving electrical energy, plenty of interesting components and everyday items tested and cranked up with so much power "until it pops!" With 25 Years Electrical Experience, overload on the internet since 2008 to Now. No silly expensive lab required, the best Inventors did it all at home first! For contact, reviews, extreme testing and product promotions, click the email below.
Tiny Home Builders
@TinyHomeBuilders•7.79K subscribers
Eminence
@EminenceTV•57.5K subscribers
Bookings: dillon@dlnsounds.com
Zachy Hennessey
@YaBoiZachy•1.23K subscribers
music clown, human rat, indie bedroom pop genius
schmoyoho

@schmoyoho•3.56M subscribers
Schmoyoho is made by The Gregory Brothers: Michael, Andrew, Sarah, and Evan. This channel is where we Songify® the universe in an attempt to create a cosmic dance party that brings world peace to all. Videos / series here include Songify the News (previously Auto-Tune the News), Songify This, the Takeo Cinematic Universe, and other strange offerings, that hopefully can help you thrust your pelvis in rhythm. Send us suggestions here or on other socials for our next video—then we can all sing and dance along together, our true destiny. business inquiries: gregorybrotherspress@gmail.com
RED5 stores
@RED5stores•1.96K subscribers
Check out our cool gadgets and gizmos available to buy in our stores and from our partners Menkind, John Lewis and Boots.
radiooneindiana
@radiooneindiana•62 subscribers
lakeshorepublicmedia
@lakeshorepublicmedia•2.33K subscribers
Lakeshore Public Television brings you quality PBS and original programming to educate, enlighten and inform. As your trusted resource for local news, weather, sports and public affairs, in Northwest Indiana and Chicago land, Lakeshore Public Television keeps you connected.
Henrik Mahler
@Henrikm1952•1.98K subscribers
Darien Lingstuyl (DarienX)
@DarienLingstuyl•27.3K subscribers
I created this channel to show my work as Musician, Photographer, Audiovisual Producer, and Filmmaker. There are some behind scenes, tutorials about photography and videos, I test cameras, lens, lights, and while I test I mostly shoot beautifull girls as test subjects. Some videoshoots are to show girls talents, dancers, acting, modeling, makeup artist, or fashion designers. I work mostly in Venezuela, but I travel sometimes.
Living Big In A Tiny House

@livingbig•4.64M subscribers
Join us as we travel the globe seeking out the very best of tiny homes, alternative dwellings and stories of downsized, off-grid living!
LightLasers
@LightLasers•1 subscriber
Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT)

@mit•907K subscribers
Videos from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. The mission of MIT is to advance knowledge and educate students in science, technology, and other areas of scholarship that will best serve the nation and the world. The Institute is committed to generating, disseminating, and preserving knowledge, and to working with others to bring this knowledge to bear on the world's great challenges. MIT is dedicated to providing its students with an education that combines rigorous academic study and the excitement of discovery with the support and intellectual stimulation of a diverse campus community. We seek to develop in each member of the MIT community the ability and passion to work wisely, creatively, and effectively for the betterment of humankind.
7a9rian2
@7a9rian2•19.5K subscribers
Subscribe for more random cool stuff, contents that will make you entertained daily, Puzzles, Jokes, Lessons, Story's, Wisdom, Facts, Games and a lot more, Subscribe and stay tuned.
Arunkumar M
@aktube14•366 subscribers
Just Enjoy It!
MicroroboticsLab
@MicroroboticsLab•3.69K subscribers
The Harvard Microrobotics Lab focuses on mechanics, materials, design, and manufacturing for novel robots. This includes robotics at unique size scales (microrobots) and robots that depart from conventional rigid materials (soft robotics). Examples of our work include robotic insects (e.g. the "RoboBee" and "HAMR"), squishy soft-bodied grippers ("Squishy Robot Fingers"), and wearable robots. Looking for even more kid-friendly videos of our work? Check out our feature in Nat Geo Kids: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dXCdocsWntI
TranceformYourWorld
@TranceformYourWorld•9.53K subscribers
Posting 5 or 6 monthly vocal & uplifting trance mixes. If you love emotional & euphoric trance, make sure to subscribe! Unlike many radio shows who only feature tracks that have been sent in/are on their label/are produced by friends, I'll be featuring my favourite tracks independant of any other factor. Hopefully my favourites will also be your favourites too! http://facebook.com/TranceformYourWorldOfficial http://mixcloud.com/TranceformYourWorld ContactTranceformYourWorld@gmail.com "Pure Trance is a feeling, a passion which exists outside of contemporary musical fads and fashions. It is the bringing together of millions of fans for whom this music is a way of life" - Solarstone
Trance Tizium
@TrancetiziuM•1.12K subscribers
Colored Mix For More Trance Pleasure.. Trance (Music Genre), Uplifting Trance,Progressive Trance, Vocal Trance,Psychedelic, Electronic Dance Music,Psy-trance, Best Vocal Trance, Best Uplifting Trance, Best Progressive Trance, Remix, Classic Trance, Trance 2014, Melodic Trance, Trance Anthem , Emotional Trance, Epic Trance, Energetic Trance, Euphoric Trance and more.
Apn Gallego
@ApnGallego•87 subscribers
Michael Janzen
@tinyhousedesign•6.74K subscribers
Learn to design and build your own housing solutions.
Tiny House Talk
@TinyHouseTalk•34.2K subscribers
Videos dedicated to tiny houses and every other kind of small space, too!
tinyhouseman
@tinyhouseman•8.37K subscribers
I built this tiny house for several reasons. First off, I decided that buying a large or even a midsized home would be something that I would never actually be able to afford with a mortgage and taxes, the high cost of utilities, upkeep and such and still be able to eat. My health was deteriorating and I didn't want to be a homeless person because I couldn't afford the rising cost of rent. Secondly, I do believe that we should live more responsibly when it comes to the issue of our environmental health. I'm not trying to judge here. If I had a family with several kids to raise, then of course I wouldn't be living in such a small environment. But, being there is only me, I don't believe that more is necessary. I like the idea of being able to move around time to time to see all the fascinating things that our country has to show us and hopefully find that little spot of paradise that we have all dreamed about. I have been living in it for the past (almost) 2 years now and really love it
Tiny House Customs
@TinyHouseCustoms•42.7K subscribers
A channel with a how to do it yourself philosophy.
Vic's Tips and Tricks
@VicsTipsandTricks•14.3K subscribers
Hello there. Looking for something a little different? Well you found it. Here you will find random videos where I "Victor Poulin" will show you all types of videos about building, inventing, wildlife, adventure, and just all around FUN!!!
SmarterEveryDay

@smartereveryday•11.6M subscribers
I explore the world using science. That's pretty much all there is to it. Watch 2 videos. If you learn something AWESOME, please subscribe if you feel like I earned it. Contact: http://www.smartereveryday.com/contact. I currently get lots of correspondence so please forgive me if I'm unable to reply. I mean well, but want to focus on being a better Dad.
DemolitionRanch

@DemolitionRanch•11.8M subscribers
NOT YOUR AVERAGE GUN CHANNEL
DEFCONConference
@DEFCONConference•348K subscribers
This is the official DEF CON YouTube channel. What is DEF CON? Check out https://www.defcon.org/ We'll be posting videos and pictures from past conferences here, starting with DEF CON 20 and working backwards. If you have a DEF CON related video you want us to include in this channel please email us / fb / tweet and we'll get it added. Please remember, all content is copyright DEF CON Communications, Inc. You can share it for educational purposes, but you can not make _any_ money from doing so. If you do that would be a violation of the copyright as well as the spirit of DEF CON.
drewtoothpaste
@drewtoothpaste•23.1K subscribers
You should subscribe to Garbage Brain University if you like listening to our hour-long podcast that contains the most bizarre facts we can find and stories we can tell: https://www.garbagebrainuniversity.com It's also on iTunes, Spotify, Stitcher, and probably on whatever other podcast app you listen to! Follow Drew on Twitter: https://twitter.com/drewtoothpaste Follow Natalie on Twitter: https://twitter.com/nataliedee
HowToBasic

@HowToBasic•17.7M subscribers
I make How To videos! Have a video Suggestion? Post it in the Comments section, contact me through my Facebook page or Tweet me! Business enquiries ► matt@humanmg.com other enquiries ► howtobasic@gmail.com
NightHawkInLight

@Nighthawkinlight•2.31M subscribers
Thanks for stopping by! My name is Ben. I turn boring things into awesome things. I've been creating and filming projects and science experiments since 2006 and have had the amazing privilege of seeing them bring happiness to millions of people. Please consider supporting my work on Patreon: https://www.patreon.com/NightHawkProjects Contact: *Before emailing me about where to find parts for my projects please do a search on amazon/ebay. I do not have parts lists or written plans for my projects. Please forgive me if I am slow or fail to reply to all emails. Your email will be read, but I am unable to reply to everyone. NightHawkVideoResponse[at]gmail.com
Household Hacker

@HouseholdHacker•4.73M subscribers
At HouseholdHacker, we solve your common everyday problems and create things utilizing items you find around your house. You might say we try to bring out the MacGyver in all of us. From kitchen hacks and tricks to getting rid of ants; we do it all. ----Contact Us---- Business inquires can be sent to us by checking the form below. Please submit serious inquiries only, all others will be ignored.
lasersaber
@lasersaber•167K subscribers
Alternative energy, 3D printing, motor-generators, manned electric aircraft, Tesla tech, solar, off-grid power, hexacopters, FPV, DIY projects, electronics hacking, etc.
ND Trendx
@NDTrendx•846K subscribers
gordonmcdowell
@gordonmcdowell•35.3K subscribers
Videographer in Calgary, Alberta, Canada. Thorium & MSR advocate. Working to educate public on Molten Salt Reactors, Thorium and Uranium fuels, and the as-yet unrealized potential of nuclear power.
relaxshacksDOTcom
@relaxshacksDOTcom•229K subscribers
All about Tiny Houses, Tree Houses, Small Houses, Backyard Art Studios, Houseboats, Campers, Cool Architecture, and DIY thrift, salvage, and re-use (with a dash of Deek's art work). "RelaxshacksDOTcom" is hosted by Derek "Deek" Diedricksen, former host of HGTV's "Tiny House Builders" and "Extreme Small Spaces", and author of "Humble Homes, Simple Shacks", and "Microshelters". Deek and his brother Dustin travel the US touring and filming tiny houses, and more, as they build and design their own works (often featured) at the same time.
Jessieoneyes
@Jessieoneyes•711 subscribers
Hey! I started this youtube channel of out interest of eye exercises and exploring ways of improving vision safely and naturally. Being a former LASIK patient, I would like to help other who are considering this surgery to explore other alternatives. If you have any questions concerning LASIK and my experiences or about my journey with my attempts in vision improvement through eye exercises, please feel free to ask me any questions. Feel free to SUBSCRIBE to keep up to date with my journey in exploring natural vision improvement alternatives. Blessings, Jessie
SouthShoreCVA
@SouthShoreCVA•843 subscribers
The South Shore is the perfect place to relax and enjoy the hospitality of the Hoosier state. The area is a mix of big-city fun and small-town friendliness, beaches and baseball stadiums, whatever you are looking for, you will find it along the South Shore. Take a few minutes to learn more about some of the great restaurants, attractions and events from around the area. Any rebroadcast, retransmission, use by third party or account of this video, without the express written consent and permission of the Lake County Convention and Visitors Bureau (dba South Shore Convention and Visitors Authority) is prohibited.
NixieDoesLinux

@NixiePixel•205K subscribers
Turn on that bell so you don't miss new video releases 💜 OS.ALT covers the indie/hacking/geek community, including open source alternatives to operating systems and gaming. I'll have Android hacks (rooting, comparison vs. iPhone, preview apps, workarounds & tinkering), Linux for newbs, plus audience questions & answers. Your source for open source. NOTE: Use the "Contact Me" link on the header above
blackcreekresearch
@blackcreekresearch•1.01K subscribers
rmcfadye
@rmcfadye•160 subscribers
Uplifting Emotional Trance
@upliftingemotionaltrance•23.9K subscribers
Firstly can I say thank you to all who comment on my tunes and listen to them, it means a lot to me, after all I would not keep uploading if I thought no one cared :) I am an Englishman living in the UK and my name is Jason. I only listen to the very best in emotional, melodic, progressive, epic, vocal and uplifting trance, so hopefully you will find what you like here. I have created this channel simply to share with you my most favourite trance tracks. I also have two other channels, both of which can be found below on the 'featured channels' section. One includes single upload videos rather than in the style of mixes as this channel is and the other is a trance label of mine called Trancer Recordings. Facebook page for this channel: https://www.facebook.com/upliftingemotionaltrancechannel My previous Facebook page which I lost access to: https://www.facebook.com/upliftingemotionaltrancemusic
GREENPOWERSCIENCE

@GREENPOWERSCIENCE•352K subscribers
First Fresnel Lens video made in 2007. A science website for free DIY solar power. Dan Rojas makes and demo solar Fresnel Lenses, Parabolic Mirrors and alternative energy options that produce real power. GreenPowerScience.com also offers information for preppers including DIY solar thermal, solar cooking, off grid living and solar panel - PV Photovoltaic projects in an easy to understand teaching atmosphere. Solar is the future for a healthy planet.
ZEROapproaches
@ZEROapproaches•4.23K subscribers
TKJ Electronics
@TKJElectronics•299 subscribers
The idea and main purpose with TKJ Electronics was to create a company whose main interest would be to demonstrate and create a wide spectre of electronic development boards, at reasonable costs. The idea was to either create development boards which he would be interested in buying for himself, as a hobbyist, or to find and review pre-existing ones that would suit his needs. TKJ Electronics' slogan is "Development with ease", and we try our best to satisfy our customers needs, either by doing consultancy for them (hardware/software), or by making the right electronic product for them. We hope that our boards will help students, hobbyists, universities and other people interested in electronics getting started with electronics development themselves!
Stuff Made Here

@StuffMadeHere•4.62M subscribers
I've been building things for as long as I can remember. It all started when my dad exposed me to plastic model building and soldering when I was around 4 years old. That set me on a path to building increasingly complex things and becoming an engineer. My goal is to do the same for as many people as possible by exposing them to the joy of engineering, fabricating and creating things out of nothing. If I'm lucky a few people may become engineers, which would be great for the world. Engineering is awesome. If you're interested in sending me something: P.O. Box 78470 Charlotte, NC 28271

